10-K 1 mck_10kx3312019.htm 10-K
Table
of Content    
UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
x ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF
1934
For the fiscal year ended March 31, 2019
OR
 TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF
1934
For the transition period from             to            
Commission File Number: 1-13252
McKESSON CORPORA TION
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware  94-3207296
(State or  other  jurisdiction of incorporation or  organization)  (I.R.S. Employer  Identification No.)
 
6555 State Hwy 161, Irving, Texas  75039
(Addr ess of principal executive offices)  (Zip Code)
(972) 446-4800
(Registrant’ s telephone number , including ar ea code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
(Title of each class) (Trading Symbol) (Name of each exchange on which registered)
Common stock, $0.01 par value MCK New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer , as defined in Rule 405 of the
Securities Act.  Yes  x    No  ¨
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Act.  Yes  ¨    No  x
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registra nt was required to file such reports),
and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.    Yes  x    No  ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically , every Interactive Data File required to be submitted
pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.40 5 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the
registrant was required to submit such files).  Yes  x    No  ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, or a smaller
reporting company . See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company” and “emer ging
growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act. (Check one):
Large accelerated filer  x   Accelerated filer  ¨
Non-accelerated filer  ¨   Smaller reporting company  ¨
  Emerging growth company ¨
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period
for complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act). 
Yes  ¨    No  x
The aggrega te market value of the voting and non-voting common equity held by non-af filiates  of the registrant, computed by
reference to the closing price as of the last business day of the registrant’ s most recently  completed second fiscal quarter ,
September 30, 2018 , was approximately $26 billion .
Number of shares of common stock outstanding on April 30, 2019 : 189,961,556
DOCUMENTS INCORPORA TED BY  REFERENCE
Portions of the registrant ’s Proxy Statement for its 2019  Annual Meeting of Stockholders are incorporated by reference into Part
III of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
 Item Page
 PART I  
1. Business 3
1A. Risk Factors 10
1B. Unresolved Staff Comments 23
2. Properties 23
3. Legal Proceedings 24
4. Mine Safety Disclosures 24
 Executive Officers of the Registrant 25
 PART II  
5. Market for the Registrant's Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities 26
6. Selected Financial Data 29
7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 31
7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 49
8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 50
9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 122
9A. Controls and Procedures 122
9B. Other Information 122
 PART III  
10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 123
11. Executive Compensation 123
12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 123
13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence 125
14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services 125
 PART IV  
15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedule 126
16. Form 10-K Summary 126
 Signatures 132
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
PART I
Item 1. Business.
General
McKesson Corporation (“McKesson,” the “Company,” or “we” and other similar pronouns), currently ranked 6th on the
FORTUNE 500, is a global leader in healthcare supply chain management solutions, retail pharmacy, healthcare technology,
community oncology and specialty care. We partner with life sciences companies, manufacturers, providers, pharmacies,
governments and other healthcare organizations to help provide the right medicines, medical products and healthcare services to the
right patients at the right time, safely and cost-effectively.
The Company’s fiscal year begins on April 1 and ends on March 31. Unless otherwise noted, all references in this document to
a particular year shall mean the Company’s fiscal year.
Our Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K and amendments to those
reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange
Act,”) are available free of charge on our website (www.mckesson.com under the “Investors — Financial Information — SEC
Filings” caption) as soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file such material with, or furnish it to, the Securities and
Exchange Commission (“SEC” or the “Commission”). The content on any website referred to in this Annual Report on Form 10-K
is not incorporated by reference into this report, unless expressly noted otherwise.
The public may obtain information on the operation of the Public Reference Room by calling the SEC at 1-800-SEC-0330. The
SEC maintains a website that contains reports, proxy and information statements, and other information regarding issuers,
including the Company, that file electronically with the SEC. The address of the website is www.sec.gov.
Business Segments
Commencing in the first quarter of 2019, we changed our operating structure into three reportable segments: U.S.
Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions, European Pharmaceutical Solutions and Medical-Surgical Solutions. All remaining
operating segments and business activities that are not significant enough to require separate reportable segment disclosure are
included in Other. We have reported our financial results on a retrospective basis in this Annual Report on Form 10-K to reflect the
new operating structure.
Our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment distributes branded, generic, specialty, biosimilar and over-the-
counter (“OTC”) pharmaceutical drugs and other healthcare-related products. This segment provides practice management,
technology, clinical support and business solutions to community-based oncology and other specialty practices. This segment also
provides solutions for life sciences companies including offering multiple distribution channels and clinical trial access to specific
patient populations through our network of oncology physicians. It also sells financial, operational and clinical solutions to
pharmacies (retail, hospital, alternate site) and provides consulting, outsourcing and other services.
Our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment provides distribution and services to wholesale, institutional and retail
customers and serves patients and consumers in 13 European countries through our own pharmacies and participating pharmacies
that operate under brand partnership and franchise arrangements.
Our Medical-Surgical Solutions segment distributes medical-surgical supplies and provides logistics and other services to
healthcare providers in the United States.
Other primarily consists of the following:
•McKesson Canada which distributes pharmaceutical and medical products and operates Rexall Health retail pharmacies;
•McKesson Prescription Technology Solutions (“MRxTS”) which provides innovative technologies that support retail
pharmacies; and
•Our 70% equity ownership interest in a joint venture, Change Healthcare, which is accounted for by us using the equity
investment method of accounting.
3
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions Segment:
Our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment provides distribution and logistics services for branded, generic,
specialty, biosimilar and OTC pharmaceutical drugs and other healthcare-related products to customers. This business also provides
solutions and services to pharmacies, hospitals, pharmaceutical manufacturers, physicians, payers and patients throughout the
United States and Puerto Rico. We also source generic pharmaceutical drugs through our joint sourcing entity, ClarusONE Sourcing
Services LLP (“ClarusONE”).
Our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment operates and serves customer through a network of 30 distribution
centers, as well as a primary redistribution center, one strategic redistribution center and one repackaging facility. We invest in
technology and other systems at all of our distribution centers to enhance safety and reliability and product availability. For
example, we offer McKesson ConnectSM, an internet-based ordering system that provides item look-up and real-time inventory
availability as well as ordering, purchasing, third-party reconciliation and account management functionality. We make extensive
use of technology as an enabler to ensure customers have the right products at the right time in the right place.
To maximize distribution efficiency and effectiveness, we follow the Six Sigma methodology, which is an analytical approach
that emphasizes setting high-quality objectives, collecting data and analyzing results to a fine degree in order to improve processes,
reduce costs and enhance service accuracy and safety. We provide solutions to our customers including supply management
technology, world-class marketing programs, managed care, repackaging products and services to help them meet their business
and quality goals. We continue to implement information systems to help achieve greater consistency and accuracy both internally
and for our customers.
We have three primary customer channels: (i) retail national accounts which include national and regional chains, food and
drug combinations, mail order pharmacies and mass merchandisers, (ii) independent, small and medium chain retail pharmacies,
and (iii) institutional healthcare providers such as hospitals, health systems, integrated delivery networks and long-term care
providers.
Retail National Accounts: We provide business solutions that help retail national account customers increase revenues and
profitability. Solutions include:
•Central FillSM - Prescription refill service that enables pharmacies to more quickly refill prescriptions remotely, more
accurately and at a lower cost, while reducing inventory levels and improving customer service.
•Redistribution Centers - Two facilities totaling over 750,000 square feet that offer access to inventory for single source
warehouse purchasing, including pharmaceuticals and biologics. These distribution centers also provide the foundation for a
two-tiered distribution network that supports best-in-class direct store delivery.
•McKesson SynerGx® - Generic pharmaceutical purchasing program and inventory management that helps pharmacies
maximize their cost savings with a broad selection of generic drugs, competitive pricing and one-stop shopping.
•RxPakSM - Bulk-to-bottle repackaging service that leverages our purchasing scale and supplier relationships to provide
pharmaceuticals at competitive prices, help increase inventory turns and reduce working capital investment.
•Inventory Management - An integrated solution comprising forecasting software and automated replenishment technologies
that reduce inventory-carrying costs.
•ExpressRx Track™ - Pharmacy automation solution featuring state-of-the-art robotics, upgraded imaging and expanded vial
capabilities, and industry-leading speed and accuracy in a small footprint.
4
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Independent, Small and Medium Chain Retail Pharmacies: We provide managed care contracting, branding and advertising,
merchandising, purchasing, operational efficiency and automation that help independent pharmacists focus on patient care while
improving profitability. Solutions include:
•Health Mart® - Health Mart® is a national network of more than 5,000 independently-owned pharmacies and is one of the
industry’s most comprehensive pharmacy franchise programs. Health Mart® provides franchisees support for managed care
contracting, branding and local marketing solutions, the Health Mart private label line of products, merchandising solutions
and programs for enhanced patient support.
•Health Mart Atlas® - Comprehensive managed care and reconciliation assistance services that help independent pharmacies
save time, access competitive reimbursement rates and improve cash flow.
•McKesson Reimbursement AdvantageSM (“MRA”) - MRA is one of the industry’s most comprehensive reimbursement
optimization packages, comprising financial services (automated claim resubmission), analytic services and customer care.
•McKesson OneStop Generics® - Generic pharmaceutical purchasing program that helps pharmacies maximize their cost
savings with a broad selection of generic drugs, competitive pricing and one-stop shopping.
•Sunmark® - Complete line of more than 600 products that provide retail independent pharmacies with value-priced
alternatives to national brands.
•FrontEdge™ - Strategic planning, merchandising and price maintenance program that helps independent pharmacies maximize
store profitability.
•McKesson Sponsored Clinical Services (SCS) Network - Access to patient-support services that allow pharmacists to earn
service fees and to develop stronger patient relationships.
•McKesson RxOwnership Program - Assist independent pharmacist owners the opportunity to remain independent via
succession planning and business operation loans.
Institutional Healthcare Providers: We provide electronic ordering/purchasing and supply chain management systems that help
customers improve financial performance, increase operational efficiencies and deliver better patient care. Solutions include:
•Fulfill-RxSM - Ordering and inventory management system that empowers hospitals to optimize the often complicated
processes related to unit-based cabinet replenishment and inventory management.
•Asset Management - Award-winning inventory optimization and purchasing management program that helps institutional
providers lower costs while ensuring product availability.
•SKY Packaging - Blister, Unit of Use and Unit dose packaging containing the most widely prescribed dosages and strengths in
generic oral-solid medications. SKY Packaging enables acute care, long-term care and institutional pharmacies to provide cost-
effective, uniform packaging.
•McKesson Plasma and Biologics - A full portfolio of plasma-derivatives and biologic products.
•McKesson OneStop Generics® - Described above.
This segment also provides a range of solutions to oncology and other specialty practices operating in communities across the
country, to pharmaceutical and biotechnology suppliers who manufacture specialty drugs and vaccines, and to payers and hospitals.
We have two core specialty business lines: Specialty Provider Organization and McKesson Life Sciences.
5
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Specialty Provider Organization: This business offers community specialists (oncologists, rheumatologists, ophthalmologists,
urologists, neurologists and other specialists) an extensive set of customizable products and services designed to strengthen core
practice operations, enhance value-based care delivery and expand their service offering to patients. Tools and services include
specialty drug distribution and group purchasing organization (“GPO”) services, technology solutions, practice consulting services,
and vaccine distribution, including our exclusive distributor relationship with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s
(“CDC”) Vaccines for Children program. Community-based physicians in this business have broad flexibility and discretion to
select the products and commitment levels that best meet their practice needs. This business also provides a variety of solutions,
including practice operations, healthcare information technology, revenue cycle management and managed care contracting
solutions, evidence-based guidelines and quality measurements to support U.S. Oncology Network, one of the nation’s largest
networks of physician-led, integrated, community-based oncology practices dedicated to advancing high-quality, evidence-based
cancer care. We also support U.S. Oncology Research, one of the nation’s largest research networks, specializing in oncology
clinical trials.
McKesson Life Sciences: This business helps life sciences companies accelerate the approval and successful commercialization
of branded, specialty, generic and biosimilar pharmaceuticals across the product life cycle. Our offerings to life sciences companies
include specialty pharmacy services, third-party logistics (“3PL”), provider and patient engagement programs, clinical trial support,
patient assistance programs, reimbursement services, analytics, and other tailored services. In addition, we help life sciences
companies minimize reimbursement challenges while offering affordable, safe access to therapies through Risk Evaluation and
Mitigation Strategies (“REMS”) programs. Our recent acquisitions of RxCrossroads and Biologics help expand our capabilities to
support life sciences companies.
When we discuss specialty products or services, we consider the following factors: diseases requiring complex treatment
regimens such as cancer and rheumatoid arthritis; plasma and biologics products; ongoing clinical monitoring requirements, high-
cost, special handling, storage and delivery requirements and, in some cases, exclusive distribution arrangements. Our use of the
term “specialty” may not be comparable to that used by other industry participants, including our competitors.
European Pharmaceutical Solutions Segment:
Our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment provides distribution and services to wholesale, institutional and retail
customers in 13 European countries where we own, partner or franchise with retail pharmacies, as further described below. The
business consists of Pharmacy Solutions and Consumer Solutions.
Our Pharmacy Solutions business delivers pharmaceutical and other healthcare-related products to pharmacies across Europe.
This business functions as a vital link connecting manufacturers to retail pharmacies. This business supplies medicines and other
products sold in pharmacies.  Pharmaceutical and other healthcare-related products are stored at regional wholesale branches using
technology-enabled management systems. Our European business leverages its scale and provides innovative and effective medical
care services to create enhanced customer value.
Our Consumer Solutions business serves patients and consumers in European countries directly through approximately 2,000
of our own pharmacies and 6,900 participant pharmacies operating under brand partnership arrangements. In addition, this business
includes outpatient dispensing and homecare arrangements mainly in the United Kingdom (“U.K.”).  This business provides
traditional prescription pharmaceuticals, non-prescription products and medical services and operates under the Lloyds Pharmacy
brand in Belgium, Ireland, Italy, Sweden and the U.K. In addition, we partner with independent pharmacies under our franchise
program.
6
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Medical-Surgical Solutions Segment:
Our Medical-Surgical Solutions segment delivers medical-supply distribution, logistics, biomedical and other services to
healthcare providers across the alternate-site spectrum. Our more than 200,000 customers include physicians’ offices, surgery
centers, post-acute care facilities, hospital reference labs, home health agencies, and occupational and alternative health sites. We
distribute medical-surgical supplies (such as gloves, needles, syringes and wound care products), infusion pumps, laboratory
equipment and pharmaceuticals. Through a network of distribution centers within the U.S., we offer more than 275,000 products
from national brand manufacturers and McKesson’s own high-quality product line. Through the right mix of products and services,
we help improve efficiencies, profitability and compliance. We also never lose focus on helping customers improve patient and
business outcomes. With 85% of patient visits occurring outside the hospital, each customer has unique needs and challenges. We
develop customized plans to address the product, operational and clinical support needs of our customers, including tackling
reimbursements, reducing administrative burdens, and training and educating clinical staff. We care for our customers, so they can
care for their patients.
Other:
Other primarily consists of the following operating segments and business activities: McKesson Canada, MRxTS and our
equity method investment in Change Healthcare.
McKesson Canada: This business is one of the largest pharmaceutical wholesale and retail distributors in Canada. The
wholesale business delivers their products to retail pharmacies, hospitals, long-term care centers, clinics and institutions in Canada
through a network of 15 distribution centers and provides logistics and distribution services for manufacturers. Beyond wholesale
pharmaceutical logistics and distribution, McKesson Canada provides automation solutions to its retail and hospital customers.
McKesson Canada also provides health information exchange solutions that streamline clinical and administrative communication.
The retail business operates approximately 410 owned pharmacies under the Rexall Health brand in Canada where we provide
patients with greater choice and access, integrated pharmacy care and industry-leading service levels.
MRxTS: This business provides innovative technologies that support retail pharmacies and manufacturers that ultimately
enable patients to fulfill their prescriptions. This business supports our customers, with a comprehensive, expanded portfolio of
solutions designed to help them drive business growth, realize greater business efficiencies, deliver high-quality care, enhance
medication adherence and safety, and more effectively connect with other players in the pharmaceutical supply chain.
Change Healthcare: Our 70% equity ownership interest in Change Healthcare is accounted for by us using the equity method
of accounting. Change Healthcare provides software and analytics, network solutions and technology-enabled services that delivers
wide-ranging financial, operational and clinical benefits to payers, providers and consumers. Change Healthcare Inc., the entity that
owns 30% of the joint venture, filed a registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 15, 2019 and
amended on April 5, 2019 regarding its intent to pursue an initial public offering.
Restructuring, Business Combinations, Investments, Divestitures and Discontinued Operations
We have undertaken additional strategic initiatives in recent years designed to further focus on our core healthcare businesses
and enhance our competitive position. We expect to continue to undertake such strategic initiatives in the future. These initiatives
are detailed in Financial Notes 3, 4, 5, 6 and 7, “Restructuring and Asset Impairment Charges,” “Business Combinations”,
“Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange,” “Divestitures,” and “Discontinued Operations” to the consolidated financial
statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
7
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Competition
We face highly competitive global environments with strong competition from international, national, regional and local full-
line, short-line and specialty distributors, service merchandisers, self-warehousing chain drug stores, manufacturers engaged in
direct distribution, third-party logistics companies and large payer organizations.  In addition, we compete with other service
providers, pharmaceutical and other healthcare manufacturers as well as other potential customers of our businesses, which may
from time-to-time decide to develop, for their own internal needs, supply management capabilities that would otherwise be
provided by our businesses.  Our retail businesses also face competition from various local, regional, national and global retailers,
including chain and independent pharmacies. In all areas, key competitive factors include price, quality of service, breadth of
product lines, innovation and, in some cases, convenience to the customer.
Patents, Trademarks, Copyrights and Licenses
McKesson and its subsidiaries hold patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade secrets related to McKesson products and
services. We pursue patent protection for our innovations, and obtain copyright protection for our original works of authorship,
when such protection is advantageous. Through these efforts, we have developed a portfolio of patents and copyrights in the U.S.
and worldwide. In addition, we have registered or applied to register certain trademarks and service marks in the U.S. and in
foreign countries.
We believe that, in the aggregate, McKesson’s confidential information, patents, copyrights, trademarks and intellectual
property licenses are important to its operations and market position, but we do not consider any of our businesses to be dependent
upon any one patent, copyright, trademark, or trade secret, or any family or families of the same. We cannot guarantee that our
intellectual property portfolio will be sufficient to deter misappropriation, theft, or misuse of our technology, nor that we can
successfully enjoin infringers. We periodically receive notices alleging that our products or services infringe on third party patents
and other intellectual property rights. These claims may result in McKesson entering settlement agreements, paying damages,
discontinuing use or sale of accused products, or ceasing other activities. While the outcome of any litigation or dispute is
inherently uncertain, we do not believe that the resolution of any of these infringement notices would have a material adverse
impact on our results of operation.
We hold inbound licenses for certain intellectual property that is used internally, and in some cases, utilized in McKesson’s
products or services. While it may be necessary in the future to seek or renew licenses relating to various aspects of our products
and services, we believe, based upon past experience and industry practice, such licenses generally can be obtained on
commercially reasonable terms. We believe our operations and products and services are not materially dependent on any single
license or other agreement with any third party.
Other Information about the Business
Customers: During 2019, sales to our ten largest customers, including GPOs accounted for approximately 49.9% of our total
consolidated revenues. Sales to our largest customer, CVS Health (“CVS”), accounted for approximately 19.4% of our total
consolidated revenues. In May 2019, we extended our pharmaceutical distribution relationship with CVS to June 2023. At
March 31, 2019, trade accounts receivable from our ten largest customers were approximately 31.9% of total trade accounts
receivable. Accounts receivable from CVS were approximately 18.4% of total trade accounts receivable. We also have agreements
with GPOs, each of which functions as a purchasing agent on behalf of member hospitals, pharmacies and other healthcare
providers, as well as with government entities and agencies. The accounts receivable balances are with individual members of the
GPOs, and therefore no significant concentration of credit risk exists. Substantially all of these revenues and accounts receivable
are included in our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment.
Suppliers: We obtain pharmaceutical and other products from manufacturers, none of which accounted for more than 6% of
our purchases in 2019. The loss of a supplier could adversely affect our business if alternate sources of supply are unavailable. We
believe that our relationships with our suppliers are generally sound. The ten largest suppliers in 2019 accounted for approximately
42% of our purchases.
8
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Some of our distribution arrangements with the manufacturers provides us compensation based on a percentage of our
purchases. In addition, we have certain distribution arrangements with pharmaceutical manufacturers that include an inflation-based
compensation component whereby we benefit when the manufacturers increase their prices as we sell our existing inventory at the
new higher prices. For these manufacturers, a reduction in the frequency and magnitude of price increases, as well as restrictions in
the amount of inventory available to us, could have an adverse impact on our gross profit margin.
Research and Development: Research and development (“R&D”) expenses were $71 million, $125 million and $341 million
during 2019, 2018 and 2017. R&D expenses were lower in 2019 due to the sale of our Enterprise Information Solutions (“EIS”)
business. R&D costs were lower in 2018 due to the 2017 contribution of the majority of our McKesson Technology Solutions
businesses (“Core MTS Business”) to the Change Healthcare joint venture.
Environmental Regulation: Our operations are subject to regulations under various federal, state, local and foreign laws
concerning the environment, including laws addressing the discharge of pollutants into the air and water, the management and
disposal of hazardous substances and wastes, and the cleanup of contaminated sites. We could incur substantial costs, including
cleanup costs, fines and civil or criminal sanctions and third-party damage or personal injury claims, if in the future we were to
violate or become liable under environmental laws.
We are committed to maintaining compliance with all environmental laws applicable to our operations, products and services
and to reducing our environmental impact across all aspects of our business. We meet this commitment through an environmental
strategy and sustainability program.
We sold our chemical distribution operations in 1987 and retained responsibility for certain environmental obligations.
Agreements with the Environmental Protection Agency and certain states may require environmental assessments and cleanups at
several closed sites. These matters are described further in Financial Note 24, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities,” to the
consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
The liability for environmental remediation and other environmental costs is accrued when the Company considers it probable
and can reasonably estimate the costs. Environmental costs and accruals, including that related to our legacy chemical distribution
operations, are presently not material to our operations or financial position. Although there is no assurance that existing or future
environmental laws applicable to our operations or products will not have a material adverse impact on our operations or financial
condition, we do not currently anticipate material capital expenditures for environmental matters. Other than the expected
expenditures that may be required in connection with our legacy chemical distribution operations, we do not anticipate making
substantial capital expenditures either for environmental issues, or to comply with environmental laws and regulations in the future.
The amount of our capital expenditures for environmental compliance was not material in 2019 and is not expected to be material
in the next year.
Employees: On March 31, 2019, we employed approximately 80,000 employees, including approximately 20,000 part-time
employees.
Financial Information About Foreign and Domestic Operations: Certain financial information relating to foreign and domestic
operations is included in Financial Note 28, “Segments of Business,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K. See “Risk Factors” in Item 1A of Part I below for information regarding risks associated with our
foreign operations.
Forward-Looking Statements
This Annual Report on Form 10-K, including “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations” in Item 7 of Part II of this report and the “Risk Factors” in Item 1A of Part I of this report, contains forward-looking
statements within the meaning of section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended and section 21E of the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934, as amended. Some of these statements can be identified by use of forward-looking words such as “believes,”
“expects,” “anticipates,” “may,” “will,” “should,” “seeks,” “approximately,” “intends,” “plans” or “estimates,” or the negative of
these words, or other comparable terminology. The discussion of financial trends, strategy, plans or intentions may also include
forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ
materially from those projected, anticipated, or implied. Although it is not possible to predict or identify all such risks and
uncertainties, they may include, but are not limited to, the factors discussed in Item 1A of Part I of this report under “Risk Factors.”
9
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
These and other risks and uncertainties are described herein and in other information contained in our publicly available SEC
filings and press releases. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements, which speak only
as of the date such statements were first made. Except to the extent required by federal securities laws, we undertake no obligation
to publicly release the result of any revisions to these forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date
hereof, or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
Item 1A. Risk Factors
The risks described below could have a material adverse impact on our financial position, results of operations, liquidity and
cash flows. Although it is not possible to predict or identify all such risks and uncertainties, they may include, but are not limited to,
the factors discussed below. Our business operations could also be affected by additional factors that are not presently known to us
or that we currently consider not to be material. The reader should not consider this list to be a complete statement of all risks and
uncertainties.
Changes in the United States healthcare industry and regulatory environment could have a material adverse impact on our
results of operations.
Many of our products and services are intended to function within the structure of the healthcare financing and reimbursement
system currently being used in the United States. In recent years, the healthcare industry in the United States has changed
significantly in an effort to enhance efficiencies, reduce costs and improve patient outcomes. These changes have included cuts in
Medicare and Medicaid reimbursement levels, changes in the basis for payments, shifting away from fee-for-service and towards
value-based payments and risk-sharing models, increases in the use of managed care and consolidation in the healthcare industry.
We expect the healthcare industry in the United States to continue to change and for healthcare delivery models to evolve in the
future.
Changes in the healthcare industry’s or our pharmaceutical suppliers’ pricing, selling, inventory, distribution or supply policies
or practices could significantly reduce our revenues and net income. Additionally, if we experience disruptions in our supply of
generic drugs, our margins could be adversely affected. Due to the diverse range of healthcare supply management and healthcare
information technology products and services that we offer, such changes could have a material adverse impact on our results of
operations, while not affecting some of our competitors who offer a narrower range of products and services.
The majority of our U.S. pharmaceutical distribution business agreements with manufacturers are structured to ensure that we
are appropriately and predictably compensated for the services we provide. Failure to successfully renew these contracts in a timely
and favorable manner could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations. Certain distribution business agreements
with manufacturers continue to have pharmaceutical price inflation as a component of our compensation. Consequently, our results
of operations could be adversely affected if the frequency or magnitude of pharmaceutical price increases or decreases, which we
do not control. In addition, we distribute generic pharmaceuticals, which can be subject to both price deflation and price inflation.
Our generic pharmaceutical sourcing program has benefited from sourcing through our joint venture with Walmart, Inc.,
ClarusONE. If ClarusONE does not continue to be successful, our margins could be adversely affected. Our U.S. Pharmaceutical
and Specialty Solutions segment experienced weaker pharmaceutical pricing trends over the last three years. Continued volatility in
the availability, pricing trends or reimbursement of these generic drugs, or significant fluctuations in the nature, frequency and
magnitude of generic pharmaceutical launches, could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations. Additionally, any
future changes in branded and generics drug pricing could be significantly different than our projections.
Generic drug manufacturers are increasingly challenging the validity or enforceability of patents on branded pharmaceutical
products. During the pendency of these legal challenges, a generics manufacturer may begin manufacturing and selling a generic
version of the branded product prior to the final resolution of its legal challenge over the branded product’s patent. To the extent we
source, contract manufacture, and distribute such generic products, the brand-name company could assert infringement claims
against us. While we generally obtain indemnification against such claims from generic manufacturers as a condition of distributing
their products, there can be no assurances that these rights will be adequate or sufficient to protect us.
The healthcare industry is highly regulated, and further regulation of our distribution businesses and technology products and
services could impose increased costs, negatively impact our profit margins and the profit margins of our customers, delay the
introduction or implementation of our new products, or otherwise negatively impact our business and expose the Company to
litigation and regulatory investigations.
10
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Healthcare Fraud: We are subject to extensive and frequently changing local, state and federal laws and regulations relating to
healthcare fraud, waste and abuse. Local, state and federal governments continue to strengthen their position and scrutiny over
practices involving fraud, waste and abuse affecting Medicare, Medicaid and other government healthcare programs. Our
relationships with pharmaceutical and medical-surgical product manufacturers and healthcare providers, as well as our provision of
products and services to government entities, subject our business to laws and regulations on fraud and abuse, which among other
things: (1) prohibit persons from soliciting, offering, receiving or paying any remuneration in order to induce the referral of a
patient for treatment or to induce the ordering or purchasing of items or services that are in any way paid for by Medicare,
Medicaid or other government-sponsored healthcare programs; (2) impose a number of restrictions upon referring physicians and
providers of designated health services under Medicare and Medicaid programs; and (3) prohibit the knowing submission of a false
or fraudulent claim for payment to, and knowing retention of an overpayment by, a federal healthcare program such as Medicare
and Medicaid. Many of the regulations applicable to us, including those relating to marketing incentives, are vague or indefinite
and have not been interpreted by the courts. The regulations may be interpreted or applied by a prosecutorial, regulatory, or judicial
authority in a manner that could require us to make changes in our operations. If we fail to comply with applicable laws and
regulations, we could be subject to federal or state government investigations or qui tam actions, and could become liable for
damages and suffer civil and criminal penalties, including the loss of licenses or our ability to participate in Medicare, Medicaid
and other federal and state healthcare programs.
Reimbursements: Our profit margins and the profit margins of our customers may be adversely affected by laws and
regulations reducing reimbursement rates (including government rates) for pharmaceuticals, medical treatments and related
services, imposing additional requirements on healthcare entities, or changing the methodology by which reimbursement levels are
determined.
For example, on October 25, 2018, the Department of Health & Human Services (“HHS”) announced its intent to propose an
International Pricing Index (“IPI”) payment model to reduce government payments for Medicare Part B drugs to levels more
closely aligned with prices paid in other countries. If proposed and finalized, the far-reaching model could reduce Part B drug
reimbursement by 30 percent between 2020 and 2025. The model would eliminate the “buy and bill” model and reintroduce the
Competitive Acquisition Program (“CAP”). This could allow private vendors (including non-wholesaler entities) to procure and
distribute drugs to physicians and hospitals, while Medicare would pay the vendor for the included drugs based on the target price
driven by the IPI. Also, on January 31, 2019, the HHS Office of Inspector General released the Removal of Safe Harbor Protection
for Rebates to Plans or Pharmacy Benefit Managers (“PBM”) Involving Prescription Pharmaceuticals and Creation of New Safe
Harbor Protection Proposed Rule. If finalized, the proposal would create significant change in the pharmaceutical value chain as
manufacturers, PBM, managed care organizations and other industry stakeholders look to implement new transactional flows and
adapt their business models. Additionally, federal and state lawmakers are increasingly exploring other policy proposals to reduce
drug price, including price transparency measurers and drug reimportation.
There can be no assurance that the preceding changes would not have a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
Operating, Security and Licensure Standards: We are subject to the operating and security standards of the Drug Enforcement
Administration (“DEA”), the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (“FDA”), various state boards of pharmacy, state health
departments, HHS, the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (“CMS”) and other comparable agencies. Certain of our
businesses may be required to register for permits and/or licenses with, and comply with operating and security standards of, the
DEA, FDA, HHS, CMS, various state boards of pharmacy, state health departments and/or comparable state agencies as well as
foreign agencies and certain accrediting bodies, depending upon the type of operations and location of product development,
manufacture, distribution, and sale. For example, we are required to hold valid DEA and state-level registrations and licenses, meet
various security and operating standards and comply with the Controlled Substances Act and its accompanying regulations
governing the sale, marketing, packaging, holding, distribution, and disposal of controlled substances.
As part of these operating, security and licensure standards, we regularly receive requests for information and occasionally
subpoenas from government authorities. In some instances, these can lead to monetary penalties and/or license revocation. In
January 2017, we reached an agreement with the DEA and Department of Justice pursuant to which we paid $150 million to settle
all potential administrative and civil claims relating to investigations about the Company’s suspicious order reporting practices for
controlled substances. The DEA suspended, on a staggered basis for limited periods of time, McKesson’s DEA registrations to
distribute certain controlled substances from four McKesson distribution centers. As of March 31, 2019, staggered suspensions
have expired for two DEA registrations and two remain applicable.
11
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Although we have enhanced our procedures to ensure compliance, there can be no assurance that a regulatory agency or
tribunal would conclude that our operations are compliant with applicable laws and regulations. In addition, there can be no
assurance that we will be able to maintain or renew existing permits, licenses or any other regulatory approvals or obtain without
significant delay future permits, licenses or other approvals needed for the operation of our businesses. Any noncompliance by us
with applicable laws and regulations or the failure to maintain, renew or obtain necessary permits and licenses could lead to
litigation and have a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
Pedigree Tracking: There have been increasing efforts by Congress and state and federal agencies, including state boards of
pharmacy and departments of health and the FDA, to regulate the pharmaceutical distribution system in order to prevent the
introduction of counterfeit, adulterated and/or mislabeled drugs into the pharmaceutical distribution system, otherwise known as
pedigree tracking. In November 2013, Congress passed and the President signed into law the Drug Quality and Security Act
(“DQSA”). The DQSA establishes federal standards requiring supply-chain stakeholders to participate in a prescription drug track
and trace system. Track and trace began in 2015 at the lot-level and evolves to a serialized level electronic, interoperable system by
November 2023. The law also preempts state drug pedigree requirements. The DSQA also establishes new requirements for drug
wholesale distributors and third-party logistics providers, including licensing requirements in states that had not previously licensed
such entities.
In addition, the Food and Drug Administration Amendments Act of 2007 requires the FDA to establish standards and identify
and validate effective technologies for the purpose of securing the pharmaceutical supply chain against counterfeit drugs. These
standards may include track and trace or authentication technologies, such as radio frequency identification devices, 2D data matrix
barcodes and other similar technologies. On March 26, 2010, the FDA released the Serialized Numerical Identifier (“SNI”)
guidance for manufacturers who serialize pharmaceutical packaging. We expect to be able to accommodate these SNI regulations in
our distribution operations. The DQSA and other pedigree tracking laws and regulations could increase the overall regulatory
burden and costs associated with our pharmaceutical distribution business, and could have a material adverse impact on our results
of operations.
Privacy: There are numerous federal and state laws and regulations related to the privacy and security of personal information.
In particular, regulations promulgated pursuant to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (“HIPAA”)
establish privacy and security standards that limit the use and disclosure of individually identifiable health information (known as
“protected health information”) and require the implementation of administrative, physical and technological safeguards to protect
the privacy of protected health information and ensure the confidentiality, integrity and availability of electronic protected health
information. We are directly subject to certain provisions of the regulations as a “Business Associate” through our relationships
with customers. We are also directly subject to the HIPAA privacy and security regulations as a “Covered Entity” with respect to
our operations as a healthcare clearinghouse, specialty pharmacy and medical surgical supply business.
The privacy regulations established under HIPAA also provide patients with rights related to understanding and controlling
how their protected health information is used and disclosed. To the extent permitted by applicable privacy regulations and our
contracts with our customers, we may use and disclose protected health information to perform our services and for other limited
purposes, such as creating de-identified information. Other uses and disclosures, such as marketing communications, require
written authorization from the individual or must meet an exception specified under the privacy regulations. Determining whether
protected health information has been sufficiently de-identified to comply with the HIPAA privacy standards and our contractual
obligations may require complex factual and statistical analyses and may be subject to interpretation.
If we are unable to properly protect the privacy and security of protected health information entrusted to us, we could be found
to have breached our contracts with our customers. Further, if we fail to comply with applicable HIPAA privacy and security
standards, we could face civil and criminal penalties. HHS performs compliance audits of Covered Entities and Business Associates
and enforces the HIPAA privacy and security standards. HHS has become an increasingly active regulator and has signaled its
intention to continue this trend. HHS has the discretion to impose penalties without being required to attempt to resolve violations
through informal means, such as implementing a corrective action plan. HHS enforcement activity can result in financial liability
and reputational harm, and responses to such enforcement activity can consume significant internal resources. In addition to
enforcement by HHS, state attorney generals are authorized to bring civil actions seeking either injunctions or damages in response
to violations that threaten the privacy of state residents. Although we have implemented and maintained policies and processes to
assist us in complying with these regulations and our contractual obligations, we cannot provide assurance regarding how these
regulations will be interpreted, enforced or applied to our operations. In addition to the risks associated with enforcement activities
and potential contractual liabilities, our ongoing efforts to comply with evolving laws and regulations at the federal and state level,
including the California Consumer Protection Act, which becomes effective in 2020, might also require us to make costly system
purchases and/or modifications from time to time.
12
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Healthcare Reform:    The Affordable Care Act (“ACA”) significantly expanded health insurance coverage to uninsured
Americans and changed the way healthcare is financed by both governmental and private payers. While certain provisions of the
ACA took effect immediately, others have delayed effective dates or require further rulemaking action or regulatory guidance by
governmental agencies to implement and/or finalize (e.g. nondiscrimination in health programs and activities, excise tax on high-
cost employer-sponsored health coverage). Further, as a result of the November 2016 U.S. presidential election and the November
2018 midterm election, there are continued uncertainties associated with efforts to change or repeal certain provisions of the ACA
as well as moves to achieve universal healthcare coverage. While there is currently a substantial lack of clarity around the
likelihood, timing and details of any such policies and reforms, such policies and reforms may have a material adverse impact on
our results of operations.
Our foreign operations subject us to a number of operating, economic, political and regulatory risks that may have a material
adverse impact on our financial position and results of operations.
We have operations based in, and we source and contract manufacture pharmaceutical and medical-surgical products in, a
number of foreign countries. Moreover, in Europe, McKesson Europe AG (“McKesson Europe”), formerly known as Celesio AG,
operates as a wholesale and retail company and provider of logistics and services to the pharmaceutical and healthcare sector.
Our foreign operations expose us to a number of risks including changes in trade protection laws, policies and measures and
other regulatory requirements affecting trade and investment; changes in licensing regimes for pharmacies; unexpected regulatory,
social, political, or economic changes in a specific country or region such as the reduction of reimbursement rates within the
National Health Service in the United Kingdom (“U.K.”); changes in intellectual property, privacy and data protection;
import/export regulations and trade sanctions in both the United States and foreign countries and difficulties in staffing and
managing foreign operations. For example, the Falsified Medicines Directive became operational in most European Union (“EU”)
countries on February 9, 2019 and required implementing safety features for medicines, including a unique identifier (a two-
dimension barcode) and an anti-tampering device on outer packaging. Political changes, labor strikes, acts of war or terrorism and
natural disasters, some of which may be disruptive, can interfere with our supply chain, our customers and all of our activities in a
particular location.
In June 2016, voters in the U.K. approved a referendum to withdraw the U.K.'s membership from the EU, commonly referred
to as "Brexit". In March 2017, the U.K. government officially gave notice to leave, starting a two-year negotiation process. The
resulting Withdrawal Agreement was intended to ensure continuity, as the U.K. could remain a de facto member until the end of
2020, during which time the two sides could negotiate their future political and trade relations. However, the U.K. legislature has
declined to ratify the Withdrawal Agreement, and no alternative agreement has been negotiated to govern the withdrawal of the
U.K. from the EU. The U.K. and the EU agreed to an extension of the deadline for withdrawal until October 31, 2019, although the
U.K. could leave the EU sooner than that date if the Withdrawal Agreement is ratified, or if the parties reach an alternative
agreement governing the withdrawal of the U.K. from the EU. If no agreement is reached and the U.K. leaves the EU after the
October 31, 2019 deadline, significant trade barriers would exist between the EU and the U.K.
We have operations in the U.K. and the EU, and as a result, we face risks associated with the potential uncertainty and
disruptions that may lead up to and follow Brexit, including with respect to volatility in exchange rates and interest rates and
potential material changes to the regulatory regime applicable to our operations in the U.K. Brexit could adversely affect European
or worldwide political, regulatory, economic or market conditions and could contribute to instability in global political institutions,
regulatory agencies and financial markets. For example, depending on the terms of Brexit, the U.K. could also lose access to the
single EU market and to the global trade deals negotiated by the EU on behalf of its members. Disruptions and uncertainty caused
by Brexit may also cause our clients to closely monitor their costs and reduce their spending budget on our solutions and services.
Any of these effects of Brexit, and others we cannot anticipate or that may evolve over time, could adversely affect our business,
results of operations and financial condition.
13
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
In addition, foreign operations are also subject to risks of violations of laws prohibiting improper payments and bribery,
including the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, the U.K. Bribery Act and similar regulations in foreign jurisdictions. The U.K.
Bribery Act, for example, prohibits both domestic and international bribery, as well as bribery across both private and public
sectors. An organization that fails to prevent bribery committed by anyone associated with the organization can be charged under
the U.K. Bribery Act unless the organization can establish the defense of having implemented adequate procedures to prevent
bribery. Failure to comply with these laws could subject us to civil and criminal penalties that could have a material adverse impact
on our financial position and results of operations.
We also may experience difficulties and delays inherent in sourcing products and contract manufacturing from foreign
countries, including but not limited to: (1) difficulties in complying with the requirements of applicable federal, state and local
governmental authorities in the United States and of foreign regulatory authorities; (2) inability to increase production capacity
commensurate with demand or the failure to predict market demand; (3) other manufacturing or distribution problems including
changes in types of products produced, limits to manufacturing capacity due to regulatory requirements, physical limitations, or
scarce or inadequate resources that could impact continuous supply; and (4) damage to our reputation due to real or perceived
quality issues. For example, the FDA has conducted investigations and banned certain generics manufacturers from selling certain
raw materials and drug ingredients in the U.S. from overseas plants due to quality issues. Difficulties in manufacturing or access to
raw materials could result in production shutdowns, product shortages and other similar delays in product manufacturing that could
have a material adverse impact on our financial position and results of operations.
Changes in the Canadian healthcare industry and regulatory environment could have a material adverse impact on our results
of operations.
Provincial governments in Canada provide partial funding for the purchase of pharmaceuticals and independently regulate the
sale and reimbursement of drugs. Provincial governments in Canada have introduced significant changes in recent years in an effort
to reduce the costs of publicly funded health programs. For instance, to reduce the cost for taxpayers, provincial governments have
taken and will continue to take steps to reform the rules regarding the sale of generic drugs. These changes include increased
powers of investigation, reporting and enforcement for provincial regulatory agencies, the significant lowering of prices for generic
pharmaceuticals and, in some provinces, changes to the allowable amounts of professional allowances paid to pharmacists by
generic manufacturers and the tendering of generic molecules on provincial drug formularies. These reforms may adversely affect
the distribution of drugs as well as the pricing for prescription drugs for the Company’s operations in Canada. Additional provinces
have implemented or are considering similar changes, which would also lower pharmaceutical pricing and service fees.
Individually or in combination, such changes in the Canadian healthcare environment may significantly reduce our Canadian
revenue and operating profit.
General European economic conditions, together with austerity measures being taken by certain European governments, could
have a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
A slowdown within the European economy could affect our business in Europe by reducing the prices our customers may be
able or willing to pay for our products and services. A slowdown may also reduce the demand for our products. Either of these
could result in a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
In addition, in many European countries the government provides or subsidizes healthcare to consumers and regulates
pharmaceutical prices, patient eligibility, and reimbursement levels to control costs for the government-sponsored healthcare
system. In recent years, in response to the recessionary environment and financial crisis in Europe, a number of European
governments, including the government in the U.K. in the past year, have announced or implemented austerity measures to reduce
healthcare spending and constrain overall government expenditures. These measures, which include efforts aimed at reforming
healthcare coverage and reducing healthcare costs, continue to exert pressure on the pricing of and reimbursement timelines for
pharmaceuticals and may cause our customers to purchase fewer of our products and services and reduce the prices they are willing
to pay.
Countries with existing healthcare-related austerity measures may impose additional laws, regulations, or requirements on the
healthcare industry. In addition, European governments that have not yet imposed healthcare-related austerity measures may
impose them in the future. New austerity measures may be similar to or vary from existing austerity measures and could have a
material adverse impact on our results of operations.
14
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Changes in the foreign regulatory environment regarding privacy and data protection regulations could have a material adverse
impact on our results of operations.
Personal data is highly regulated in many other countries in which we operate. In addition, some of the data that we process,
store and transmit may travel outside of the United States. In Europe, we are subject to the General Data Protection Regulation
(“GDPR”) and in Canada, we are subject to the Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“PIPEDA”). The
GDPR and PIPEDA impose restrictions on the collection and use of personal data that, in some respects, are more stringent, and
impose more significant burdens on subject businesses, than current privacy standards in the United States. The EU member state
regulations establish several obligations that organizations must follow with respect to use of personal data, including a prohibition
on the transfer of personal information from the EU to other countries whose laws do not protect personal data to an adequate level
of privacy or security. Other countries have enacted or are considering enacting data localization laws that require certain data to
stay within their borders. We may also face audits or investigations by one or more foreign government agencies relating to our
compliance with these regulations that could result in the imposition of penalties or fines. The costs of compliance with, and other
burdens imposed by, such laws, regulations and policies that are applicable to us may limit the use and adoption of our products and
solutions and could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
Our results of operations, which are stated in U.S. dollars, could be adversely impacted by fluctuations in foreign currency
exchange rates.
We conduct our business worldwide in U.S. dollars and the functional currencies of our foreign subsidiaries, including Euro,
British pound sterling and Canadian dollars. Changes in foreign currency exchange rates could have a significant adverse impact on
our financial results that are reported in U.S. dollars. We are also exposed to foreign currency exchange rate risk related to our
foreign subsidiaries, including intercompany loans denominated in non-functional currencies.
We may from time to time enter into foreign currency contracts or other derivative instruments intended to hedge a portion of
our foreign currency exchange rate risks. Additionally, we may use foreign currency borrowings to hedge some of our foreign
currency exchange rate risks. These hedging activities may not completely offset the adverse financial effects of unfavorable
movements in foreign currency exchange rates during the time the hedges are in place.
Our business could be hindered if we are unable to complete and integrate acquisitions successfully.
An element of our strategy is to identify, pursue and consummate acquisitions that either expand or complement our business.
Integration of acquisitions involves a number of significant risks, including the diversion of management’s attention to the
assimilation of the operations of businesses we have acquired; difficulties in the integration of operations and systems; the
realization of potential operating synergies; the assimilation and retention of the personnel of the acquired companies; accounting,
regulatory or compliance issues that could arise, including internal control over financial reporting; and challenges retaining the
customers of the combined businesses. Further, acquisitions may have a material adverse impact on our operating results if
unanticipated expenses or charges to earnings were to occur, including unanticipated depreciation and amortization expenses over
the useful lives of certain assets acquired, as well as costs related to potential impairment charges, assumed litigation and unknown
liabilities. In addition, we may potentially require additional financing in order to fund future acquisitions, which may or may not
be attainable and is subject to potential volatility in the credit markets. If we are unable to successfully complete and integrate
strategic acquisitions in a timely manner, our business and our growth strategies could be negatively affected.
Achieving the anticipated benefits of any acquisition is subject to a number of risks and uncertainties, including foreign
exchange fluctuations, challenges of managing new domestic or international operations, and whether we can ensure continued
performance or market growth of products and services. The integration process is subject to a number of uncertainties and no
assurance can be given that the anticipated benefits of any transaction will be realized or, if realized, the timing of its realization. It
is possible that the integration process could take longer than anticipated, and could result in the loss of employees, the disruption
of each company’s ongoing businesses, processes and systems, or inconsistencies in standards, controls, procedures, practices,
policies and compensation arrangements. Any of these events could adversely affect our ability to achieve the anticipated benefits
of an acquisition and could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
Any significant diversion of management’s attention away from the ongoing businesses, and any difficulties encountered in the
acquisition, transition and integration process, could adversely affect our financial results. Moreover, the failure to achieve the
anticipated benefits of a transaction could result in increased costs or decreases in the amount of expected revenues, and could
adversely affect our future business, financial position and operating results. Events outside of our control, including changes in
regulations and laws, as well as economic trends, could also adversely affect our ability to realize the expected benefits from a
transaction.
15
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Our results of operations could be impacted if our investment in Change Healthcare fails to perform as expected.
On March 1, 2017, McKesson contributed the majority of our Core MTS Business and Change contributed substantially all of
its businesses, excluding its pharmacy switch and prescription routing businesses, to form a joint venture, Change Healthcare. The
purpose of the transaction was to create a new healthcare information technology company, bringing together the complementary
strengths of the contributed assets to provide software and analytics, network solutions and technology-enabled services that will
help customers obtain actionable insights, exchange mission-critical information, control costs, optimize revenue opportunities,
increase cash flow and effectively navigate the shift to value-based healthcare. Change Healthcare is jointly governed by McKesson
and Change. Operating a business under joint governance of unaffiliated, controlling members could lead to conflicts of interest or
deadlocks on important and time-sensitive operational, financial or strategic decisions, and will require additional organizational
formalities as well as time-consuming procedures for sharing information and making decisions. If we are unable to manage our
joint venture relationship and to realize the strategic and financial benefits that we expect, including an initial public offering of
Change Healthcare Inc., such inability to manage the relationship or realize benefits may have a material adverse impact on our
results of operations.
Our business and results of operations could be impacted if we fail to manage and complete divestitures.
We regularly evaluate our portfolio in order to determine whether an asset or business may no longer help us meet our
objectives. When we decide to sell assets or a business, we may encounter difficulty in finding buyers or alternative exit strategies
on acceptable terms in a timely manner, which could delay the achievement of our strategic objectives. We may also experience
greater dissynergies than expected, and the impact of the divestiture on our revenue growth may be larger than projected. After
reaching an agreement with a buyer, we are subject to satisfaction of pre-closing conditions as well as to necessary regulatory and
governmental approvals, which, if not satisfied or obtained, may prevent us from completing the sale. Dispositions may also
involve continued financial involvement in the divested business, such as through continuing equity ownership, guarantees,
indemnities or other financial obligations. Under these arrangements, performance by the divested businesses or other conditions
outside of our control could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
We are subject to legal and regulatory proceedings that could have a material adverse impact on our financial position and
results of operations.
From time to time and in the ordinary course of our business, we and certain of our subsidiaries may become involved in
various legal and regulatory proceedings involving false claims, healthcare fraud and abuse, antitrust, class actions, commercial,
employment, environmental, intellectual property, licensing, tort and other various claims. For example, the Company is a
defendant in many cases alleging claims related to the distribution of controlled substances to pharmacies, often together with other
pharmaceutical wholesale distributors and pharmaceutical manufacturers and retail pharmacy chains named as defendants. The
Company has been served with many complaints, often brought by governmental entities (including counties and municipalities)
that allege violations of controlled substance laws and various other statutes in addition to common law claims, including
negligence and public nuisance, and seek monetary damages and equitable relief. Some states and other governmental entities have
indicated that they are considering filing similar suits. All such legal proceedings are inherently unpredictable, and the outcome can
result in excessive verdicts and/or injunctive relief that may affect how we operate our business or we may enter into settlements of
claims for monetary payments. In some cases, substantial non-economic remedies or punitive damages may be sought. For some
complaints filed against the Company, we are currently unable to estimate the amount of possible losses that might be incurred
should these legal proceedings be resolved against the Company.
The outcome of litigation and other legal matters is always uncertain and outcomes that are not justified by the evidence or
existing law can occur. The Company believes that it has valid defenses to the legal matters pending against it and is defending
itself vigorously. Nevertheless, it is possible that resolution of one or any combination of more than one legal matter could result in
a material adverse impact on our financial position or results of operations.
Litigation is costly, time-consuming and disruptive to normal business operations. The defense of these matters could also
result in continued diversion of our management’s time and attention away from business operations, which could also harm our
business. Even if these matters are not resolved against us, the uncertainty and expense associated with unresolved legal
proceedings could harm our business and reputation. It is possible that resolution of one or any combination of more than one legal
matter could result in a material adverse impact on our financial position or results of operations.
16
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Competition and industry consolidation may erode our profit.
Our businesses face a highly competitive global environment with strong competition from international, national, regional and
local full-line, short-line and specialty distributors, service merchandisers, self-warehousing chain drug stores, manufacturers
engaged in direct distribution, third-party logistics companies and large payer organizations. In addition, our businesses face
competition from various other service providers and from pharmaceutical and other healthcare manufacturers as well as other
potential customers, which may from time-to-time decide to develop, for their own internal needs, supply management capabilities
that would otherwise be provided by our businesses. In all areas, key competitive factors include price, quality of service, breadth
of product lines, innovation and, in some cases, convenience to the customer.
In addition, in recent years, the healthcare industry has been subject to increasing consolidation. As a result, a small number of
very large pharmaceutical suppliers could control a significant share of the market. Accordingly, we could depend on fewer
suppliers for our products and therefore we may be less able to negotiate price terms with suppliers. Many of our customers,
including healthcare organizations that purchase our products and services, have also consolidated to create larger enterprises with
greater market power. If this consolidation trend continues among our customers, suppliers and competitors, it could reduce the
number of market participants and give the resulting enterprises greater bargaining power, which may lead to erosion of the prices
for our products and services. It would also increase counter-party credit risk as the number of market participants decreases. In
addition, when our customers combine, they often consolidate infrastructure including IT systems, which in turn may erode the
diversity of our customer and revenue base.
Our McKesson Prescription Technology Solutions business experiences substantial competition from many companies,
including other software services firms, consulting firms, shared service vendors, certain hospitals and hospital groups, payers, care
management organizations, hardware vendors and internet-based companies with technology applicable to the healthcare industry.
Competition varies in size from small to large companies, in geographical coverage and in scope and breadth of products and
services offered.
These competitive pressures and industry consolidation could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
A material reduction in purchases or the loss of a large customer or group purchasing organization, as well as substantial
defaults in payment by a large customer or group purchasing organization, could have a material adverse impact on our
financial position and results of operations.
In recent years, a significant portion of our revenue growth has been with a limited number of large customers. During 2019,
sales to our ten largest customers, including group purchasing organizations (“GPOs”) accounted for approximately 49.9% of our
total consolidated revenues. Sales to our largest customer, CVS Health (“CVS”), accounted for approximately 19.4% of our total
consolidated revenues. At March 31, 2019, trade accounts receivable from our ten largest customers were approximately 31.9% of
total trade accounts receivable. Accounts receivable from CVS were approximately 18.4% of total trade accounts receivable. As a
result, our sales and credit concentration is significant. We also have agreements with GPOs, each of which functions as a
purchasing agent on behalf of member hospitals, pharmacies and other healthcare providers, as well as with government entities
and agencies. A material default in payment, a material reduction in purchases from these or any other large customers, or the loss
of a large customer or GPO could have a material adverse impact on our financial position, results of operations and liquidity.
We generally sell our products and services to customers on credit that is short-term in nature and unsecured. Any adverse
change in general economic conditions can adversely reduce sales to our customers, affect consumer buying practices or cause our
customers to delay or be unable to pay accounts receivable owed to us, which may in turn materially reduce our revenue growth
and cause a material decrease in our profitability and cash flow. Further, interest rate fluctuations and changes in capital market
conditions may also affect our customers’ ability to obtain credit to finance their business under acceptable terms, which in turn
may materially reduce our revenue growth and cause a decrease in our profitability.
17
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Contracts with foreign and domestic government entities and their agencies pose additional risks relating to future funding and
compliance.
Contracts with foreign and domestic government entities and their agencies are subject to various uncertainties, restrictions and
regulations, including oversight audits by various government authorities. Government contracts also are exposed to uncertainties
associated with funding. Contracts with the U.S. federal government, for example, are subject to the uncertainties of Congressional
funding. Governments are typically under no obligation to maintain funding at any specific level, and funds for government
programs may even be eliminated. As a result, our government clients may terminate our contracts for convenience or decide not to
renew our contracts with little or no prior notice. The loss of such contracts could have a material adverse impact on our results of
operations.
In addition, because government contracts are subject to specific procurement regulations and a variety of other socio-
economic requirements, we must comply with such requirements. For example, for contracts with the U.S. federal government,
with certain exceptions, we must comply with the Federal Acquisition Regulation, the U.S. False Claims Act, the Procurement
Integrity Act, the Buy American Act and the Trade Agreements Act. We must also comply with various other domestic and foreign
government regulations and requirements as well as various statutes related to employment practices, environmental protection,
recordkeeping and accounting. These regulations and requirements affect how we transact business with our clients and, in some
instances, impose additional costs on our business operations. Government contracts also contain terms that expose us to higher
levels of risk and potential liability than non-government contracts.
We also are subject to government audits, investigations, and oversight proceedings. For example, government agencies
routinely review and audit government contractors to determine whether contractors are complying with specific contractual or
legal requirements. If we violate these rules or regulations, fail to comply with a contractual or other requirement, or do not satisfy
an audit, a variety of penalties can be imposed by a government including monetary damages and criminal and civil penalties. In
addition, any of our government contracts could be terminated or we could be suspended or debarred from all government contract
work. The occurrence of any of these actions could harm our reputation and could have a material adverse impact on our results of
operations.
Our future results could be materially affected by public health issues whether occurring in the United States or abroad.
Public health issues, whether occurring in the United States or abroad, could disrupt our operations, disrupt the operations of
suppliers or customers, or have a broader adverse impact on consumer spending and confidence levels that would negatively affect
our suppliers and customers. We have developed contingency plans to address infectious disease scenarios and the potential impact
on our operations, and we will continue to update these plans as necessary. However, there can be no assurance that these plans will
be effective in eliminating the negative impact of any such diseases on the Company’s operating results. We may be required to
suspend operations in some or all of our locations, which could have a material adverse impact on our financial position and results
of operations.
We rely on sophisticated computer systems to perform our business operations. Although we, our customers, our strategic
partners and our external service providers use a variety of security measures to protect our and their computer systems, a
failure or compromise of our, our customers’, our strategic partners’ or our external service providers’ computer systems from a
cyberattack, natural disaster, or malfunction may result in material adverse operational and financial consequences.
Our business relies on the secure electronic transmission, storage, and hosting of sensitive information, including protected
health information and other types of personal information, confidential financial information, proprietary information, and other
sensitive information relating to our customers, company and workforce. We routinely process, store and transmit large amounts of
data in our operations, including sensitive personal information, protected health information, financial information, and
confidential information relating to our business or third parties. Additionally, we outsource some important IT functions to external
service providers worldwide.
Our industry is subject to various evolving federal, state and international data and security laws and regulations, which impose
operational costs to achieve compliance. Any failure to comply with these laws and regulations could result in regulatory
enforcement activity and the imposition of fines and other costs. In addition, compliance with these requirements could require
changes in business practices, complicate our operations, and increase our oversight needs.
18
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
The constant evolution of cyberattacks has caused us to spend more time and money to deal with increasingly sophisticated
attacks. Despite our implementation of a variety of physical, technical and administrative security measures, our, our customers’
and our external service providers’ computer systems could be subject to cyberattacks and unauthorized access, such as physical
and electronic break-ins or unauthorized tampering. Like other global companies, we and our customers have experienced threats to
data and systems, including malware and ransomware attacks, unauthorized access, system failures, user errors and disruptions.
A failure or compromise of our, our customers’, our strategic partners’ or our external service providers’ computer systems may
result in business disruption or jeopardize the sensitive information processed, stored, and transmitted through such computer
systems. Such an event may result in significant damage to our reputation, financial losses, litigation, increased costs, regulatory
penalties, notification costs, remediation expenses, customer attrition, brand impairment, or other business harm. These risks may
increase in the future as we continue to expand our internet and mobile strategies and to build an integrated digital enterprise.
We could experience losses or liability not covered by insurance.
In order to provide prompt and complete service to our major customers, we maintain significant product inventory at certain
of our distribution centers. While we seek to maintain property insurance coverage in amounts sufficient for our business, there can
be no assurance that our property insurance will be adequate or available on acceptable terms. One or more large casualty losses
caused by fire, earthquake or other natural disaster in excess of our coverage limits could have a material adverse impact on our
results of operations.
Our business exposes us to risks that are inherent in the distribution, manufacturing, dispensing and administration of
pharmaceuticals and medical-surgical supplies, the provision of ancillary services, the conduct of our payer businesses and the
provision of products that assist clinical decision making and relate to patient medical histories and treatment plans. If customers or
individuals assert liability claims against our products and/or services, any ensuing litigation, regardless of outcome, could result in
a substantial cost to us, divert management’s attention from operations and decrease market acceptance of our products. We attempt
to limit our liability to customers by contract; however, the limitations of liability set forth in the contracts may not be enforceable
or may not otherwise protect us from liability for damages. Additionally, we may be subject to claims that are not explicitly covered
by contract, such as a claim directly by a patient. We also maintain general liability coverage; however, this coverage may not
continue to be available on acceptable terms, may not be available in sufficient amounts to cover one or more large claims against
us and may include larger self-insured retentions or exclusions for certain products. In addition, the insurer might disclaim coverage
as to any future claim. A successful product or professional liability claim not fully covered by our insurance could have a material
adverse impact on our results of operations.
Transactions like our acquisitions of McKesson Europe and Rexall Health expose us to additional risks related to providing
pharmacy services. Pharmacies are exposed to risks inherent in the packaging and distribution of pharmaceuticals and other
healthcare products, such as with respect to improper filling of prescriptions, labeling of prescriptions, adequacy of warnings,
unintentional distribution of counterfeit drugs and expiration of drugs. Although we maintain liability insurance, the coverage may
not be adequate to protect us against future claims. If our insurance coverage proves to be inadequate or unavailable, or we suffer
reputational harm as a result of an error or omission, it could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
Proprietary protections may not be adequate, and products may be found to infringe the rights of third parties.
We rely on a combination of trade secret, patent, copyright and trademark laws, nondisclosure and other contractual provisions
and technical measures to protect our proprietary rights in our products and solutions. There can be no assurance that these
protections will be adequate or that our competitors will not independently develop products or services that are equivalent or
superior to ours. In addition, despite protective measures, we may be subject to unauthorized use of our technology due to copying,
reverse-engineering or other infringement. Although we believe that our products and services do not infringe the proprietary rights
of third parties, from time to time third parties have asserted infringement claims against us, and there can be no assurance that
third parties will not assert infringement claims against us in the future. If we were found to be infringing others’ rights, we may be
required to pay substantial damage awards and forced to develop non-infringing products or services, obtain a license or cease
selling or using the products or services that contain the infringing elements. Additionally, we may find it necessary to initiate
litigation to protect our trade secrets, to enforce our patent, copyright and trademark rights and to determine the scope and validity
of the proprietary rights of others. These types of litigation can be costly and time consuming. These litigation expenses, damage
payments or costs of developing replacement products or services could have a material adverse impact on our results of
operations.
19
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
System errors or failures of our products or services to conform to specifications could cause unforeseen liabilities or injury,
harm our reputation and have a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
The software and technology services that we sell or operate are complex. As with complex systems offered by others, our
software and technology services may contain errors, especially when first introduced. For example, some of our systems are
intended to provide information to healthcare professionals in the course of delivering patient care. Therefore, users of our software
and technology services have a greater sensitivity to errors than the general market for software products. If clinicians’ use of our
software and technology services leads to faulty clinical decisions or injury to patients, we could be subject to claims or litigation
by our customers, clinicians or patients. In addition, such failures could damage our reputation and could negatively affect future
sales.
Failure of a customer’s system to perform in accordance with our documentation could constitute a breach of warranty and
could require us to incur additional expense in order to make the system comply with the documentation. If such failure is not
remedied in a timely manner, it could constitute a material breach under a contract, allowing the client to cancel the contract, obtain
refunds of amounts previously paid or assert claims for significant damages.
Various risks could interrupt customers’ access to their data residing in our service center, exposing us to significant costs.
We provide remote hosting services that involve operating both our software and the software of third-party vendors for our
customers. The ability to access the systems and the data that we host and support on demand is critical to our customers. Our
operations and facilities are vulnerable to interruption and/or damage from a number of sources, many of which are beyond our
control, including, without limitation: (1) power loss and telecommunications failures; (2) fire, flood, hurricane and other natural
disasters; (3) software and hardware errors, failures or crashes; and (4) cyberattacks, computer viruses, hacking and other similar
disruptive problems. We attempt to mitigate these risks through various means including disaster recovery plans, separate test
systems and change controls, information security procedures, and continued development and enhancement of our cyber security,
but our precautions may not protect against all risks. If customers’ access is interrupted because of problems in the operation of our
facilities, we could be exposed to significant claims, particularly if the access interruption is associated with problems in the timely
delivery of medical care. If customers’ access is interrupted from failure or breach of our operational or information security
systems, or those of our contractors or third-party service providers, we could suffer reputational harm or be exposed to liabilities
arising from the unauthorized and improper use or disclosure of confidential or proprietary information. We must maintain disaster
recovery and business continuity plans that rely upon third-party providers of related services and if those vendors fail us at a time
that our center is not operating correctly, we could incur a loss of revenue and liability for failure to fulfill our contractual service
commitments. Any significant instances of system downtime could negatively affect our reputation and ability to sell our remote
hosting services.
We may be required to record a significant charge to earnings if our goodwill, intangible and other long-lived assets, or
investments become further impaired.
We are required under U.S. Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (“GAAP”) to test our goodwill for impairment annually
or more frequently if indicators for potential impairment exist. Indicators that are considered include significant changes in
performance relative to expected operating results, significant changes in the use of the assets, significant negative industry, or
economic trends or a significant decline in the Company’s stock price and/or market capitalization for a sustained period of time. In
addition, we periodically review our intangible and other long-lived assets for impairment when events or changes in
circumstances, such as a divestiture, indicate the carrying value may not be recoverable. Factors that may be considered a change in
circumstances indicating that the carrying value of our intangible and other long-lived assets may not be recoverable include slower
growth rates, the loss of a significant customer, or divestiture of a business or asset for less than its carrying value. We may be
required to record a significant charge to earnings in our consolidated financial statements during the period in which any
impairment of our goodwill or intangible and other long-lived assets is determined. This could have a material adverse impact on
our results of operations. There are inherent uncertainties in management’s estimates, judgments and assumptions used in assessing
recoverability of goodwill, intangible and other long-lived assets. Any material changes in key assumptions, including failure to
meet business plans, negative changes in government reimbursement rates, a deterioration in the U.S. and global financial markets,
an increase in interest rate or an increase in the cost of equity financing by market participants within the industry or other
unanticipated events and circumstances, may decrease the projected cash flows or increase the discount rates and could potentially
result in an impairment charge.
20
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Our investment in Change Healthcare represents the fair value of our 70% equity interest in Change Healthcare. We may
experience declines in its fair value. A decline in the fair value of our Change Healthcare investment may require that we review the
carrying value for potential impairment, and such review could result in an impairment charge to our consolidated statements of
operations.
Tax legislation initiatives or challenges to our tax positions could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
We are a large multinational corporation with operations in the United States and international jurisdictions. As such, we are
subject to the tax laws and regulations of the United States federal, state and local governments and of many international
jurisdictions. From time to time, legislation may be enacted that could adversely affect our tax positions. There can be no assurance
that our effective tax rate and the resulting cash flow will not be adversely affected by these changes in legislation. On December
22, 2017, the U.S. government enacted the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 (the "2017 Tax Act"), which was comprehensive new tax
legislation. The 2017 Tax Act made broad and complex changes to the U.S. tax code, including but not limited to reducing the U.S.
federal corporate tax rate from 35% to 21%, creating the base erosion anti-abuse tax, creating a new provision designed to tax
global intangible low-income and generally eliminating U.S. federal income taxes on dividends from foreign subsidiaries. In
addition, we were subject to a one-time transition tax in 2018 on certain accumulated earnings and profits of our foreign
subsidiaries not previously subject to U.S. income tax. Our accounting for the impact of the 2017 Tax Act was completed as of the
period ended December 31, 2018. The U.S. Treasury Department and IRS continue to issue regulations with respect to the 2017
Tax Act. Due to the potential for changes to tax laws and regulations or changes to the interpretation thereof (including regulations
and interpretations pertaining to the 2017 Tax Act), the ambiguity of tax laws and regulations, the subjectivity of factual
interpretations, the complexity of our intercompany arrangements, uncertainties regarding the geographic mix of earnings in any
particular period, and other factors, material adjustments to our tax estimates may impact our provision for income taxes and our
earnings per share, as well as our cash flows, in the period in which any such adjustments are made. Refer to Financial Note 10,
“Income Taxes,” to the accompanying consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for
additional information.
The tax laws and regulations of the various countries where we have major operations are extremely complex and subject to
varying interpretations. For example, we operate in various countries that collect value added taxes (“VAT”). The determination of
the manner in which a VAT applies to our foreign operations is subject to varying interpretations arising from the complex nature of
the tax laws and regulations. Although we believe that our historical tax positions are sound and consistent with applicable laws,
regulations and existing precedent, there can be no assurance that these tax positions will not be challenged by relevant tax
authorities or that we would be successful in any such challenge. Even if we are successful in maintaining our positions, we may
incur significant expense in defending challenges to our tax positions by tax authorities that could have a material impact on our
financial position and results of operations.
In addition, as jurisdictions enact legislation to implement the recommendations of the recently concluded base erosion and
profit shifting project undertaken by the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development or as a result of the European
Commission’s investigations into illegal state aid, changes to long-standing tax principles may result which could adversely impact
our tax expense and cash flows.
We are currently subject to tax examinations in various jurisdictions, and these jurisdictions may assess tax liabilities against
us. Developments in ongoing examinations could have a material impact on our provision for income taxes and our earnings per
share, as well as our cash flows, in the period in which any such adjustments are made, and for prior and subsequent periods. We
regularly assess the likelihood of an adverse outcome resulting from these examinations to determine the adequacy of our tax
reserves. Although we believe our estimates are reasonable, the final outcome of any ongoing tax controversy could be materially
different from our historical tax accruals.
Volatility and disruption to the global capital and credit markets may adversely affect our ability to access credit, our cost of
credit and the financial soundness of our customers and suppliers.
Volatility and disruption in the global capital and credit markets, including the bankruptcy or restructuring of certain financial
institutions, reduced lending activity by other financial institutions, or decreased liquidity and increased costs in the commercial
paper market, may adversely affect the availability and cost of credit already arranged and the availability, terms and cost of credit
in the future. Although we believe that our operating cash flow, financial assets, current access to capital and credit markets,
including our existing credit facilities, will give us the ability to meet our financing needs for the foreseeable future, there can be no
assurance that volatility and disruption in the global capital and credit markets will not impair our liquidity or increase our costs of
borrowing.
21
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Our business could also be negatively impacted if our customers or suppliers experience disruptions resulting from tighter
capital and credit markets or a slowdown in the general economy. As a result, customers may modify, delay or cancel plans to
purchase or implement our products or services and suppliers may increase their prices, reduce their output or change their terms of
sale. Additionally, if customers’ or suppliers’ operating and financial performance deteriorates or if they are unable to make
scheduled payments or obtain credit, customers may not be able to pay, or may delay payment of accounts receivable owed to us
and suppliers may restrict credit, impose different payment terms or be unable to make payments due to us for fees, returned
products or incentives. Any inability of customers to pay us for our products and services or any demands by suppliers for different
payment terms, may have a material adverse impact on our results of operations and cash flow.
Changes in accounting standards issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”) or other standard-setting
bodies may adversely affect our consolidated financial statements.
Our consolidated financial statements are subject to the application of U.S. GAAP, which is periodically revised and/or
expanded. From time to time, we are required to adopt new or revised accounting standards issued by recognized authoritative
bodies, including the FASB and the SEC. It is possible that future accounting standards we are required to adopt may require
changes to the current accounting treatment that we apply to our consolidated financial statements and may require us to make
significant changes to our systems. Such changes could result in a material adverse impact on our financial position and results of
operations.
We could face significant liability if we withdraw from participation in one or more multiemployer pension plans in which we
participate, or if one or more multiemployer plans in which we participate is underfunded.
We participate in various multiemployer pension plans. In the event that we withdraw from participation in one of these plans,
then applicable law could require us to make additional cash contributions to the plans in installments. Our withdrawal liability for
any multiemployer plan would depend on the extent of the plan’s funding of vested benefits. The multiemployer plans could have
significant unfunded vested liabilities. Such underfunding may increase in the event other employers become insolvent or withdraw
from the applicable plan or upon the inability or failure of withdrawing employers to pay their withdrawal liability. In addition,
such underfunding may increase as a result of lower than expected returns on pension fund assets or other funding deficiencies. The
occurrence of any of these events could have a material adverse impact on our consolidated financial position, results of operations
or cash flows.
We may not realize the expected benefits from our restructuring and business process initiatives.
From time to time, the Company may enter into restructuring and business process initiatives. These types of initiatives could
yield unintended consequences such as distraction of our management and employees, business disruption, attrition beyond any
planned reduction in workforce, inability to attract or retain key personnel, and reduced employee productivity which could
negatively affect our business, sales, financial condition and results of operations. Moreover, our restructuring and business process
initiatives result in charges and expenses that impact our operating results. We cannot guarantee that the activities under any
restructuring and business initiative will result in the desired efficiencies and estimated cost savings.
We may experience difficulties with outsourcing and similar third-party relationships.
Our ability to conduct our business might be negatively impacted if we experience difficulties with outsourcing and managing
similar third-party relationships. We outsource certain business and administrative functions and rely on third parties to perform
certain services on our behalf. If we fail to develop, implement and monitor our outsourcing strategies, such strategies prove to be
ineffective or fail to provide expected cost savings, or our third-party providers fail to perform as anticipated, we may experience
operational difficulties and increased costs may adversely affect our results of operations.
22
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Moreover, we utilize contractors and employees located outside of the United States to assist us in performing services or
providing support for our customers. Certain of these resources may have access to personal information, including protected health
information. Some of our customers have contractually limited or may seek to limit our ability to use our offshore resources which
may increase our costs due to concerns regarding potential misuse of this information. Further, Congress and a number of states
have considered legislation that would restrict the transmission of personal information of United States residents offshore. Some
proposals impose liability on healthcare businesses resulting from misuse or prohibited transmission of personal information to
individuals or entities outside the United States and may require the prior consent of the identifiable patient. Congress also has
considered establishing a private civil cause of action enabling an individual to recover damages sustained as a result of a violation
of these proposed restrictions. If our ability to utilize offshore resources is limited by our customers or legislative action, the work
currently being performed offshore may be done at a lower margin or at a loss and we may be subject to sanctions if we are unable
to comply with new legislative requirements. Use of offshore resources may increase our risk of violating data security and privacy
obligations to our customers, which could adversely affect our results of operations.
We may face risks associated with our retail expansion.
In recent years, we have expanded our retail operations through a number of acquisitions. As we expand our retail footprint, we
may face risks that are different from those we currently encounter. Our expansion into additional retail markets, such as those in
Europe and Canada, could result in increased competitive, merchandising and distribution challenges. We may encounter
difficulties in attracting customers to our retail locations due to a lack of customer familiarity with our brands and our lack of
familiarity with local customer preferences and seasonal differences in the market. Our ability to expand successfully will depend
on acceptance of our retail store experience by customers, including our ability to design our stores in a manner that resonates
locally and to offer the correct product assortment to appeal to consumers. Furthermore, our continued growth in the retail sector
may strain relations with certain of our distribution customers who also compete in the retail pharmacy sector. There can be no
assurance that our retail locations will be received as well as, or achieve net sales or profitability levels consistent with, our
projected targets or be comparable to those of our existing stores in the time periods estimated by us, or at all. If our retail
expansion fails to achieve, or is unable to sustain, acceptable net sales and profitability levels, our business, results of operations
and growth prospects may be materially adversely affected.
Our retail stores may require additional management time and attention. Failure to properly supervise the operation and
maintain the consistency of the customer experience in those retail stores could result in loss of customers and potentially adversely
affect our results of operations.
We may be unable to keep existing retail store locations or open new retail locations in desirable places, which could materially
adversely affect our results of operations.
We may be unable to keep existing retail locations or open new retail locations in desirable places in the future. We compete
with other retailers and businesses for suitable retail locations. Local land use, local zoning issues, environmental regulations and
other regulations may affect our ability to find suitable retail locations and also influence the cost of leasing or buying them. We
also may have difficulty negotiating real estate leases for new stores, renewing real estate leases for existing stores or negotiating
purchase agreements for new sites on acceptable terms. In addition, construction, environmental, zoning and real estate delays may
negatively affect retail location openings and increase costs and capital expenditures. If we are unable to keep up our existing retail
store locations or open new retail store locations in desirable places and on favorable terms, our results of operations could be
materially adversely affected.
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments.
None.
Item 2. Properties.
Because of the nature of our principal businesses, our plant, warehousing, retail pharmacies, office and other facilities are
operated in widely dispersed locations, primarily throughout North America and Europe. The warehouses and retail pharmacies are
typically owned or leased on a long-term basis. We consider our operating properties to be in satisfactory condition and adequate to
meet our needs for the next several years without making capital expenditures materially higher than historical levels. Information
as to material lease commitments is included in Financial Note 22, “Lease Obligations,” to the consolidated financial statements
appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
23
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Item 3. Legal Proceedings.
Certain legal proceedings in which we are involved are discussed in Financial Note 24, “Commitments and Contingent
Liabilities,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures.
Not applicable.
24
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Information about our Executive Officers
The following table sets forth information regarding the executive officers of the Company, including their principal
occupations during the past five years. The number of years of service with the Company includes service with predecessor
companies.
There are no family relationships between any of the executive officers or directors of the Company. The executive officers are
elected on an annual basis generally and their term expires at the first meeting of the Board of Directors (“Board”) following the
annual meeting of stockholders, or until their successors are elected and have qualified, or until death, resignation or removal,
whichever is sooner.
Name Age Position with Registrant and Business Experience
  
Brian S. Tyler 52 Chief Executive Officer since April 2019; President and Chief
Operating Officer from August 2018 to March 2019; Chairman of the
Management Board of McKesson Europe AG from 2017 to 2018;
President and Chief Operating Officer, McKesson Europe from 2016
to 2017; President of North America Distribution and Services from
2015 to 2016; Executive Vice President, Corporate Strategy and
Business Development from 2012 to 2015; and a director since April
2019.  Service with the Company - 22 years.
Britt J. Vitalone 50 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer since January
2018; Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, U.S.
Pharmaceutical from July 2014 to December 2017; Senior Vice
President and Chief Financial Officer, U.S. Pharmaceutical and
Specialty Health from October 2017 to December 2017; Senior Vice
President of Corporate Finance and M&A Finance from March 2012
to June 2014.  Service with the Company - 13 years.
Jorge L. Figueredo 58 Executive Vice President and Chief Human Resources Officer since
May 2008. Service with the Company - 11 years.
Kathleen D. McElligott 63 Executive Vice President, Chief Information Officer and Chief
Technology Officer since July 2015; Chief Information Officer and
Vice President, Information Technology, Emerson Electric from 2010
to July 2015. Service with the Company - 3 years.
Bansi Nagji 54 Executive Vice President and Chief Strategy and Business
Development Officer since February 2015; Principal, Deloitte
Consulting, LLP and Global Leader, Monitor Deloitte (which was
formed by the global merger of Monitor Group with Deloitte) from
January 2013 to February 2015; President, Monitor Group from July
2012 to January 2013; Partner, Monitor Group from 2001 to January
2013. Service with the Company - 4 years.
Lori A. Schechter 57 Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Chief Compliance
Officer since June 2014; Associate General Counsel from January
2012 to June 2014; Litigation Partner, Morrison & Foerster LLP from
1995 to December 2011. Service with the Company - 7 years.
25
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
PART II
Item 5. Market for the Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities.
(a)Market Information: The principal market on which the Company’s common stock is traded is the New York Stock Exchange
(“NYSE”) under the trading symbol of “MCK”.
(b)Holders: The number of record holders of the Company’s common stock at March 31, 2019 was approximately 5,333.
(c)Dividends: In July 2018, the Company’s quarterly dividend was raised from $0.34 to $0.39 per common share for dividends
declared on or after such date by the Board.  The Company declared regular cash dividends of $1.51 and $1.30 per share in the
years ended March 31, 2019 and 2018. 
The Company anticipates that it will continue to pay quarterly cash dividends in the future. However, the payment and amount
of future dividends remain within the discretion of the Board and will depend upon the Company’s future earnings, financial
condition, capital requirements and other factors.
(d)Securities Authorized for Issuance under Equity Compensation Plans: Information relating to this item is provided under Part
III, Item 12, to this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
(e)Share Repurchase Plans: Stock repurchases may be made from time to time in open market transactions, privately negotiated
transactions, through accelerated share repurchase (“ASR”) programs, or by any combination of such methods. The timing of
any repurchases and the actual number of shares repurchased will depend on a variety of factors, including our stock price,
corporate and regulatory requirements, restrictions under our debt obligations and other market and economic conditions.
During the last three years, our share repurchases were transacted through both open market transactions and ASR programs
with third-party financial institutions.
In October 2016, the Board authorized the repurchase of up to $4.0 billion of the Company’s common stock. 
In 2017, we repurchased 14.1 million of the Company’s shares for $2.0 billion through open market transactions at an average
price per share of $140.96.  In March 2017, we entered into an ASR program with a third-party financial institution to repurchase
$250 million of the Company’s common stock. As of March 31, 2017, we had received 1.4 million shares under this program. This
ASR program was completed in April 2017 and we received 0.3 million additional shares. The total number of shares repurchased
under this ASR program was 1.7 million shares at an average price per share of $143.19.  During 2017, we completed the October
2015 share repurchase authorization. The total authorization outstanding for repurchases of the Company’s common stock was $2.7
billion at March 31, 2017.
In 2018, we repurchased 3.5 million of the Company’s shares for $500 million through open market transactions at an average
price per share of $144.43. In June 2017, August 2017 and March 2018, we entered into three separate ASR programs with third-
party financial institutions to repurchase $250 million, $400 million and $500 million of the Company’s common stock. As of
March 31, 2018, we completed and received a total of 1.5 million shares under the June 2017 ASR program and a total of 2.7
million shares under the August 2017 ASR program. In addition, we received 2.5 million shares representing the initial number of
shares due in March 2018 and an additional 1.0 million shares in the first quarter of 2019. The March 2018 ASR program was
completed at an average price per share of $143.66 during the first quarter of 2019. The total authorization outstanding for
repurchase of the Company’s common stock was $1.1 billion at March 31, 2018.
In May 2018, the Board authorized the repurchase of up to $4.0 billion of the Company’s common stock. The total
authorization outstanding for repurchases of the Company’s common stock was increased to $5.1 billion.
During 2019, we repurchased 10.4 million of the Company’s shares for $1.4 billion through open market transactions at an
average price per share of $132.14.
In December 2018, we entered into an ASR program with a third-party financial institution to repurchase $250 million of the
Company’s common stock. The total number of shares repurchased under this ASR program was 2.1 million shares at an average
price per share of $117.98. The total authorization outstanding for repurchase of the Company’s common stock was $3.5 billion at
March 31, 2019.
26
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
In 2019, we retired 5.0 million or $542 million of the Company’s treasury shares previously repurchased. Under the applicable
state law, these shares resume the status of authorized and unissued shares upon retirement. In accordance with our accounting
policy, we allocate any excess of share repurchase price over par value between additional paid-in capital and retained earnings.
Accordingly, our retained earnings and additional paid-in capital were reduced by $472 million and $70 million during 2019.
The following table provides information on the Company’s share repurchases during the fourth quarter of 2019:
 Share Repurchases (1)
(In millions, except price per shar e)Total
Number of Shares
Purchased  Average Price Paid
per ShareTotal Number of
Shares Purchased
as Part of Publicly
Announced
ProgramsApproximate Dollar
Value of Shares that
May Yet Be
Purchased Under
the Programs
January 1, 2019 - January 31, 2019 — $ — — $ 3,719
February 1, 2019 - February 28, 2019 2.3 130.57 2.3 3,469
March 1, 2019 - March 31, 2019 — — — 3,469
Total 2.3 2.3
(1)This table does not include shares tendered to satisfy the exercise price in connection with cashless exercises of employee stock options or shares tendered to
satisfy tax-withholding obligations in connection with employee equity awards.
27
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
(f)Stock Price Performance Graph*: The following graph compares the cumulative total stockholder return on the Company’s
common stock for the periods indicated with the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index and the S&P 500 Health Care Index. The S&P
500 Health Care Index was selected as a comparator because it is generally available to investors and broadly used by other
companies in the same industry.
 March 31,
 2014  2015  2016  2017  2018  2019
McKesson Corporation $ 100.00 $ 128.71 $ 89.99 $ 85.43 $ 81.17 $ 67.45
S&P 500 Index $ 100.00 $ 112.73 $ 114.74 $ 134.45 $ 153.26 $ 167.81
S&P 500 Health Care Index $ 100.00 $ 126.19 $ 119.65 $ 133.52 $ 148.57 $ 170.70
* Assumes $100 invested in McKesson Common Stock and in each index on March 31, 2014 and that all dividends are reinvested.
28
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Item 6. Selected Financial Data.
FIVE-YEAR HIGHLIGHTS
 As of and for  the Years Ended Mar ch 31,
(In millions, except per shar e data and ratios) 2019 2018 2017 2016 2015
Operating Results      
Revenues $214,319 $208,357 $198,533 $190,884 $179,045
Percent change 2.9% 4.9% 4.0% 6.6% 30.3%
Gross profit $ 11,754 $ 11,184 $ 11,271 $ 11,416 $ 11,411
Income from continuing operations before income
taxes (1)610 239 6,891 3,250 2,657
Income (Loss) after income taxes      
Continuing operations (1)254 292 5,277 2,342 1,842
Discontinued operations 1 5 (124) (32) (299)
Net income 255 297 5,153 2,310 1,543
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests
(2) (221) (230) (83) (52) (67)
Net income attributable to McKesson Corporation
(1) 34 67 5,070 2,258 1,476
Financial Position      
Working capital $ 839 $ 451 $ 1,336 $ 3,366 $ 3,173
Days sales outstanding for: (3)     
Customer receivables 26 25 27 28 26
Inventories 31 30 30 32 31
Drafts and accounts payable 62 60 61 59 54
Total assets $ 59,672 $ 60,381 $ 60,969 $ 56,523 $ 53,870
Total debt, including capital lease obligations 7,595 7,880 8,545 8,114 9,844
Total McKesson stockholders’  equity (4)8,094 9,804 11,095 8,924 8,001
Payments for property , plant and equipment 426 405 404 488 376
Acquisitions, net of cash, cash equivalents and
restricted cash acquired 905 2,893 4,212 40 170
Common Shar e Information      
Common shares outstanding at year -end 190 202 211 225 232
Shares on which earnings per common share were
based      
Diluted 197 209 223 233 235
Basic 196 208 221 230 232
Diluted earnings (loss) per common share attributable
to McKesson Corporation (5)     
Continuing operations $ 0.17 $ 0.30 $ 23.28 $ 9.84 $ 7.54
Discontinued operations — 0.02 (0.55 ) (0.14 ) (1.27 )
Total 0.17 0.32 22.73 9.70 6.27
Cash dividends declared 298 270 249 249 226
Cash dividends declared per common share 1.51 1.30 1.12 1.08 0.96
Book value per common share (5) (6)42.60 48.53 52.58 39.66 34.49
Market value per common share - year -end 117.06 140.87 148.26 157.25 226.20
Supplemental Data      
Debt to capital ratio (7)43.3% 40.6% 39.2% 43.6% 50.3%
Average McKesson stockholders’  equity (8)$ 9,163 $ 11,016 $ 9,282 $ 8,688 $ 8,703
Return on McKesson stockholders’  equity (9)0.4% 0.6% 54.6% 26.0% 17.0%
29
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Footnotes to Five-Y ear Highlights:
(1)2019 includes non-cash pre-tax goodwill impairment charges of $1,776 million ($1,756 million after-tax) primarily for our two reporting units within our
McKesson European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment. 2018 includes total non-cash goodwill impairment charges of $1,738 million (pre-tax and after-tax)
for our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment and Other. These impairment charges are generally not deductible for income tax purposes. 2019 and 2018
also include non-cash asset impairment charges of $210 million ($172 million after-tax) and $446 million ($410 million after-tax) primarily for our U.K. retail
businesses. 2017 includes a pre-tax gain of $3,947 million ($3,018 million after-tax) from the contribution of the majority of our Core MTS Business in
connection with Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange.
(2)Includes guaranteed dividends for 2015 and annual recurring compensation for 2016, 2017, 2018 and 2019 that McKesson became obligated to pay to the
noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe upon the effectiveness of the Domination Agreement in 2015. 2019, 2018 and 2017 include net income
attributable to third-party equity interests in our consolidated entities including Vantage Oncology, LLC and ClarusONE Sourcing Services LLP, which was
formed in 2017.
(3)Based on year-end balances and sales or cost of sales for the last 90 days of the year.
(4)Excludes noncontrolling and redeemable noncontrolling interests.
(5)Certain computations may reflect rounding adjustments.
(6)Represents McKesson stockholders’ equity divided by year-end common shares outstanding.
(7)Ratio is computed as total debt divided by the sum of total debt and McKesson stockholders’ equity excluding accumulated other comprehensive income
(loss).
(8)Represents a five-quarter average of McKesson stockholders’ equity.
(9)Ratio is computed as net income attributable to McKesson Corporation for the last four quarters, divided by a five-quarter average of McKesson stockholders’
equity.
30
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
GENERAL
Management’s discussion and analysis of financial condition and results of operations, referred to as the Financial Review, is
intended to assist the reader in the understanding and assessment of significant changes and trends related to the results of
operations and financial position of McKesson Corporation (“McKesson,” the “Company,” or “we” and other similar pronouns)
together with its subsidiaries. This discussion and analysis should be read in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements
and accompanying financial notes in Item 8 of Part II of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. The Company’s fiscal year begins on
April 1 and ends on March 31. Unless otherwise noted, all references to a particular year shall mean the Company’s fiscal year.
Certain statements in this report constitute forward-looking statements. See Item 1 - Business - Forward-Looking Statements in
Part I of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional factors relating to these statements; also see Item 1A - Risk Factors in Part
I of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for a list of certain risk factors applicable to our business, financial condition and results of
operations.
We conduct our business through three reportable segments: U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions, European
Pharmaceutical Solutions and Medical-Surgical Solutions. All remaining operating segments and business activities that are not
significant enough to require separate reportable segment disclosure are included in Other. Refer to Financial Note 28, “Segments
of Business,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for a description of these
segments.
31
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Overview:
(Dollars in millions, except per share data and ratios)Years Ended March 31, Change
2019  2018 2017 2019  2018
Revenues $214,319 $208,357 $198,533 3% 5%
Gross Profit $11,754 $11,184 $11,271 5% (1)%
Gross Profit Margin 5.48% 5.37% 5.68% 11bp (31)bp
Operating Expenses:       
Operating Expenses $(8,474) $(8,263)$(7,788) 3% 6%
Goodwill Impairment Charges (1,797) (1,738) (290) 3  499 
Restructuring and Asset Impairment Charges (597) (567) (18) 5  3,050 
Gain from Sale of Business — 109 — (100)  NM 
Gain on Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange,
Net — 37 3,947 (100)  (99) 
Total Operating Expenses $(10,868) $(10,422)$(4,149) 4% 151%
Operating Expenses as a Percentage of Revenues 5.07% 5.00% 2.09% 7bp 291bp
Other Income, Net $ 182 $ 130 $ 77 40% 69%
Loss from Equity Method Investment in Change
Healthcare (194) (248) — (22)  NM 
Loss on Debt Extinguishment — (122) — (100)  NM 
Interest Expense (264) (283) (308) (7)  (8) 
Income from Continuing Operations Before Income Taxes 610 239 6,891 155  (97) 
Income Tax (Expense) Benefit (356) 53 (1,614) (772)  (103) 
Income from Continuing Operations 254 292 5,277 (13)  (94) 
Income (Loss) from Discontinued Operations, Net of Tax 1 5 (124) (80)  (104) 
Net Income 255 297 5,153 (14)  (94) 
Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests (221) (230) (83) (4)  177 
Net Income Attributable to McKesson Corporation $ 34 $ 67 $ 5,070 (49)% (99)%
      
Diluted Earnings (Loss) Per Common Share Attributable
to McKesson Corporation       
Continuing Operations $ 0.17 $ 0.30 $ 23.28 (43)% (99)%
Discontinued Operations — 0.02 (0.55) (100)  (104) 
Total $ 0.17 $ 0.32 $ 22.73 (47)% (99)%
      
Weighted Average Diluted Common Shares 197 209 223 (6)% (6)%
bp - basis points
NM - not meaningful
32
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Revenues:
Revenues increased in 2019 and 2018 primarily due to market growth, including expanded business with existing customers
and our business acquisitions, partially offset by loss of customers within our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions
segment. The increase in revenue for 2018 was also offset by the 2017 contribution of the majority of our McKesson Technology
Solutions businesses (“Core MTS Business”) to form the Change Healthcare joint venture. Market growth includes growing drug
utilization, price increases and newly launched products, partially offset by price deflation associated with brand to generic drug
conversion.
Gross Profit:
Gross profit and gross profit margin increased in 2019 compared to 2018. Gross profit increased due to market growth,
partially offset by loss of customers. The increase in gross profit and gross profit margin for 2019 was also due to the receipt of net
cash proceeds representing our share of antitrust legal settlements of $202 million, higher last-in, first-out (“LIFO”) credits and our
business acquisitions. These increases in 2019 were partially offset by the incremental government reimbursement reductions in the
United Kingdom (“U.K.”), government imposed generic price cuts in Canada and the 2018 third quarter sale of our Enterprise
Information Solutions (“EIS”) business.
Gross profit and gross profit margin decreased in 2018 compared to 2017. The decrease was primarily due to the 2017
contribution of the Core MTS Business to the Change Healthcare joint venture, significant government reimbursement reductions
in the U.K., the competitive sell-side environment and weaker pharmaceutical manufacturer pricing trends. These decreases in 2018
were partially offset by market growth, procurement benefits realized through the joint sourcing entity, ClarusONE Sourcing
Services LLP (“ClarusONE”), higher LIFO credits and our business acquisitions.
Gross profit for 2019, 2018 and 2017 included LIFO credits of $210 million, $99 million and $7 million. Gross profit for 2017
benefited from $144 million of cash receipts representing our share of antitrust legal settlements.
Operating Expenses:
Operating expenses, and operating expenses as a percentage of revenues increased in 2019 and 2018. Operating expenses for
2019, 2018 and 2017 were affected by the following significant items:
2019
•Non-cash pre-tax goodwill impairment charges of $1,776 million ($1,756 million after-tax) in our Consumer Solutions
(“CS”) and Pharmacy Solutions (“PS”) reporting units within the European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment. Of these
impairment charges, $238 million was recognized upon the 2019 first quarter segment changes, which resulted in two new
reporting units. The remaining charges were primarily due to declines in the reporting units’ estimated future cash flows
and the selection of higher discount rates. These impairment charges were generally not deductible for income tax
purposes. The declines in estimated future cash flows were primarily attributed to additional government reimbursement
reductions and competitive pressures within the U.K. The risk of successfully achieving certain business initiatives was
the primary factor in the use of a higher discount rate. At March 31, 2019, both CS and PS reporting units had no
remaining goodwill balances;
•Pre-tax restructuring and asset impairment charges of $331 million ($273 million after-tax), primarily representing
employee severance and exit-related costs related to the 2019 restructuring initiatives, as further discussed below;
•Non-cash pre-tax long-lived asset impairment charges of $245 million ($207 million after-tax) primarily for our U.K.
business (mainly pharmacy licenses) driven by additional government reimbursement reductions and competitive
pressures in the U.K.;
33
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
•Higher opioid-related costs of $151 million ($122 million after-tax) primarily related to litigation expenses. The Company
is a defendant in many cases alleging claims related to the distribution of controlled substances to pharmacies, often
together with other pharmaceutical wholesale distributors and pharmaceutical manufacturers and retail pharmacy chains
named as defendants. In addition, the State of New York has recently adopted a tax on sales of opioids in the State, and
other states are considering legislation that could require us to pay taxes, licensing fees, or assessments on the distribution
of opioid medications in those states. Liabilities for taxes or assessments under any such laws will likely have an adverse
impact on our results of operations, unless we are able to mitigate them through operational changes or commercial
arrangements where permitted. Refer to Financial Note 24, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities,” to the
accompanying consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for more information;
•Gain from an escrow settlement of $97 million (pre-tax and after-tax) representing certain indemnity and other claims
related to our 2017 acquisition of Rexall Health;
•Pre-tax credit of $90 million ($66 million after-tax) related to the derecognition of a tax receivable agreement (“TRA”)
payable to the shareholders of Change Healthcare Inc. (“Change”); and
•Higher operating expenses due to our business acquisitions and to support growth
2018
•Non-cash goodwill impairment charges of $1,283 million (pre-tax and after-tax) for the European Pharmaceutical
Solutions segment and $455 million (pre-tax and after-tax) for our Rexall Health reporting unit in Other. There were no
tax benefits associated with these goodwill impairment charges. The impairments for Europe were triggered primarily by
government reimbursement reductions in our retail business in the U.K. and a more competitive environment in France.
The impairments for Rexall Health were primarily driven by significant generics reimbursement reductions across Canada
and minimum wage increases in multiple provinces. At March 31, 2018, the Rexall Health reporting unit had no remaining
goodwill related to our acquisition of Rexall Health;
•Non-cash pre-tax long-lived asset impairment charges of $446 million ($410 million after-tax) primarily due to the
declines in estimated future cash flows in our European business including those declines in our U.K. retail business
driven by government reimbursement reductions;
•Pre-tax restructuring charges of $74 million ($67 million after-tax) primarily representing employee severance and lease
exit costs related to the 2018 restructuring plan for our McKesson Europe business. Under this plan, we expect to record
total pre-tax charges of approximately $90 million to $130 million, of which $92 million of pre-tax charges were recorded
to date;
•Higher expenses due to our business acquisitions;
•Pre-tax charitable contribution expense of $100 million ($64 million after-tax) to a public benefit California foundation;
and
•Pre-tax gain of $109 million ($30 million after-tax) recognized from the sale of our EIS business within Other
2017
•Pre-tax gain of $3,947 million ($3,018 million after-tax) related to the 2017 contribution of the Core MTS Business to the
Change Healthcare joint venture; and
•Non-cash pre-tax goodwill impairment charge of $290 million ($282 million after-tax) related to our EIS business within
Other. This impairment charge was generally not deductible for income tax purposes.
34
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Goodwill Impairments:
As a result of the 2019 annual goodwill impairment test, the estimated fair value of our reporting units excluding the CS and
PS reporting units exceeded their carrying value. However, other risks, expenses and future developments, such as additional
government actions, increased regulatory uncertainty and material changes in key market assumptions that we were unable to
anticipate as of the testing date may require us to further revise the projected cash flows, which could adversely affect the fair value
of our McKesson Canada reporting unit in Other in future periods.
Fiscal 2019 Restructuring Initiatives
On April 25, 2018, the Company announced a strategic growth initiative intended to drive long-term incremental profit growth
and increase operational efficiency. The initiative consists of multiple growth priorities and plans to optimize the Company’s
operating models and cost structures primarily through the centralization and outsourcing of certain administrative functions and
cost management. As part of the growth initiative, we committed to implement certain actions including a reduction in workforce,
facility consolidation and store closures. We expect to record total pre-tax charges of approximately $140 million to $180 million,
of which we recorded pre-tax charges of $135 million ($122 million after-tax) in 2019. This set of the initiatives will be
substantially completed by the end of 2020. Estimated remaining charges primarily consist of exit-related costs including contract
termination costs.
As previously announced on November 30, 2018, the Company relocated its corporate headquarters from San Francisco,
California to Irving, Texas to improve efficiency, collaboration and cost competitiveness, effective April 1, 2019. We anticipate that
the relocation will be completed by January 2021. We expect to record total pre-tax charges of approximately $80 million to $130
million, of which pre-tax charges of $33 million ($24 million after-tax) were recorded in 2019 primarily representing employee
severance. Estimated remaining charges primarily consist of lease and other exit-related costs, employee retention and relocation
expenses.
During the fourth quarter of 2019, the Company committed to additional programs to continue our operating model and cost
optimization efforts. We continue to implement centralization of certain functions and outsourcing through the expanded
arrangement with a third-party vendor to achieve operational efficiency. The programs also include reorganization and
consolidation of our business operations and related headcount reductions as well as the further closures of retail pharmacy stores
in Europe and facilities. We expect to incur total pre-tax charges of approximately $300 million to $350 million for these programs,
which are expected to be completed by the end of 2021. In 2019, pre-tax charges of $163 million ($127 million after-tax) were
recorded, which primarily represent employee severance and accelerated depreciation expense. Estimated remaining charges
primarily consist of facility and other exit costs and employee-related costs.
Refer to Financial Note 3, “Restructuring and Asset Impairment Charges,” to the accompanying consolidated financial
statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for more information.
Other Income, Net: Other income, net, for 2019 and 2018 increased compared to the same periods a year ago primarily due to
higher gains recognized from the sales of investments.
Loss from Equity Method Investment in Change Healthcare: 2019 and 2018 include our proportionate share of the loss from
the Change Healthcare joint venture of $194 million and $248 million, which includes amortization expenses associated with
equity method intangible assets and integration expenses incurred by the joint venture. 2018 also includes certain transaction
expenses, partially offset by a tax benefit of $76 million primarily due to a reduction in the future applicable tax rate related to the
2017 Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the “2017 Tax Act”). Refer to Financial Note 5, “Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange,” to the
accompanying consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for more information.
Acquisition-Related Expenses and Adjustments
Acquisition-related expenses, which included transaction and integration expenses directly related to business acquisitions and
the gain on the Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange were $228 million and $168 million in 2019 and 2018, and net credit of
$3,797 million in 2017. 2019 and 2018 include our proportionate share of transaction and integration expenses incurred by Change
Healthcare. 2018 includes a pre-tax gain of $37 million associated with the final net working capital and other adjustments from the
Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange. 2017 includes a pre-tax gain of $3,947 million from the Healthcare Technology Net
Asset Exchange.
35
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Acquisition-related expenses and adjustments were recorded as follows:
 Years Ended March 31,
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018  2017
Operating Expenses   
Gain on Change Healthcare Net Asset Exchange, net $ — $ (37) $ (3,947)
Transaction closing expenses 3 15 30
Restructuring, severance and relocation 12 36 25
Other (1) 103 54 85
Total 118 68 (3,807)
Other Expenses (2) 110 100 10
Total Acquisition-Related Expenses and Adjustments $ 228 $ 168 $ (3,797)
(1)These expenses primarily include outside service fees, costs associated with information technology and other integration activities.
(2)Fiscal 2019 and 2018 includes our proportionate share of transaction and integration expenses incurred by Change Healthcare, excluding certain fair value
adjustments, which were recorded within “Loss from Equity Method Investment in Change Healthcare”.
Amortization Expenses of Acquired Intangible Assets
Amortization expenses of acquired intangible assets directly related to business acquisitions and the formation of the Change
Healthcare joint venture were $790 million, $792 million and $440 million in 2019, 2018 and 2017. These expenses were primarily
recorded in our operating expenses and for 2019 and 2018 also in our proportionate share of loss from the equity method
investment in Change Healthcare.
Income Taxes
We recorded income tax expense of $356 million, benefit of $53 million and expense of $1,614 million related to continuing
operations in 2019, 2018 and 2017. Our reported income tax expense rate for 2019 was 58.4% compared to an income tax benefit
rate of 22.2% for 2018 and an income tax expense rate of 23.4% in 2017. Fluctuations in our reported income tax rates are
primarily due to the impact of the 2017 Tax Act, the impact of nondeductible impairment charges, and varying proportions of
income attributable to foreign countries that have income tax rates different from the U.S. rate.
Our reported income tax expense rate for 2019 was unfavorably impacted by non-cash pre-tax charges of $1,776 million
($1,756 million after-tax) to impair the carrying value of goodwill for our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment, given that
these charges are generally not deductible for tax purposes. As a result of the enactment of the 2017 Tax Act, the 2018 income tax
benefit rate included a tax benefit of $1,324 million from the re-measurement of certain deferred taxes to the lower U.S. federal tax
rate, partially offset by a tax expense of $457 million representing the one-time tax imposed on certain accumulated earnings and
profits of our foreign subsidiaries. The reported income tax benefit and expense rates for 2018 and 2017 were also unfavorably
affected by the non-cash goodwill impairment charges of $1,738 million (pre-tax and after-tax) and $290 million ($282 million
after-tax), given that these charges are generally not deductible for tax purposes. Refer to Financial Note 2, “Goodwill Impairment
Charges,” to the accompanying consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10‑K for additional
information.
Significant judgments and estimates are required in determining the consolidated income tax provision and evaluating income
tax uncertainties. Although our major taxing jurisdictions include the U.S., Canada and the U.K., we are subject to income taxes in
numerous foreign jurisdictions. Our income tax expense, deferred tax assets and liabilities and uncertain tax liabilities reflect
management’s best assessment of estimated current and future taxes to be paid. We believe that we have made adequate provision
for all income tax uncertainties.
On July 24, 2018, the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals issued an opinion in Altera Corp. v. Commissioner requiring related
parties in an intercompany cost-sharing arrangement to share expenses related to share-based compensation. This opinion reversed
the prior decision of the United States Tax Court. On August 7, 2018, the opinion was withdrawn and a rehearing of the case took
place on October 16, 2018. We will continue to monitor developments in this case and the ultimate outcome may have an adverse
impact on our effective tax rate.
36
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Income (Loss) from Discontinued Operations, Net of Tax: Income (Loss) from discontinued operations, net of tax, were
income of $1 million and $5 million in 2019 and 2018, and loss of $124 million in 2017. Loss from discontinued operations, net for
2017 includes an after-tax loss of $113 million related to the sale of our Brazilian pharmaceutical distribution business within our
European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment. We made a payment of approximately $100 million related to this sale in 2017. Refer
to Financial Note 7, “Discontinued Operations,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form
10-K for additional information.
Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests: Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests includes the annual
recurring compensation that we are obligated to pay to the noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe under the domination
and profit and loss transfer agreement (the “Domination Agreement”).  Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests also
includes third-party equity interests in our consolidated entities including ClarusONE and Vantage. Noncontrolling interests with
redemption features, such as put rights, that are not solely within the Company’s control are considered redeemable noncontrolling
interests.  Redeemable noncontrolling interests are presented outside of Stockholders’ Equity on our consolidated balance sheet.
Refer to Financial Note 11, “Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests and Noncontrolling Interests,” to the consolidated financial
statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
Net Income Attributable to McKesson Corporation: Net income attributable to McKesson Corporation was $34 million, $67
million and $5,070 million in 2019, 2018 and 2017. Diluted earnings per common share were $0.17, $0.32 and $22.73 in 2019,
2018 and 2017.
Weighted Average Diluted Common Shares Outstanding:  Diluted earnings per common share was calculated based on a
weighted average number of shares outstanding of 197 million, 209 million and 223 million for 2019, 2018 and 2017. Weighted
average diluted common shares outstanding is affected by the exercise and settlement of share-based awards and the cumulative
effect of share repurchases.
Revenues:
 Years Ended March 31,  Change
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017  2019 2018
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions $167,763 $162,587 $155,236 3% 5%
European Pharmaceutical Solutions 27,242 27,320 24,847 —  10
Medical-Surgical Solutions 7,618 6,611 6,244 15  6
Other 11,696 11,839 12,206 (1) (3)
Total Revenues $214,319 $208,357 $198,533 3% 5%
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions revenues increased over the past two years primarily due to market growth,
including expanded business with existing customers, growth of specialty pharmaceuticals and our business acquisitions, partially
offset by loss of customers. Market growth includes growing drug utilization, price increases and newly launched products,
partially offset by price deflation associated with brand to generic drug conversions.
European Pharmaceutical Solutions
European Pharmaceutical Solutions revenues remained flat and increased 10% in 2019 and 2018. This segment’s revenues
increased 1% and 5% in 2019 and 2018 primarily due to market growth, with the difference due to the effects of foreign currency
exchange fluctuations. Revenues in 2019 were also unfavorably affected by the retail pharmacy closures and additional government
reimbursement reductions in the U.K., and the competitive environment in France.
Medical-Surgical Solutions
Medical-Surgical Solutions revenues increased over the past two years compared to the same periods a year ago primarily due
to our 2019 acquisition of Medical Specialties Distributors LLC (“MSD”) and market growth.
37
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Other
Revenues in Other for 2019 and 2018 decreased 1% and 3% compared to the same periods a year ago. Revenues in Other for
2019 decreased primarily due to unfavorable effects of foreign currency exchange fluctuations of 2% and the effect of government
imposed generic price cuts and retail pharmacy closures related to our Canadian business. In addition, revenues in Other for 2019
were negatively impacted by the 2018 sale of our EIS business. These decreases for 2019 are partially offset by growth in our
Canadian and McKesson Prescription Technology Solutions (“MRxTS”) businesses and the effects of acquisitions in Canada.
Revenues in Other for 2018 decreased primarily due to the 2017 contribution of the Core MTS Business to the Change Healthcare
joint venture, partially offset by market growth, the effects of acquisitions in Canada and favorable effects of foreign currency
exchange fluctuations of 2%.
Segment Operating Profit, Corporate Expenses, Net and Interest Expense:
 Years Ended March 31,   Change
(Dollars in millions, except ratios) 2019  2018 2017   2019  2018
Segment Operating Profit (1)        
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions$ 2,697 $ 2,535 $ 2,488  6% 2%
European Pharmaceutical Solutions (2)(1,978) (1,681) 173  18  NM
Medical-Surgical Solutions 455 461 401  (1)  15
Other 394 (107) 4,514  468  (102)
Subtotal 1,568 1,208 7,576  30  (84)
Corporate Expenses, Net (694) (564) (377)  23  50
Loss on Debt Extinguishment — (122) —  (100)  NM
Interest Expense (264) (283) (308)  (7)  (8)
Income from Continuing Operations Before
Income Taxes $ 610 $ 239 $ 6,891  155% (97)%
         
Segment Operating Profit Margin         
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions 1.61% 1.56% 1.60% 5bp (4)bp
European Pharmaceutical Solutions (7.26) (6.15) 0.70  (111)  (685)
Medical-Surgical Solutions 5.97 6.97 6.42  (100)  55
bp - basis points
NM - not meaningful
(1)Segment operating profit includes gross profit, net of operating expenses, as well as other income, net, for our operating segments.
(2)Operating profit of our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment for 2019 and 2018 include non-cash pre-tax goodwill impairment charges of $1,776
million and $1,283 million. This segment’s operating profit for 2019 and 2018 also includes non-cash pre-tax long-lived asset impairment charges of $210
million and $446 million.
Segment Operating Profit
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions: Operating profit increased for 2019 and 2018 primarily due to market growth
including growth in our specialty business, partially offset by loss of customers. Operating profit and operating profit margin for
2019 benefited from the net cash proceeds representing our share of antitrust legal settlements and higher LIFO credits, partially
offset by a $61 million pre-tax charge related to a customer bankruptcy. Operating profit and operating profit margin for 2018 were
favorably affected by procurement benefits, higher LIFO credits and a pre-tax gain of $43 million recognized from the 2018 sale of
an equity method investment, partially offset by competitive sell-side pricing environment and net cash proceeds representing our
share of antitrust legal settlements received in 2017.
38
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
European Pharmaceutical Solutions: Operating profit and operating profit margin decreased for 2019 and 2018 primarily due
to the goodwill impairment charges recorded in 2019 and 2018. 2019 operating profit and operating profit margin also were
negatively impacted by the effect of government reimbursement reductions and lower sales volume in the U.K. and the increased
competition in France, partially offset by market growth. 2018 operating profit and operating profit margin were negatively
impacted by the effect of government reimbursement reductions in the U.K.
Medical-Surgical Solutions: Operating profit decreased for 2019 primarily due to higher restructuring charges, partially offset
by market growth. Operating profit margin for 2019 decreased primarily due to higher restructuring charges and changes in our mix
of business, partially offset by ongoing cost management. Operating profit and operating profit margin for 2018 increased primarily
due to higher bad debt expense in 2017. In addition, 2018 operating profit increased due to market growth.
Other:
Operating profit for Other increased for 2019 and decreased in 2018. Operating profit for Other in 2019, 2018 and 2017 were
affected by the following significant items:
2019
•Market growth in our MRxTS business;
•Lower operating profit due to the 2018 sale of our EIS business;
•Escrow settlement gain of $97 million (pre-tax) related to our 2017 acquisition of Rexall Health;
•Pre-tax credit of $90 million resulting from the derecognition of a TRA liability payable to the shareholders of Change
Healthcare;
•Higher restructuring and asset impairment charges related to closures of our retail pharmacy stores in Canada;
•Lower amount of our proportionate share of losses from our equity method investment in Change Healthcare during 2019;
•Pre-tax goodwill and long-lived asset impairment charges of $56 million recognized for our Rexall Health retail business;
•Pre-tax gain of $56 million from the divestiture of an equity investment; and
•Government imposed generic price cuts in Canada.
2018
•Lower operating profit due to the 2017 contribution of the Core MTS Business to the Change Healthcare joint venture;
•Pre-tax goodwill charges of $455 million and long-lived asset impairment charges of $33 million recognized for our
Rexall Health retail business;
•Market growth in our MRxTS business;
•Our proportionate share of losses from our equity method investment in Change Healthcare during 2018;
•$109 million pre-tax gain from the sale of our EIS business in 2018;
•$46 million pre-tax credit representing a reduction of our TRA liability related to the adoption of the 2017 Tax Act; and
•Pre-tax gain of $37 million resulting from the finalization of net working capital and other adjustments related to the
contribution of the Core MTS Business to Change Healthcare.
2017
•Pre-tax gain of $3,947 million related to the 2017 contribution of the Core MTS Business to the Change Healthcare joint
venture; and
•Non-cash pre-tax goodwill impairment charge of $290 million related to our EIS reporting unit.
39
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Corporate: Corporate expenses, net, increased for 2019 primarily due to an increase in opioid-related costs, higher
restructuring-related charges and costs for technology initiatives. Corporate expenses, net, increased for 2018 primarily due to a
charitable contribution expense of $100 million and higher professional fees incurred for Corporate initiatives.
Loss on Debt Extinguishment: In 2018, we recognized a pre-tax loss on debt extinguishment of $122 million ($78 million
after-tax) primarily representing premiums related to our February 2018 tender offers to redeem a portion of our existing
outstanding long-term debt.
Interest Expense: Interest expense decreased over the last two years primarily due to the refinancing of debt at lower interest
rates, partially offset by an increase in the issuance of commercial paper. Interest expense fluctuates based on timing, amounts and
interest rates of term debt repaid and new term debt issued, as well as amounts incurred associated with financing fees.
Foreign Operations
Our foreign operations represented approximately 18%, 18% and 17% of our consolidated revenues in 2019, 2018 and 2017.
Foreign operations are subject to certain risks, including currency fluctuations. We monitor our operations and adopt strategies
responsive to changes in the economic and political environment in each of the countries in which we operate. We conduct our
business worldwide in local currencies including Euro, British pound sterling and Canadian dollar. As a result, the comparability of
our results reported in U.S. dollars can be affected by changes in foreign currency exchange rates.  In discussing our operating
results, we may use the term “foreign currency effect”, which refers to the effect of changes in foreign currency exchange rates
used to convert the local currency results of foreign countries where the functional currency is not the U.S. dollar. We present this
information to provide a framework for assessing how our business performed excluding the effect of foreign currency rate
fluctuations.  In computing foreign currency effect, we translate our current year results in local currencies into U.S dollars by
applying average foreign exchange rates of the corresponding prior year periods, and we subsequently compare those results to the
previously reported results of the comparable prior year periods in U.S. dollars. Additional information regarding our foreign
operations is included in Financial Note 28, “Segments of Business,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Business Combinations
Refer to Financial Note 4, “Business Combinations,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report
on Form 10-K for additional information.
Fiscal 2020 Outlook
Information regarding the Company’s fiscal 2020 outlook is contained in our Forms 8-K and 8-K/A dated May 8, 2019. These
Forms should be read in conjunction with the sections Item 1 - Business - Forward-Looking Statements and Item 1A - Risk Factors
in Part I of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
We consider an accounting estimate to be critical if the estimate requires us to make assumptions about matters that were
uncertain at the time the accounting estimate was made and if different estimates that we reasonably could have used in the current
period, or changes in the accounting estimate that are reasonably likely to occur from period to period, could have a material impact
on our financial condition or results from operations. Below are the estimates that we believe are critical to the understanding of our
operating results and financial condition. Other accounting policies are described in Financial Note 1, “Significant Accounting
Policies,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Because of the uncertainty
inherent in such estimates, actual results may differ from these estimates.
40
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Allowance for Doubtful Accounts: We provide short-term credit and other customer financing arrangements to customers who
purchase our products and services. Other customer financing primarily relates to guarantees provided to our customers, or their
creditors, regarding the repurchase of inventories. We also provide financing to certain customers related to the purchase of
pharmacies, which serve as collateral for the loans. We estimate the receivables for which we do not expect full collection based on
historical collection rates and specific knowledge regarding the current creditworthiness of our customers and record an allowance
in our consolidated financial statements for these amounts.
In determining the appropriate allowance for doubtful accounts, which includes general and specific reserves, the Company
reviews accounts receivable aging, industry trends, customer financial strength, credit standing, historical write-off trends and
payment history to assess the probability of collection. If the frequency and severity of customer defaults due to our customers’
financial condition or general economic conditions change, our allowance for uncollectible accounts may require adjustment. As a
result, we continuously monitor outstanding receivables and other customer financing and adjust allowances for accounts where
collection may be in doubt. During 2019, sales to our ten largest customers, including group purchasing organizations (“GPOs”)
accounted for approximately 49.9% of our total consolidated revenues. Sales to our largest customer, CVS Health (“CVS”),
accounted for approximately 19.4% of our total consolidated revenues. At March 31, 2019, trade accounts receivable from our ten
largest customers were approximately 31.9% of total trade accounts receivable. Accounts receivable from CVS were approximately
18.4% of total trade accounts receivable. As a result, our sales and credit concentration is significant. We also have agreements with
GPOs, each of which functions as a purchasing agent on behalf of member hospitals, pharmacies and other healthcare providers, as
well as with government entities and agencies. The accounts receivables balances are with individual members of the GPOs, and
therefore no significant concentration of credit risk exists. A material default in payment, a material reduction in purchases from
these or any other large customers, or the loss of a large customer or GPO could have a material adverse impact on our financial
position, results of operations and liquidity.
Reserve methodologies are assessed annually based on historical losses and economic, business and market trends. In addition,
reserves are reviewed quarterly and updated if unusual circumstances or trends are present. We believe the reserves maintained and
expenses recorded in 2019 are appropriate and consistent with historical methodologies employed. At this time, we are not aware of
any internal process or customer issues that might lead to a significant increase in our allowance for doubtful accounts as a
percentage of net revenue in the foreseeable future.
At March 31, 2019, trade and notes receivables were $15,329 million prior to allowances of $273 million. In 2019, 2018 and
2017, our provision for bad debts was $132 million, $44 million and $93 million. At March 31, 2019 and 2018, the allowance as a
percentage of trade and notes receivables was 1.8% and 1.3%. An increase or decrease of a hypothetical 0.1% in the 2019
allowance as a percentage of trade and notes receivables would result in an increase or decrease in the provision for bad debts of
approximately $15 million. The selected 0.1% hypothetical change does not reflect what could be considered the best or worst-case
scenarios. Additional information concerning our allowance for doubtful accounts may be found in Schedule II included in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Inventories: Inventories consist of merchandise held for resale. Prior to 2018, we reported inventories at the lower of cost or
market (“LCM”). Effective in the first quarter of 2018, we report inventories at the lower of cost or net realizable value, except for
inventories determined using the LIFO method. The majority of the cost of domestic inventories is determined using the LIFO
method. The majority of the cost of inventories held in foreign locations is based on first-in, first-out method and weighted average
purchase prices. Rebates, cash discounts and other incentives received from vendors relating to the purchase or distribution of
inventory are considered as product discounts and are accounted for as a reduction in the cost of inventory and are recognized when
the inventory is sold. Total inventories, net were $16,709 million and $16,310 million at March 31, 2019 and 2018.
The LIFO method was used to value approximately 62% and 63% of our inventories at March 31, 2019 and 2018. If we had
used the moving average method of inventory valuation, inventories would have been approximately $696 million and
$906 million higher than the amounts reported at March 31, 2019 and 2018. These amounts are equivalent to our LIFO reserves.
Our LIFO valuation amount includes both pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical products. We recognized LIFO credits of $210
million, $99 million and $7 million in 2019, 2018 and 2017 within our consolidated statements of operations. A LIFO charge is
recognized when the net effect of price increases on pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical products held in inventory exceeds the
impact of price declines, including the effect of branded pharmaceutical products that have lost market exclusivity. A LIFO credit is
recognized when the net effect of price declines exceeds the impact of price increases on pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical
products held in inventory.
41
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
We believe that moving average inventory costing method provides a reasonable estimation of the current cost of replacing
inventory (i.e., “market”).  As such, our LIFO inventory is valued at the lower of LIFO or market.  As of March 31, 2019 and 2018,
inventories at LIFO did not exceed market.
In determining whether inventory valuation allowance is required, we consider various factors including estimated quantities
of slow-moving inventory by reviewing on-hand quantities, outstanding purchase obligations and forecasted sales. Shifts in market
trends and conditions, changes in customer preferences due to the introduction of generic drugs or new pharmaceutical products or
the loss of one or more significant customers are factors that could affect the value of our inventories. We write down inventories
which are considered excess and obsolete as a result of these reviews. These factors could make our estimates of inventory
valuation differ from actual results.
Business Combinations: We account for acquired businesses using the acquisition method of accounting, which requires that
once control of a business is obtained, 100% of the assets acquired and liabilities assumed, including amounts attributed to
noncontrolling interests, be recorded at the date of acquisition at their respective fair values. Any excess of the purchase price over
the estimated fair values of the net assets acquired is recorded as goodwill. Acquisition-related expenses and related restructuring
costs are expensed as incurred.
Several valuation methods may be used to determine the fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed. For intangible
assets, we typically use a method based on the income approach. Methods under the income approach start with a forecast of all of
the expected future net cash flows associated with each asset. These cash flows are then adjusted to present value by applying an
appropriate discount rate that reflects the risk factors associated with the cash flow streams. Some of the more significant estimates
and assumptions inherent in methods based on the income approach include the amount and timing of projected future cash flows,
the discount rate selected to measure the risks inherent in the future cash flows and the assessment of the asset’s life cycle and the
competitive trends impacting the asset, including consideration of any technical, legal, regulatory, or economic barriers to entry.
Determining the useful life of an intangible asset also requires judgment as different types of intangible assets will have different
useful lives. Refer to Financial Note 4, “Business Combinations,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual
Report on Form 10-K for additional information regarding our acquisitions.
Goodwill and Long-Lived Assets: As a result of acquiring businesses, we have $9,358 million and $10,924 million of goodwill
at March 31, 2019 and 2018, $3,689 million and $4,102 million of intangible assets, net at March 31, 2019 and 2018. We perform
an impairment test on goodwill balances annually in the fourth quarter or more frequently if indicators for potential impairment
exist. Indicators that are considered include significant declines in performance relative to expected operating results, significant
changes in the use of the assets, significant negative industry or economic trends, or a significant decline in the Company’s stock
price and/or market capitalization for a sustained period of time.
Goodwill impairment testing is conducted at the reporting unit level, which is generally defined as an operating segment or a
component, one level below our operating segments, for which discrete financial information is available and segment management
regularly reviews the operating results of that reporting unit.
In 2018, we elected to early adopt on a prospective basis, the amended guidance that simplifies goodwill impairment testing by
eliminating the second step of the impairment test. The one-step impairment test under the amended guidance requires an entity to
compare the fair value of a reporting unit with its carrying amount and recognizes an impairment charge for the amount by which
the carrying amount exceeds the reporting unit’s fair value, if any.
To estimate the fair value of our reporting units, we generally use a combination of the market approach and the income
approach. Under the market approach, we estimate fair value by comparing the business to similar businesses, or guideline
companies whose securities are actively traded in public markets. Under the income approach, we use a discounted cash flow
(“DCF”) model in which cash flows anticipated over several periods, plus a terminal value at the end of that time horizon, are
discounted to their present value using an appropriate expected rate of return. In addition, we compare the aggregate of the
reporting units’ fair values to our market capitalization as further corroboration of the fair values.
42
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Estimates of fair value result from a complex series of judgments about future events and uncertainties and rely heavily on
estimates and assumptions at a point in time. Judgments made in determining an estimate of fair value may materially impact our
results of operations.  The valuations are based on information available as of the impairment review date and are based on
expectations and assumptions that have been deemed reasonable by management. Any material changes in key assumptions,
including failure to meet business plans, negative changes in government reimbursement rates, deterioration in the U.S. and global
financial markets, an increase in interest rates or an increase in the cost of equity financing by market participants within the
industry or other unanticipated events and circumstances, may decrease the projected cash flows or increase the discount rates and
could potentially result in an impairment charge. For example, some of the more significant estimates and assumptions inherent in
the goodwill impairment estimation process using the market approach include the selection of appropriate guideline companies,
the determination of market value multiples for both the guideline companies and the reporting unit, the determination of applicable
premiums and discounts based on any differences in marketability between the business and the guideline companies and for the
income approach, the required rate of return used in the DCF method, which reflects capital market conditions and the specific risks
associated with the business.  Under the income approach, the fair value estimates in the goodwill impairment analysis are highly
sensitive to the discount rates used in the discounting of expected cash flows attributable to the reporting units.  The discount rates
are the weighted average cost of capital measuring the reporting unit’s cost of debt and equity financing weighted by the percentage
of debt and percentage of equity in a company’s target capital. The unsystematic risk premium is an input factor used in calculating
discount rate that specifically addresses uncertainty related to the reporting units’ future cash flow projections. Increases in the
unsystematic risk premium increase the discount rate.
As a result of the 2019 annual goodwill impairment test, the estimated fair value of our reporting units excluding the CS and
PS reporting units exceeded their carrying value. However, other risks, expenses and future developments, such as additional
government actions, increased regulatory uncertainty and material changes in key market assumptions that we were unable to
anticipate as of the testing date may require us to further revise the projected cash flows, which could adversely affect the fair value
of our other reporting units in future periods. For example, the estimated fair value of our McKesson Canada reporting unit within
Other exceeded the carrying value of this reporting unit by 8% in 2019. The goodwill balance of this reporting unit was $1,444
million at March 31, 2019 or approximately 15% of the consolidated goodwill balance. Generally, a decline in estimated future
cash flows in excess of 12% or an increase in the discount rate in excess of 1.0% could result in an indication of goodwill
impairment for this reporting unit in future reporting periods. Refer to Financial Note 2, “Goodwill Impairment Charges” to the
consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
Currently, all of our intangible and other long-lived assets are amortized or depreciated based on the pattern of their economic
consumption or on a straight-line basis over their estimated useful lives, ranging from one to 38 years.  We review intangible assets
for impairment at an asset group level whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying value of the assets
may not be recoverable.  Determination of recoverability of intangible assets is based on the lowest level of identifiable estimated
future undiscounted cash flows resulting from use of the asset and its eventual disposition.  Measurement of any impairment loss is
based on the excess of the carrying value of the asset group over its fair value.  Assumptions and estimates about future values and
remaining useful lives of our purchased intangible assets are complex and subjective.  They can be affected by a variety of factors,
including external factors such as industry and economic trends, and internal factors such as changes in our business strategy and
our internal forecasts.
Our ongoing consideration of all the factors described previously could result in further impairment charges in the future,
which could adversely affect our net income. Refer to Financial Note 3, “Restructuring and Asset Impairment Charges” to the
consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
Restructuring Charges: We have certain restructuring reserves which require significant estimates related to the timing and
amount of future employee severance and other exit-related costs to be incurred when the restructuring actions take place. We
generally recognize employee severance costs when payments are probable and amounts are estimable. Costs related to contracts
without future benefit or contract termination are recognized at the earlier of the contract termination or the cease-use dates. Other
exit-related costs are recognized as incurred. In connection with these restructuring actions, we also assess the recoverability of
long-lived assets used in the business, and as a result, we may recognize accelerated depreciation reflecting shortened useful lives
of the underlying assets.
43
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Supplier Reserves: We establish reserves against amounts due from suppliers relating to various price and rebate incentives,
including deductions or billings taken against payments otherwise due to them. These reserve estimates are established based on
judgment after considering the status of current outstanding claims, historical experience with the suppliers, the specific incentive
programs and any other pertinent information available. We evaluate the amounts due from suppliers on a continual basis and
adjust the reserve estimates when appropriate based on changes in facts and circumstances. The final outcome of any outstanding
claims may differ from our estimate. The supplier reserves primarily pertain to our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions
segment.
Income Taxes: Our income tax expense and deferred tax assets and liabilities reflect management’s best assessment of
estimated current and future taxes to be paid. We are subject to income taxes in the U.S. and numerous foreign jurisdictions.
Significant judgments and estimates are required in determining the consolidated income tax provision and in evaluating income
tax uncertainties. We review our tax positions at the end of each quarter and adjust the balances as new information becomes
available.
Deferred income taxes arise from temporary differences between the tax and financial statement recognition of revenue and
expense. In evaluating our ability to recover our deferred tax assets, we consider all available positive and negative evidence
including our past operating results, the existence of cumulative net operating losses in the most recent years and our forecast of
future taxable income. In estimating future taxable income, we develop assumptions including the amount of future federal, state
and foreign pre-tax operating income, the reversal of temporary differences and the implementation of feasible and prudent tax
planning strategies. These assumptions require significant judgment about the forecasts of future taxable income and are consistent
with the plans and estimates we use to manage the underlying businesses.
Changes in tax laws and rates could also affect recorded deferred tax assets and liabilities in the future. Should tax laws
change, including those laws pertaining to LIFO, our tax expense and cash flows could be materially impacted.
In addition, the calculation of our tax liabilities includes estimates for uncertainties in the application of complex new tax
regulations across multiple global jurisdictions where we conduct our operations. For example, on December 22, 2017, the U.S.
government enacted comprehensive new tax legislation referred to as the 2017 Tax Act. The 2017 Tax Act made broad and complex
changes to the U.S. tax code. Refer to Financial Note 10, “Income Taxes,” to the accompanying consolidated financial statements
appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10‑K for additional information.
We recognize liabilities for tax and related interest for issues in the U.S. and other tax jurisdictions based on our estimate of
whether, and the extent to which, additional taxes and related interest will be due. If our current estimate of tax and interest
liabilities is less than the ultimate settlement, an additional charge to income tax expense may result. If our current estimate of tax
and interest liabilities is more than the ultimate settlement, a reduction to income tax expense may be recognized.
Loss Contingencies: We are subject to various claims, including claims with customers and vendors, pending and potential
legal actions for damages, investigations relating to governmental laws and regulations and other matters arising out of the normal
conduct of our business. When a loss is considered probable and reasonably estimable, we record a liability in the amount of our
best estimate for the ultimate loss. However, the likelihood of a loss with respect to a particular contingency is often difficult to
predict and determining a meaningful estimate of the loss or a range of loss may not be practicable based on the information
available and the potential effect of future events and decisions by third parties that will determine the ultimate resolution of the
contingency. Moreover, it is not uncommon for such matters to be resolved over many years, during which time relevant
developments and new information must be reevaluated at least quarterly to determine both the likelihood of potential loss and
whether it is possible to reasonably estimate a range of possible loss. When a material loss is reasonably possible or probable but a
reasonable estimate cannot be made, disclosure of the proceeding is provided.
We review all contingencies at least quarterly to determine whether the likelihood of loss has changed and to assess whether a
reasonable estimate of the potential loss or range of the loss can be made. As discussed above, development of a meaningful
estimate of loss or a range of potential loss is complex when the outcome is directly dependent on negotiations with or decisions by
third parties, such as regulatory agencies, the court system and other interested parties.
44
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
FINANCIAL CONDITION, LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
We expect our available cash generated from operations and our short-term investment portfolio, together with our existing
sources of liquidity from our credit facilities and commercial paper issuance, will be sufficient to fund our long-term and short-term
capital expenditures, working capital and other cash requirements. In addition, we may access the long-term debt capital markets
from time to time.
Net cash flow provided from operating activities was $4,036 million in 2019 compared to $4,345 million in 2018 and $4,744
million in 2017. Operating activities for 2019 were primarily affected by an increase in receivables due to overall increase in sales
volume and timing of receipts and increases in drafts and accounts payable primarily due to increased inventory purchases and
timing of payments. Operating activities for 2018 were primarily affected by a decrease in receivables primarily due to timing of
receipts and loss of customers and increases in drafts and accounts payable reflecting longer payment terms for certain purchases.
Operating activities for 2017 were primarily affected by an increase in drafts and accounts payable reflecting longer payment terms
for certain purchases and increases in receivables primarily associated with our revenue growth. Cash flows from operations can be
significantly impacted by factors such as the timing of receipts from customers and payments to vendors. Additionally, working
capital is primarily a function of sales and purchase volumes, inventory requirements and vendor payment terms. Operating
activities for 2017 included cash generated from our Core MTS business. Operating activities for 2017 were also affected by $150
million of a settlement payment.
Net cash used in investing activities was $1,381 million in 2019 compared to $2,993 million in 2018 and $3,269 million in
2017. Investing activities for 2019 include $905 million of net cash payments for acquisitions, including $784 million for our
acquisition of MSD, $426 million and $131 million in capital expenditures for property, plant and equipment, and capitalized
software, and $101 million of net cash proceeds from sales of businesses and investments.
Investing activities for 2018 include $2,893 million of net cash payments for acquisitions, including $1.3 billion and $720
million for our acquisitions of CoverMyMeds, LLC and RxCrossroads, $405 million and $175 million in capital expenditures for
property, plant and equipment, and capitalized software, $374 million of net cash proceeds from sales of businesses and
investments and $126 million cash payment received related to the Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange.
Investing activities for 2017 included $4,212 million of net cash payments for acquisitions including $2.1 billion for our
acquisition of Rexall Health, $1,226 million of net payments received on the Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange, $404
million and $158 million in capital expenditures for property, plant and equipment, and capitalized software, and $206 million of
net cash proceeds from sales of businesses and investments.
Financing activities utilized $2,227 million, $3,084 million and $2,069 million of cash in 2019, 2018 and 2017. Financing
activities for 2019 include cash receipts of $37,265 million and payments of $37,268 million from short-term borrowings (primarily
commercial paper).  We received cash from long-term debt issuances of $1,099 million and made repayments on long-term debt of
$1,112 million in 2019. Financing activities in 2019 also include $1,627 million of cash paid for stock repurchases and $292
million of dividends paid.  
Financing activities for 2018 include cash receipts of $20,542 million and payments of $20,725 million from short-term
borrowings (primarily commercial paper). We received cash from long-term debt issuances of $1,522 million and made repayments
on long-term debt of $2,287 million in 2018. Financing activities in 2018 also include $1,650 million of cash paid for stock
repurchases $262 million of dividends paid and $112 million of payments for debt extinguishment.  
Financing activities for 2017 include cash receipts of $8,294 million and payments of $8,124 million from short-term
borrowings.  We received cash from long-term debt issuances of $1,824 million and made repayments on long-term debt of $1,601
million in 2017. Financing activities in 2017 also include $2,250 million of cash paid for stock repurchases and $253 million of
dividends paid. 
The Company’s Board has authorized the repurchase of McKesson’s common stock from time-to-time in open market
transactions, privately negotiated transactions, accelerated share repurchase (“ASR”) programs, or by any combination of such
methods. The timing of any repurchases and the actual number of shares repurchased will depend on a variety of factors, including
our stock price, corporate and regulatory requirements, restrictions under our debt obligations and other market and economic
conditions.
45
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
In 2017, we repurchased 14.1 million of our shares through open market transactions and 1.4 million of our shares through an
ASR program. We received 0.3 million additional shares in April 2017 for the 2017 ASR program. In 2018, we repurchased 3.5
million of our shares through open market transactions and 6.7 million of our shares through ASR programs. We received an
additional 1.0 million shares in the first quarter of 2019 under the March 2018 ASR program. In 2019, we repurchased 10.4 million
of our shares through open market transactions and 2.1 million of our shares through the December 2018 ASR program.
In 2019, we retired 5.0 million or $542 million of the Company’s treasury shares previously repurchased. Under the applicable
state law, these shares resume the status of authorized and unissued shares upon retirement. In accordance with our accounting
policy, we allocate any excess of share repurchase price over par value between additional paid-in capital and retained earnings.
Accordingly, our retained earnings and additional paid-in capital were reduced by $472 million and $70 million during 2019.
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions, except per shar e data) 2019 2018  2017
Number of shares repurchased (1)13.5 10.5 15.5
Average price paid per share $ 130.72 $ 151.06 $ 141.16
Total value of shares repurchased (1)$ 1,627 $ 1,650 $ 2,250
(1)Excludes shares surrendered for tax withholding.
The total authorization outstanding for repurchase of the Company’s common stock was $3.5 billion at March 31, 2019.
We believe that our operating cash flow, financial assets and current access to capital and credit markets, including our existing
credit facilities, will give us the ability to meet our financing needs for the foreseeable future. However, there can be no assurance
that continued or increased volatility and disruption in the global capital and credit markets will not impair our liquidity or increase
our costs of borrowing.
Selected Measures of Liquidity and Capital Resources:
 March 31,
(Dollars in millions, except ratios) 2019  2018 2017
Cash and cash equivalents $ 2,981  $ 2,672 $ 2,783
Working capital 839  451 1,336
Debt to capital ratio (1)43.3% 40.6% 39.2%
Return on McKesson stockholders’ equity (2)0.4  0.6 54.6
(1)Ratio is computed as total debt divided by the sum of total debt and McKesson stockholders’ equity, which excludes noncontrolling and redeemable
noncontrolling interests and accumulated other comprehensive income (loss).
(2)Ratio is computed as net income attributable to McKesson Corporation for the last four quarters, divided by a five-quarter average of McKesson stockholders’
equity, which excludes noncontrolling and redeemable noncontrolling interests.
Cash equivalents, which are available-for-sale, are carried at fair value. Cash equivalents are primarily invested in AAA rated
prime and U.S. government money market funds denominated in U.S. dollars, overnight repurchase agreements collateralized by
U.S. government securities, Canadian government securities and/or securities that are guaranteed or sponsored by the U.S.
government and an AAA rated prime money market fund denominated in British pound sterling.
The remaining cash and cash equivalents are deposited with several financial institutions. We mitigate the risk of our short-
term investment portfolio by depositing funds with reputable financial institutions and monitoring risk profiles and investment
strategies of money market funds.
Our cash and cash equivalents balance as of March 31, 2019 included approximately $1,450 million of cash held by our
subsidiaries outside of the United States. Our primary intent is to utilize this cash for foreign operations for an indefinite period of
time. Although the vast majority of cash held outside the United States is available for repatriation, doing so could subject us to
foreign withholding taxes and state income taxes.  Following enactment of the 2017 Tax Act, the repatriation of cash to the United
States is generally no longer taxable for federal income tax purposes.
46
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Working capital primarily includes cash and cash equivalents, receivables and inventories net of drafts and accounts payable,
short-term borrowings, current portion of long-term debt and other current liabilities. We require a substantial investment in
working capital that is susceptible to large variations during the year as a result of inventory purchase patterns and seasonal
demands. Inventory purchase activity is a function of sales activity and other requirements.
Consolidated working capital increased at March 31, 2019 compared to March 31, 2018 primarily due to an increase in the
cash and cash equivalents, receivables, inventories and a decrease in current portion of long-term debt, partially offset by a increase
in drafts and accounts payable. Consolidated working capital decreased at March 31, 2018 compared to March 31, 2017 primarily
due to increases in drafts and accounts payable and a decrease in receivables, partially offset by an increase in inventories.
Our debt to capital ratio increased for 2019 and 2018 primarily due to a decrease in stockholders’ equity.
In July 2018, the Company’s quarterly dividend was raised from $0.34 to $0.39 per common share for dividends declared on or
after such date by the Board. Dividends were $1.51 per share in 2019, $1.30 per share in 2018 and $1.12 per share in 2017. The
Company anticipates that it will continue to pay quarterly cash dividends in the future.  However, the payment and amount of future
dividends remain within the discretion of the Board and will depend upon the Company’s future earnings, financial condition,
capital requirements and other factors. In 2019, 2018 and 2017, we paid total cash dividends of $292 million, $262 million and
$253 million. Additionally, as required under the Domination Agreement, we are obligated to pay an annual recurring compensation
amount of €0.83 per McKesson Europe share (effective January 1, 2015) to the noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe.
Contractual Obligations:
The table and information below presents our significant financial obligations and commitments at March 31, 2019:
  Years
(In millions) Total Within 1 Over 1 to 3 Over 3 to 5 After 5
On balance sheet   
Long-term debt (1)$ 7,595 $ 330 $ 1,737 $ 1,900 $ 3,628
Other (2)648 223 91 89 245
   
Off balance sheet   
Interest on borrowings (3)2,018 234 413 348 1,023
Purchase obligations (4)4,631 4,544 35 52 —
Operating lease obligations (5)2,656 454 740 526 936
Other (6)366 195 31 50 90
Total $ 17,914 $ 5,980 $ 3,047 $ 2,965 $ 5,922
(1)Represents maturities of the Company’s long-term obligations including an immaterial amount of capital lease obligations.
(2)Includes our estimated benefit payments, including assumed executive lump sum payments, for the unfunded benefit plans and minimum funding requirements
for the pension plans. Actual lump sum payments could significantly differ from the estimated amounts depending on the timing of executive retirements and
the lump sum interest rate in effect upon retirement. The estimated benefit payments do not reflect the potential effect of the termination of the U.S. defined
benefit pension plan approved by the Company’s Board of Directors on May 23, 2018.
(3)Primarily represents interest that will become due on our fixed rate long-term debt obligations.
(4)A purchase obligation is defined as an arrangement to purchase goods or services that is enforceable and legally binding on the Company. These obligations
primarily relate to inventory purchases and capital commitments.
(5)Represents minimum rental payments for operating leases.
(6)Includes agreements under which we have guaranteed the repurchase of our customers’ inventory and our customers’ debt in the event these customers are
unable to meet their obligations to those financial institutions.
The contractual obligations table above excludes the following obligations:
At March 31, 2019, the liability recorded for uncertain tax positions, excluding associated interest and penalties, was
approximately $810 million. The ultimate amount and timing of any related future cash settlements cannot be predicted with
reasonable certainty.
47
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
During 2019, we renegotiated the terms of the TRA which resulted in the extinguishment and derecognition of the $90 million
noncurrent liability.  In exchange for the shareholders of Change agreeing to extinguish the liability, we agreed to an allocation of
certain tax amortization that had the effect of reducing the amount of a distribution from the Change Healthcare joint venture that
would otherwise have been required to be made to the shareholders of Change.  As a result of the renegotiation, McKesson was
relieved from any potential future obligations associated with the noncurrent liability and recognized a pre-tax credit of $90 million
($66 million after-tax) in operating expenses in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations in 2019. 
Our banks and insurance companies have issued $165 million of standby letters of credit and surety bonds at March 31, 2019.
These were issued on our behalf and are mostly related to our customer contracts and to meet the security requirements for
statutory licenses and permits, court and fiduciary obligations and our workers’ compensation and automotive liability programs.
The carrying value of redeemable noncontrolling interests related to McKesson Europe was $1.39 billion at March 31, 2019,
which exceeded the maximum redemption value of $1.23 billion. The balance of redeemable noncontrolling interests is reported at
the greater of its carrying value or its maximum redemption value at each reporting date. Upon the effectiveness of the Domination
Agreement on December 2, 2014, the noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe received a put right that enables them to
put their McKesson Europe shares to McKesson at €22.99 per share, which price is increased annually for interest in the amount of
5 percentage points above a base rate published semiannually by the German Bundesbank, less any compensation amount or
guaranteed dividend already paid (“Put Amount”).  The redemption value is the Put Amount adjusted for exchange rate fluctuations
each period. The ultimate amount and timing of any future cash payments related to the Put Amount are uncertain. Additionally, we
are obligated to pay an annual recurring compensation of €0.83 per McKesson Europe share (the “Compensation Amount”) to the
noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe under the Domination Agreement. The Compensation Amount is recognized
ratably during the applicable annual period. The Domination Agreement does not have an expiration date and can be terminated by
McKesson without cause in writing no earlier than March 31, 2020.
Refer to Financial Note 11, “Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests and Noncontrolling Interests,” to the consolidated financial
statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information.
Credit Resources:
We fund our working capital requirements primarily with cash and cash equivalents as well as short-term borrowings from our
credit facilities and commercial paper issuances. Funds necessary for future debt maturities and our other cash requirements are
expected to be met by existing cash balances, cash flow from operations, existing credit sources and other capital market
transactions. Detailed information regarding our debt and financing activities is included in Financial Note 16, “Debt and Financing
Activities,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
RELATED PARTY BALANCES AND TRANSACTIONS
Information regarding our related party balances and transactions is included in Financial Note 26, “Related Party Balances
and Transactions,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
NEW ACCOUNTING PRONOUNCEMENTS
New accounting pronouncements that we have recently adopted, as well as those that have been recently issued but not yet
adopted by us, are included in Financial Note 1, “Significant Accounting Policies,” to the consolidated financial statements
appearing in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
48
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Concluded)
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk
Interest rate risk: Our long-term debt bears interest predominately at fixed rates, whereas our short-term borrowings are at
variable interest rates.
Our cash and cash equivalents balances earn interest at variable rates. At March 31, 2019 and 2018, we had $3.0 billion and
$2.7 billion and in cash and cash equivalents. The effect of a hypothetical 50 bp increase in the underlying interest rate on our cash
and cash equivalents, net of short-term borrowings and variable rate debt, would have resulted in a favorable impact to earnings in
2019 and 2018 of approximately $4 million and $10 million.
Foreign exchange risk: We conduct our business worldwide in U.S. dollars and the functional currencies of our foreign
subsidiaries, including Euro, British pound sterling and Canadian dollars. Changes in foreign currency exchange rates could have a
material adverse impact on our financial results that are reported in U.S. dollars. We are also exposed to foreign exchange rate risk
related to our foreign subsidiaries, including intercompany loans denominated in non-functional currencies.
We have certain foreign exchange rate risk programs that use foreign currency forward contracts and cross-currency swaps.
The forward contracts and cross-currency swaps are designated to reduce the income statement effects from fluctuations in foreign
exchange rates and have been designated as cash flow hedges. These programs reduce but do not entirely eliminate foreign
exchange risk.
As of March 31, 2019 and 2018, the effect of a hypothetical adverse 10% change in the underlying foreign currency exchange
rates would have impacted the fair value of our foreign exchange contracts by approximately $581 million and $458 million.
However, our risk management programs are designed such that the potential loss in value of these risk management portfolios
described above would be largely offset by changes in the value of the underlying exposure. Refer to Financial Note 20, “Hedging
Activities,” for more information on our foreign currency forward contracts and cross-currency swaps.
The selected hypothetical change in interest rates and foreign currency exchange rates does not reflect what could be
considered the best or worst case scenarios.
49
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
INDEX TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL INFORMATION
 Page
Management's Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting 51
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 52
Consolidated Financial Statements:
Consolidated Statements of Operations for the years ended March 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 54
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the years ended March 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 55
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of March 31, 2019 and 2018 56
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders’ Equity for the years ended March 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 57
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended March 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 58
Financial Notes 59
50
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
MANAGEMENT’S ANNUAL REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
The management of McKesson Corporation is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal
control over financial reporting, as such term is defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f). With the participation of
the Chief Executive Officer and the Chief Financial Officer, our management conducted an assessment of the effectiveness of our
internal control over financial reporting based on the framework and criteria established in Internal Control—Integrated
Framework (2013), issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this assessment,
our management has concluded that our internal control over financial reporting was effective as of March 31, 2019.
Deloitte & Touche LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, audited the financial statements included in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K and has also audited the effectiveness of the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of
March 31, 2019. This audit report appears on page 52 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
May 15, 2019
 
/s/ Brian S. Tyler
Brian S. Tyler
Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)
 
/s/ Britt J. Vitalone
Britt J. Vitalone
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)
51
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Stockholders and the Board of Directors of McKesson Corporation
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of McKesson Corporation and subsidiaries (the “Company”) as of
March 31, 2019 and 2018, the related consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, stockholders’ equity, and cash
flows, for each of the three years in the period ended March 31, 2019, and the related notes and the schedule listed in the Index at
Item 15 (collectively referred to as the “financial statements”). We also have audited the Company’s internal control over financial
reporting as of March 31, 2019, based on criteria established in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (“COSO”).
In our opinion, the financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the
Company as of March 31, 2019 and 2018, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the
period ended March 31, 2019, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Also, in
our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of March 31,
2019, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
Basis for Opinions
The Company’s management is responsible for these financial statements, for maintaining effective internal control over financial
reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the accompanying
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these
financial statements and an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audits. We are a public
accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (“PCAOB”) and are required to
be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial
statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures to respond to those risks. Such procedures included
examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included
evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall
presentation of the financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial reporting included obtaining an understanding
of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design
and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits also included performing such other
procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
52
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
 
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
San Francisco, California
May 15, 2019
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1968.
53
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
(In millions, except per share amounts)
 Years Ended March 31,
 2019 2018  2017
Revenues $ 214,319 $ 208,357 $ 198,533
Cost of Sales (202,565) (197,173) (187,262)
Gross Profit 11,754 11,184 11,271
Operating Expenses   
Selling, distribution and administrative expenses (8,403) (8,138) (7,447)
Research and development (71) (125) (341)
Goodwill impairment charges (1,797) (1,738) (290)
Restructuring and asset impairment charges (597) (567) (18)
Gain from sale of business — 109 —
Gain on healthcare technology net asset exchange, net — 37 3,947
Total Operating Expenses (10,868) (10,422) (4,149)
Operating Income 886 762 7,122
Other Income, Net 182 130 77
Loss from Equity Method Investment in Change Healthcare (194) (248) —
Loss on Debt Extinguishment — (122) —
Interest Expense (264) (283) (308)
Income from Continuing Operations Before Income Taxes 610 239 6,891
Income Tax (Expense) Benefit (356) 53 (1,614)
Income from Continuing Operations 254 292 5,277
Income (Loss) from Discontinued Operations, Net of Tax 1 5 (124)
Net Income 255 297 5,153
Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests (221) (230) (83)
Net Income Attributable to McKesson Corporation $ 34 $ 67 $ 5,070
   
Earnings (Loss) Per Common Share Attributable to
McKesson Corporation   
Diluted   
Continuing operations $ 0.17 $ 0.30 $ 23.28
Discontinued operations — 0.02 (0.55)
Total $ 0.17 $ 0.32 $ 22.73
Basic   
Continuing operations $ 0.17 $ 0.30 $ 23.50
Discontinued operations — 0.02 (0.55)
Total $ 0.17 $ 0.32 $ 22.95
   
Weighted Average Common Shares   
Diluted 197 209 223
Basic 196 208 221
See Financial Notes
54
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(In millions)
 
 Years Ended March 31,
 2019  2018 2017
Net Income $ 255 $ 297$ 5,153
    
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss), Net of Tax    
Foreign currency translation adjustments (190) 624 (632)
  
Unrealized gains (losses) on cash flow hedges 24 (30) (19)
  
Changes in retirement-related benefit plans (32) 15 (8)
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss), Net of Tax (198) 609 (659)
Comprehensive Income 57 906 4,494
Comprehensive (Income) Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests (155) (415) (4)
Comprehensive Income (Loss) Attributable to McKesson Corporation $ (98) $ 491$ 4,490
See Financial Notes
55
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In millions, except per share amounts)
 March 31,
 2019 2018
ASSETS  
Current Assets  
Cash and cash equivalents $ 2,981 $ 2,672
Receivables, net 18,246 17,711
Inventories, net 16,709 16,310
Prepaid expenses and other 529 443
Total Current Assets 38,465 37,136
Property, Plant and Equipment, Net 2,548 2,464
Goodwill 9,358 10,924
Intangible Assets, Net 3,689 4,102
Equity Method Investment in Change Healthcare 3,513 3,728
Other Noncurrent Assets 2,099 2,027
Total Assets $ 59,672 $ 60,381
LIABILITIES, REDEEMABLE NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS AND EQUITY  
Current Liabilities  
Drafts and accounts payable $ 33,853 $ 32,177
Current portion of long-term debt 330 1,129
Other accrued liabilities 3,443 3,379
Total Current Liabilities 37,626 36,685
Long-Term Debt 7,265 6,751
Long-Term Deferred Tax Liabilities 2,998 2,804
Other Noncurrent Liabilities 2,103 2,625
Commitments and Contingent Liabilities (Note 24)
Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests 1,393 1,459
McKesson Corporation Stockholders’ Equity  
Preferred stock, $0.01 par value, 100 shares authorized, no shares issued or outstanding — —
Common stock, $0.01 par value, 800 shares authorized at March 31, 2019 and 2018, 271
and 275 shares issued at March 31, 2019 and 2018 3 3
Additional Paid-in Capital 6,435 6,188
Retained Earnings 12,409 12,986
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss (1,849) (1,717)
Other (2) (1)
Treasury Stock, at Cost, 81 and 73 shares at March 31, 2019 and 2018 (8,902) (7,655)
Total McKesson Corporation Stockholders’ Equity 8,094 9,804
Noncontrolling Interests 193 253
Total Equity 8,287 10,057
Total Liabilities, Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests and Equity $ 59,672 $ 60,381
See Financial Notes
56
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY
Years Ended March 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017
(In millions, except per share amounts)
 McKesson Corporation Stockholders’ Equity   
 Common
StockAdditional
Paid-in
Capital Other
Capital Retained
EarningsAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)Treasury
 Noncontrolling
Interests Total
Equity  Shares AmountCommon
Shares Amount
Balances, March 31, 2016 271 $ 3 $ 5,845 $ (2) $8,360 $ (1,561) (46) $(3,721) $ 84 $9,008
Issuance of shares under employee plans 3 — 125   (61)  64
Share-based compensation   110      110
Tax benefit related to issuance of shares
under employee plans     7    7
Acquisition of Vantage      89 89
Other comprehensive loss    (580)   (580)
Net income     5,070  39 5,109
Repurchase of common stock (50)   (16) (2,200)  (2,250)
Cash dividends declared, $1.12 per
common share      (249)    (249)
Other (1) (2) — 1   (34) (35)
Balances, March 31, 2017 273 $ 3 $ 6,028 $ (2) $13,189 $ (2,141) (62) $(5,982) $ 178 $11,273
Issuance of shares under employee plans 2 — 126   (59)  67
Share-based compensation   67      67
Payments to noncontrolling interests        (98) (98)
Other comprehensive income      424   424
Net income      67   187 254
Repurchase of common stock   (36)   (11) (1,614)  (1,650)
Exercise of put right by noncontrolling
shareholders of McKesson Europe   3     3
Cash dividends declared, $1.30 per
common share      (270)    (270)
Other   1    (14) (13)
Balances, March 31, 2018 275 $ 3 $ 6,188 $ (1) $12,986 $ (1,717) (73) $(7,655) $ 253 $10,057
Opening Retained Earnings Adjustments:
Adoption of New Accounting Standards     154    154
Balances, April 1, 2018 275 3 6,188 (1) 13,140 (1,717) (73) (7,655) 253 10,211
Issuance of shares under employee plans 1 — 75    (12)  63
Share-based compensation   92      92
Payments to noncontrolling interests         (184) (184)
Other comprehensive loss      (132)   (132)
Net income      34   176 210
Repurchase of common stock   150   (13) (1,777)  (1,627)
Retirement of common stock (5) — (70)  (472) 5 542  —
Cash dividends declared, $1.51 per
common share      (298)    (298)
Other   (1) 5   (52) (48)
Balances, March 31, 2019 271 $ 3 $ 6,435 $ (2) $12,409 $ (1,849) (81) $(8,902) $ 193 $8,287
See Financial Notes
57
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In millions)
 Years Ended March 31,
 2019  2018  2017
Operating Activities      
Net income $ 255 $ 297 $ 5,153
Adjustments to reconcile to net cash provided by operating activities:      
Depreciation 317 303 324
Amortization 632 648 586
Gain on Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange, net — (37) (3,947)
Goodwill and other asset impairment charges 2,079 2,217 290
Loss from equity method investment in Change Healthcare 194 248 —
Deferred taxes 189 (868) 882
Credits associated with last-in, first-out inventory method (210) (99) (7)
Loss (gain) from sales of businesses and investments (86) (169) 94
Other non-cash items 52 67 203
Changes in assets and liabilities, net of acquisitions:      
Receivables (967) 1,175 (762)
Inventories (368) (458) 320
Drafts and accounts payable 1,976 271 2,070
Taxes (95) 671 146
Other 68 79 (458)
Settlement payment — — (150)
Net cash provided by operating activities 4,036 4,345 4,744
      
Investing Activities      
Payments for property, plant and equipment (426) (405) (404)
Capitalized software expenditures (131) (175) (158)
Acquisitions, net of cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash acquired (905) (2,893) (4,212)
Proceeds from sale of businesses and investments, net 101 374 206
Payments received on Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange, net — 126 1,226
Other (20) (20) 73
Net cash used in investing activities (1,381) (2,993) (3,269)
      
Financing Activities      
Proceeds from short-term borrowings 37,265 20,542 8,294
Repayments of short-term borrowings (37,268) (20,725) (8,124)
Proceeds from issuances of long-term debt 1,099 1,522 1,824
Repayments of long-term debt (1,112) (2,287) (1,601)
Payments for debt extinguishments — (112) —
Common stock transactions:     
Issuances 75 132 120
Share repurchases, including shares surrendered for tax withholding (1,639) (1,709) (2,311)
Dividends paid (292) (262) (253)
Other (355) (185) (18)
Net cash used in financing activities (2,227) (3,084) (2,069)
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (119) 150 (144)
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 309 (1,582) (738)
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of year 2,672 4,254 4,992
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of year $ 2,981 $ 2,672 $ 4,254
      
Supplemental Cash Flow Information      
Cash paid for:      
Interest $ 383 $ 298 $ 315
Income taxes, net of refunds $ 262 $ 144 $ 587
See Financial Notes
58
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES
1.Significant Accounting Policies
Nature of Operations: McKesson Corporation (“McKesson,” the “Company,” the “Registrant” or “we” and other similar
pronouns) delivers a comprehensive offering of pharmaceuticals and medical supplies and provides services to help our customers
improve the efficiency and effectiveness of their healthcare operations. Commencing in the first quarter of 2019, our new segment
reporting structure was implemented and we have reported our financial results in three reportable segments on a retrospective
basis: U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions, European Pharmaceutical Solutions and Medical-Surgical Solutions. All
remaining operating segments and business activities that are not significant enough to require separate reportable segment
disclosure are included in Other. Refer to Financial Note 28, “Segments of Business” for more information.
Basis of Presentation: The consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes are prepared in accordance with U. S.
generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”). The consolidated financial statements of McKesson include the financial
statements of all wholly-owned subsidiaries and majority-owned or controlled companies. For those consolidated subsidiaries
where our ownership is less than 100%, the portion of the net income or loss allocable to the noncontrolling interests is reported as
“Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests” on the consolidated statements of operations. All significant intercompany
balances and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation including the intercompany portion of transactions with equity
method investees.
We consider ourselves to control an entity if we are the majority owner of or have voting control over such entity. We also
assess control through means other than voting rights (“variable interest entities” or “VIEs”) and determine which business entity is
the primary beneficiary of the VIE. We consolidate VIEs when it is determined that we are the primary beneficiary of the VIE.
Investments in business entities in which we do not have control but have the ability to exercise significant influence over operating
and financial policies, are accounted for using the equity method. Refer to Financial Note 5, “Healthcare Technology Net Asset
Exchange” for further information on our equity method investment in Change Healthcare, LLC (“Change Healthcare”).
Fiscal Period: The Company’s fiscal year begins on April 1 and ends on March 31. Unless otherwise noted, all references to a
particular year shall mean the Company’s fiscal year.
Reclassifications: Certain prior year amounts have been reclassified to conform to the current year presentation.
Use of Estimates: The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires that we make estimates and
assumptions that affect the reported amounts in the consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes. Actual amounts
could differ from those estimated amounts.
Cash and Cash Equivalents: All highly liquid debt and money market instruments purchased with original maturity of three
months or less at the date of acquisition are included in cash and cash equivalents. Cash equivalents are carried at fair value. Cash
equivalents are primarily invested in AAA rated prime and U.S. government money market funds denominated in U.S. dollars,
overnight repurchase agreements collateralized by U.S. government securities, Canadian government securities and/or securities
that are guaranteed or sponsored by the U.S. government and an AAA rated prime money market fund denominated in British
pound sterling. The remaining cash and cash equivalents are deposited with several financial institutions. Deposits may exceed the
amounts insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation in the U.S. and similar deposit insurance programs in other
jurisdictions. We mitigate the risk of our short-term investment portfolio by depositing funds with reputable financial institutions
and monitoring risk profiles and investment strategies of money market funds.
Restricted Cash: Cash that is subject to legal restrictions or is unavailable for general operating purposes is classified as
restricted cash and is included within “Prepaid expenses and other” and “Other Noncurrent Assets” in the consolidated balance
sheets. At March 31, 2019 and 2018, our restricted cash balance was not material.
59
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Marketable Securities Available-for-Sale: Our marketable securities, which are available-for-sale, are carried at fair value and
are included within “Prepaid expenses and other” in the consolidated balance sheets. The unrealized gains and losses, net of the
related tax effect, computed in marking these securities to market have been reported within stockholders’ equity. At
March 31, 2019 and 2018, marketable securities were not material. In determining whether an other-than-temporary decline in
market value has occurred, we consider the duration that, and extent to which, the fair value of the investment is below its cost, the
financial condition and future prospects of the issuer or underlying collateral of a security, and our intent and ability to retain the
security in order to allow for an anticipated recovery in fair value. Other-than-temporary declines in fair value from amortized cost
for available-for-sale equity securities that we intend to sell or would more likely than not be required to sell before the expected
recovery of the amortized cost basis are charged to other income, net, in the period in which the loss occurs.
Equity Method Investments: Investments in business entities in which we do not have control, but have the ability to exercise
significant influence over operating and financial policies, are accounted for using the equity method. We evaluate our equity
method investments for impairment whenever an event or change in circumstances occurs that may have a significant adverse
impact on the carrying value of the investment. If a loss in value has occurred that is deemed to be other-than-temporary, an
impairment loss is recorded. Refer to Financial Note 5, “Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange” for further information
relating to our equity method investment in Change Healthcare, LLC (“Change Healthcare”).
Concentrations of Credit Risk and Receivables: Our trade accounts receivable are subject to concentrations of credit risk with
customers primarily in our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment. During 2019, sales to our ten largest customers,
including group purchasing organizations (“GPOs”) accounted for approximately 49.9% of our total consolidated revenues. Sales
to our largest customer, CVS Health (“CVS”), accounted for approximately 19.4% of our total consolidated revenues. At March 31,
2019, trade accounts receivable from our ten largest customers were approximately 31.9% of total trade accounts receivable.
Accounts receivable from CVS were approximately 18.4% of total trade accounts receivable. As a result, our sales and credit
concentration is significant. We also have agreements with GPOs, each of which functions as a purchasing agent on behalf of
member hospitals, pharmacies and other healthcare providers, as well as with government entities and agencies. The accounts
receivables balances are with individual members of the GPOs, and therefore no significant concentration of credit risk exists. A
material default in payment, a material reduction in purchases from these or any other large customers, or the loss of a large
customer or customer groups could have a material adverse impact on our financial condition, results of operations and liquidity. In
addition, trade receivables are subject to concentrations of credit risk with customers in the institutional, retail and healthcare
provider sectors, which can be affected by a downturn in the economy and changes in reimbursement policies. This credit risk is
mitigated by the size and diversity of the customer base as well as its geographic dispersion. We estimate the receivables for which
we do not expect full collection based on historical collection rates and ongoing evaluations of the creditworthiness of our
customers. An allowance is recorded in our consolidated financial statements for these estimated amounts.
Financing Receivables: We assess and monitor credit risk associated with financing receivables, primarily notes receivables,
through regular review of our collection experience in determining our allowance for loan losses. On an ongoing basis, we also
evaluate credit quality of our financing receivables utilizing aging of receivables and write-offs, as well as considering existing
economic conditions, to determine if an allowance is required. Financing receivables are derecognized if legal title to them has
been transferred and all related risks and rewards incidental to ownership have passed to the buyer.  As of March 31, 2019 and
2018, financing receivables and the related allowance were not material to our consolidated financial statements.
Inventories: Inventories consist of merchandise held for resale. Prior to 2018, we reported inventories at the lower of cost or
market (“LCM”). Effective in the first quarter of 2018, we report inventories at the lower of cost or net realizable value, except for
inventories determined using the last-in, first-out (“LIFO”) method. The majority of the cost of domestic inventories is determined
using the LIFO method. The majority of the cost of inventories held in foreign locations is based on first-in, first-out method and
weighted average purchase prices. Rebates, cash discounts, and other incentives received from vendors are recognized within cost
of sales upon the sale of the related inventory.
60
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The LIFO method was used to value approximately 62% and 63% of our inventories at March 31, 2019 and 2018. If we had
used the moving average method of inventory valuation, inventories would have been approximately $696 million and
$906 million higher than the amounts reported at March 31, 2019 and 2018. These amounts are equivalent to our LIFO reserves.
Our LIFO valuation amount includes both pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical products. We recognized LIFO credits of $210
million, $99 million and $7 million in 2019, 2018 and 2017 in cost of sales within our consolidated statements of operations. A
LIFO charge is recognized when the net effect of price increases on pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical products held in
inventory exceeds the impact of price declines, including the effect of branded pharmaceutical products that have lost market
exclusivity. A LIFO credit is recognized when the net effect of price declines exceeds the impact of price increases on
pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical products held in inventory.
We believe that moving average inventory costing method provides a reasonable estimation of the current cost of replacing
inventory (i.e., “market”).  As such, our LIFO inventory is valued at the lower of LIFO cost or market.  As of March 31, 2019 and
2018, inventories at LIFO did not exceed market.
Shipping and Handling Costs: We include costs to pack and deliver inventory to our customers in selling, distribution and
administrative expenses. Shipping and handling costs of $951 million, $914 million, and $814 million were recognized in 2019,
2018 and 2017.
Property, Plant and Equipment: We state our property, plant and equipment (“PPE”) at cost and depreciate them under the
straight-line method at rates designed to distribute the cost of PPE over estimated service lives ranging from one to thirty years.
When certain events or changes in operating conditions occur, an impairment assessment may be performed on the recoverability of
the carrying amounts.
Goodwill: Goodwill is tested for impairment on an annual basis in the fourth quarter or more frequently if indicators of
potential impairment exist. Impairment testing is conducted at the reporting unit level, which is generally defined as an operating
segment or one level below an operating segment (also known as a component), for which discrete financial information is
available and segment management regularly reviews the operating results of that reporting unit.
The goodwill testing requires us to compare the estimated fair value of a reporting unit to its carrying value.  If the carrying
value of the reporting unit is lower than its estimated fair value, no further evaluation is required.  If the carrying value of the
reporting unit exceeds its estimated fair value, an impairment charge is recorded for that excess, limited to the total amount of
goodwill allocated to that reporting unit. 
To estimate the fair value of our reporting units, we generally use a combination of the market approach and the income
approach. Under the market approach, we estimate fair value by comparing the business to similar businesses or guideline
companies whose securities are actively traded in public markets. Under the income approach, we use a discounted cash flow
(“DCF”) model in which cash flows anticipated over future periods, plus a terminal value at the end of that time horizon, are
discounted to their present value using an estimated expected rate of return. Other estimates inherent in both the market and income
approaches include long-term growth rates, projected revenues, earnings and cash flow forecasts for the reporting units. In addition,
we compare the aggregate of the reporting units’ fair values to the Company’s market capitalization as a further corroboration of the
fair values. Goodwill testing requires a complex series of assumptions and judgments by management in projecting future operating
results, selecting guideline companies for comparisons and assessing risks. The use of alternative assumptions and estimates could
affect the fair values and change the impairment determinations.
Intangible Assets: Currently all of our intangible assets are subject to amortization and are amortized based on the pattern of
their economic consumption or on a straight-line basis over their estimated useful lives, ranging from one to 38 years. We review
intangible assets for impairment at an asset group level whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying
value of the assets may not be recoverable. Determination of recoverability is based on the lowest level of identifiable estimated
future undiscounted cash flows resulting from use of the asset and its eventual disposition. Measurement of any impairment loss is
based on the excess of the carrying value of the asset group over its estimated fair market value.
Capitalized Software Held for Internal Use: We capitalize costs of software held for internal use during the application
development stage of a project and amortize those costs over their estimated useful lives ranging from one to ten years. As of
March 31, 2019 and 2018, capitalized software held for internal use was $394 million and $425 million, net of accumulated
amortization of $1,246 million and $1,182 million, and was included in other noncurrent assets in the consolidated balance sheets.
61
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Insurance Programs: Under our insurance programs, we seek to obtain coverage for catastrophic exposures as well as those
risks required to be insured by law or contract. It is our policy to retain a significant portion of certain losses primarily related to
workers’ compensation and comprehensive general, product and vehicle liability. Provisions for losses expected under these
programs are recorded based on our estimate of the aggregate liability for claims incurred as well as for claims incurred but not yet
reported. Such estimates utilize certain actuarial assumptions followed in the insurance industry.
Revenue Recognition: Revenue is recognized when an entity satisfies a performance obligation by transferring control of a
promised good or service to a customer in an amount that reflects the consideration to which the entity expects to be entitled for
that good or service.
Revenues generated from the distribution of pharmaceutical and medical products represent the majority of our revenues. We
order product from the manufacturer, receive and carry the product at our central distribution facilities and deliver the product
directly to our customers’ warehouses, hospitals or retail pharmacies. The distribution business primarily generates revenue from a
contract related to a confirmed purchase order with a customer in a distribution arrangement. Revenue is recognized when control
of goods is transferred to the customer which occurs upon our delivery to the customer or upon customer pick-up. We also earn
revenues from a variety of other sources including our retail, services and technology businesses. Retail revenues are recognized at
the point of sale. Service revenues, including technology service revenues, are recognized when services are rendered. Revenues
derived from distribution and retail business at the point of sale, and revenues derived from services represent approximately 98%
and 2% of total revenues for the year ended on March 31, 2019.  
Revenues are recorded gross when we are the principal in the transaction, have the ability to direct the use of the goods or
services prior to transfer to a customer, are responsible for fulfilling the promise to our customer, have latitude in establishing
prices, and control the relationship with the customer. We record our revenues net of sales taxes. Revenues are measured based on
the amount of consideration that we expect to receive, reduced by estimates for return allowances, discounts and rebates using
historical data. Sales returns from customers were approximately $2.9 billion in 2019, and $3.1 billion in 2018 and 2017. Assets for
the right to recover products from customers and the associated refund liabilities for return allowances were not material as of
March 31, 2019. Shipping and handling costs associated with outbound freight after control over a product has transferred to a
customer are accounted for as fulfillment costs and are included in selling, distribution and administrative expenses. We record
deferred revenues when payments are received or due in advance of our performance. Deferred revenues are primarily from our
services arrangements and are recognized as revenues over the periods when services are performed.
We had no material contract assets, contract liabilities or deferred contract costs recorded on the consolidated balance sheets.
We elected the practical expedient and generally expense costs to obtain a contract when incurred because the amortization period
would have been one year or less.
Supplier Incentives: Fees for services and other incentives received from suppliers, relating to the purchase or distribution of
inventory, are considered product discounts and are generally reported as a reduction to cost of sales.
Supplier Reserves: We establish reserves against amounts due from suppliers relating to various fees for services and price and
rebate incentives, including deductions taken against payments otherwise due to them. These reserve estimates are established
based on judgment after considering the status of current outstanding claims, historical experience with the suppliers, the specific
incentive programs and any other pertinent information available. We evaluate the amounts due from suppliers on a continual basis
and adjust the reserve estimates when appropriate based on changes in facts and circumstances. Adjustments to supplier reserves
are generally included within cost of sales. The ultimate outcome of any outstanding claims may be different than our estimate. The
supplier reserves primarily pertain to our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment.
Income Taxes: We account for income taxes under the asset and liability method, which requires the recognition of deferred tax
assets and liabilities for the expected future tax consequences of events that have been included in the financial statements or the
tax returns. Under this method, deferred tax assets and liabilities are determined based on the difference between the financial
statements and the tax basis of assets and liabilities using enacted tax rates in effect for the year in which the differences are
expected to reverse. Tax benefits from uncertain tax positions are recognized when it is more likely than not that the position will
be sustained upon examination, including resolutions of any related appeals or litigation processes, based on the technical merits.
The amount recognized is measured as the largest amount of tax benefit that is greater than 50 percent likely of being realized upon
effective settlement. Deferred taxes are not provided on undistributed earnings of our foreign operations that are considered to be
permanently reinvested.
62
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Foreign Currency Translation: The reporting currency of the Company and its subsidiaries is the U.S. dollar. Our foreign
subsidiaries generally consider their local currency to be their functional currency. Foreign currency-denominated assets and
liabilities of these foreign subsidiaries are translated into U.S. dollars at period-end exchange rates, while revenues and expenses
are translated at average exchange rates during the corresponding period and stockholders’ equity accounts are primarily translated
at historical exchange rates. Foreign currency translation adjustments are included in other comprehensive income or loss in the
consolidated statements of comprehensive income, and the cumulative effect is included in the stockholders’ equity section of the
consolidated balance sheets. Realized gains and losses from currency exchange transactions are recorded in operating expenses in
the consolidated statements of operations and were not material to our consolidated results of operations in 2019, 2018 or 2017. We
release cumulative translation adjustments from stockholders’ equity into earnings as a gain or loss only upon complete or
substantially complete liquidation of a controlling interest in a subsidiary or a group of assets within a foreign entity.  We also
release all or a pro rata portion of the cumulative translation adjustments into earnings upon the sale of an equity method
investment that is a foreign entity. 
Derivative Financial Instruments: Derivative financial instruments are used principally in the management of foreign currency
exchange and interest rate exposures and are recorded on the consolidated balance sheets at fair value. If a derivative is designated
as a fair value hedge, the changes in the fair value of the derivative and of the hedged item attributable to the hedged risk are
recognized in earnings. We use foreign currency-denominated notes and cross-currency swaps to hedge a portion of our net
investment in our foreign subsidiaries.  We use cash flow hedges primarily to reduce the effects of foreign currency exchange rate
risk related to intercompany loans denominated in non-functional currencies. If the financial instrument is designated as a cash flow
hedge or net investment hedge, the effective portions of changes in the fair value of the derivative are included in other
comprehensive income or loss in the consolidated statements of comprehensive income, and the cumulative effect is included in the
stockholders’ equity section of the consolidated balance sheets. The cumulative changes in fair value are reclassified to the same
line as the hedged item in the consolidated statements of operations when the hedged item affects earnings. We evaluate hedge
effectiveness at inception and on an ongoing basis, and ineffective portions of changes in the fair value of cash flow hedges and net
investment hedges are recognized in earnings following the date when ineffectiveness was identified. In the fourth quarter of 2018,
we adopted amended guidance for derivatives and hedging which eliminates the existing requirement to recognize periodic hedge
ineffectiveness in earnings for cash flow hedges and net investment hedges that are highly effective. The adoption had no material
impact on our financial statements as there was no ineffectiveness recognized on our cash flow hedges or net investment hedges
prior to adoption. Derivative instruments not designated as hedges are marked-to-market at the end of each accounting period with
the change included in earnings.
Comprehensive Income: Comprehensive income consists of two components, net income and other comprehensive income.
Other comprehensive income refers to revenue, expenses and gains and losses that under GAAP are recorded as an element of
stockholders’ equity but are excluded from earnings. Our other comprehensive income primarily consists of foreign currency
translation adjustments from those subsidiaries where the local currency is the functional currency including gains and losses on net
investment hedges, unrealized gains and losses on cash flow hedges, as well as unrealized gains and losses on retirement-related
benefit plans.
Noncontrolling Interests and Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests: Noncontrolling interests represent the portion of profit or
loss, net assets and comprehensive income that is not allocable to McKesson Corporation. Net income attributable to
noncontrolling interests included recurring compensation that McKesson is obligated to pay to the noncontrolling shareholders of
McKesson Europe AG (“McKesson Europe”), formerly known as Celesio AG, under the domination and profit and loss transfer
agreement. Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests also included third-party equity interests in our consolidated entities
including Vantage Oncology Holdings, LLC (“Vantage”) and ClarusONE Sourcing Services LLP (“ClarusONE”), which was
established between McKesson and Walmart, Inc in 2017. Noncontrolling interests with redemption features, such as put rights,
that are not solely within the Company’s control are considered redeemable noncontrolling interests.  Redeemable noncontrolling
interests are presented outside of stockholders’ equity on our consolidated balance sheets. Refer to Financial Note 11, “Redeemable
Noncontrolling Interests and Noncontrolling Interests,” for more information.
Share-Based Compensation: We account for all share-based compensation transactions at fair value. The share-based
compensation expense, for the portion of the awards that is ultimately expected to vest, is recognized on a straight-line basis over
the requisite service period. The share-based compensation expense recognized has been classified in the consolidated statements
of operations in the same manner as cash compensation paid to our employees.
63
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Loss Contingencies: We are subject to various claims, including claims with customers and vendors, pending and potential
legal actions for damages, investigations relating to governmental laws and regulations and other matters arising out of the normal
conduct of our business. When a loss is considered probable and reasonably estimable, we record a liability in the amount of our
best estimate for the ultimate loss. However, the likelihood of a loss with respect to a particular contingency is often difficult to
predict and determining a meaningful estimate of the loss or a range of loss may not be practicable based on the information
available and the potential effect of future events and decisions by third parties that will determine the ultimate resolution of the
contingency. Moreover, it is not uncommon for such matters to be resolved over many years, during which time relevant
developments and new information must be reevaluated at least quarterly to determine both the likelihood of potential loss and
whether it is possible to reasonably estimate the loss or a range of possible loss. When a material loss is reasonably possible or
probable but a reasonable estimate cannot be made, disclosure of the proceeding is provided.
We review all contingencies at least quarterly to determine whether the likelihood of loss has changed and to assess whether a
reasonable estimate of the loss or a range of the loss can be made. As discussed above, development of a meaningful estimate of
loss or a range of potential loss is complex when the outcome is directly dependent on negotiations with or decisions by third
parties, such as regulatory agencies, the court system and other interested parties.
Restructuring Charges: Employee severance costs are generally recognized when payments are probable and amounts are
reasonably estimable. Costs related to contracts without future benefit or contract termination are recognized at the earlier of the
contract termination or the cease-use dates.  Other exit-related costs are recognized as incurred.
Business Combinations: We account for acquired businesses using the acquisition method of accounting, which requires that
once control of a business is obtained, 100% of the assets acquired and liabilities assumed, including amounts attributable to
noncontrolling interests, be recorded at the date of acquisition at their respective fair values. Any excess of the purchase price over
the estimated fair values of the net assets acquired is recorded as goodwill. Acquisition-related expenses including transaction and
integration costs are expensed as incurred.
Several valuation methods may be used to determine the fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed.  For intangible
assets, we typically use a method that is a form or variation of the income approach. Income approach methods start with a forecast
of all of the expected future net cash flows for each asset.  These cash flows are then adjusted to present value by applying an
appropriate discount rate that reflects the risk factors associated with the cash flow streams.  Some of the more significant estimates
and assumptions inherent in income approach methods include the amount and timing of projected future cash flows, the discount
rate selected to measure the risks inherent in the future cash flows and the assessment of the asset’s life cycle and the competitive
trends impacting the asset, including consideration of any technical, legal, regulatory, or economic barriers to entry.  Determining
the useful life of an intangible asset also requires judgment as different types of intangible assets will have different useful lives and
certain assets may even be considered to have indefinite useful lives.
Recently Adopted Accounting Pronouncements
Revenue Recognition: In the first quarter of 2019, we adopted amended guidance for revenue recognition using the modified
retrospective method and applied the amended guidance to those contracts which were not completed as of April 1, 2018. The
adoption of this amended guidance did not have a material impact on our consolidated financial statements. Our equity method
investee, Change Healthcare, is required to adopt the amended guidance in our first quarter of 2020. The adoption of this amended
guidance by Change Healthcare is not expected to have a material effect on our consolidated financial statements.
We elected the practical expedient to not disclose the value of unsatisfied performance obligations for (i) contracts with an
original expected length of one year or less, (ii) contracts for which we recognize revenue at the amount to which we have the right
to invoice for services performed and (iii) contracts for which the variable consideration is allocated entirely to a wholly unsatisfied
performance obligation or to a wholly unsatisfied promise to transfer a distinct good or service that forms part of a single
performance obligation.
Share-Based Payments: In the first quarter of 2019, we prospectively adopted amended guidance for employee share-based
payment awards. This amendment provides guidance on which changes to terms or conditions of a share-based payment award
require an entity to apply modification accounting. Under the amended guidance, we are required to account for the effects of a
modification of the fair value, the vesting conditions or the classification (as an equity instrument or a liability instrument) of the
modified award from that of the original award immediately before the modification. The adoption of this amended guidance did
not have a material effect on our consolidated financial statements.
64
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Compensation - Retirement Benefits: In the first quarter of 2019, we retrospectively adopted amended guidance which requires
us to report the service cost component of defined benefit pension plans and other postretirement plans in the same line item as
other compensation costs arising from services rendered by the pertinent employees during the period. Other components of net
benefit costs are required to be presented in the statements of operations separately from the service cost component outside of
operating income. The adoption of this amended guidance did not have a material effect on our consolidated financial statements.
This amended guidance only resulted in a change in presentation of other components of net benefit costs on our consolidated
statement of operations (a reclassification from operating income to other income, net).
Derecognition of Nonfinancial Assets: In the first quarter of 2019, we adopted on a modified retrospective basis amended
guidance that defines the term “in substance nonfinancial asset” as a financial asset promised to a counterparty in a contract if
substantially all of the fair value of the asset that is promised is concentrated in nonfinancial assets. The scope of this amendment
includes nonfinancial assets transferred within a legal entity including a parent entity’s transfer of nonfinancial assets by
transferring ownership interests in consolidated subsidiaries. The amendment excludes all businesses and nonprofit activities from
its scope and therefore all entities, with limited exceptions, are required to account for the derecognition of a business or nonprofit
activity in accordance with the consolidation guidance once this amended guidance becomes effective. The adoption of this
amended guidance did not have a material effect on our consolidated financial statements.
Business Combinations: In the first quarter of 2019, we prospectively adopted amended guidance that clarifies the definition of
a business to assist entities in evaluating whether transactions should be accounted for as acquisitions of assets or businesses. The
amended guidance provides a practical screen to determine when an integrated set of assets and activities (collectively referred to
as a “set”) is not a business. The screen requires that when substantially all of the fair value of the gross assets acquired is
concentrated in a single identifiable asset or a group of similar identifiable assets, the set is not a business. If the screen is not met,
the amended guidance requires that to be considered a business, a set must include an input and a substantive process that together
significantly contribute to the ability to create output. The adoption of this amended guidance did not have a material effect on our
consolidated financial statements.
Restricted Cash: In the first quarter of 2019, we retrospectively adopted amended guidance that requires restricted cash and
restricted cash equivalents to be included with cash and cash equivalents when reconciling the beginning-of-period and end-of-
period total cash amounts shown on the statement of cash flows. Transfers between cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash or
restricted cash equivalents are not reported as cash flow activities in the statement of cash flows. Our restricted cash balances at
March 31, 2019 and 2018 were not material. The adoption of this amended guidance had no effect on our consolidated statements
of operations, comprehensive income or our balance sheets. This amended guidance resulted in a change in presentation of
restricted cash on our consolidated statement of cash flows.
Income Taxes - Intra-Entity Transfers of Assets Other Than Inventory: In the first quarter of 2019, we adopted on a modified
retrospective basis amended guidance that requires entities to recognize income tax consequences of an intra-entity transfer of an
asset other than inventory when the transfer occurs. Upon adoption of this amended guidance, we recorded $152 million of deferred
tax assets with a corresponding cumulative-effect increase to the beginning balance of retained earnings in our consolidated
financial statements for the tax consequences relating to an intra-entity transfer of certain software in December 2016.
Statement of Cash Flows - Classification of Certain Cash Receipts and Cash Payments: In the first quarter of 2019, we
retrospectively adopted amended guidance that provides clarification on cash flow classification related to eight specific issues
including contingent consideration payments made after a business combination and distributions received from equity method
investees. The adoption of this amended guidance did not have a material effect on our consolidated financial statements.
Financial Instruments: In the first quarter of 2019, we adopted amended guidance that requires investments in equity
securities, excluding equity method investments or investees that are consolidated, to be measured at fair value with changes in fair
value recognized in net income and enhanced disclosures about those investments. The amended guidance also simplifies the
impairment assessments of equity investments without readily determinable fair value. The adoption of this amended guidance did
not have a material effect on our consolidated financial statements.
65
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Recently Issued Accounting Pronouncements Not Yet Adopted
Collaborative Arrangements: In November 2018, amended guidance was issued which clarifies that certain transactions
between participants in a collaborative arrangement should be accounted for under revenue recognition guidance when the
counterparty is a customer. The amended guidance is effective for us in the first quarter of 2021 on a retrospective basis with a
cumulative-effect adjustment to beginning retained earnings. We may elect to apply this amended guidance retrospectively either to
all contracts or only to contracts that are not completed at the date of initial adoption. Early adoption is permitted. We are currently
evaluating the impact of this amended guidance on our consolidated financial statements.
Derivatives and Hedging:  In October 2018, amended guidance was issued which allowed for the inclusion of the Secured
Overnight Financing Rate Overnight Index Swap Rate as a benchmark interest rate for hedge accounting purposes. The amended
guidance is effective for us on a prospective basis for qualifying new or redesignated hedging relationships entered into on or after
the first quarter of 2020. Early adoption is permitted. We do not expect the adoption of this amended guidance to have a material
impact on our consolidated financial statements.
Disclosure Update and Simplification: In August 2018, the Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”) issued a final rule to
simplify certain disclosure requirements. In addition, the amendments expanded the disclosure requirements on the analysis of
stockholders’ equity for interim financial statements. In August and September 2018, further amendments were issued to provide
implementation and transition guidance on adoption of this SEC rule. The amended guidance is effective for us commencing in the
first quarter of 2020. We do not expect the adoption of this amended guidance to have a material effect on our consolidated
statements of operations, comprehensive income, balance sheets or cash flows. This amended guidance will result in changes in
disclosures.
Intangibles - Goodwill and Other - Internal-Use Software: In August 2018, amended guidance was issued for a customer’s
accounting for implementation and other upfront costs incurred in a cloud computing arrangement that is a service contract. The
amended guidance aligns the requirements for capitalizing implementation costs incurred in a cloud computing arrangement that is
a service contract with the requirements for capitalizing implementation costs for a cloud computing arrangement that has a
software license. The amended guidance is effective for us either on a retrospective or prospective basis commencing in the first
quarter of 2021. Early adoption is permitted. We are currently evaluating the impact of this amended guidance on our consolidated
financial statements.
Compensation - Retirement Benefits - Defined Benefit Plans: In August 2018, amended guidance was issued for defined benefit
pension or other postretirement plans. The amended guidance requires us to disclose the weighted-average interest crediting rates
for cash balance plans and other plans with promised interest crediting rates, and an explanation of reasons for significant gains and
losses related to changes in the benefit obligation for the period. The amended guidance also requires us to remove disclosures on
the amounts in accumulated other comprehensive income expected to be recognized as components of net periodic benefit costs
over the next fiscal year. The amended guidance is effective for us on a retrospective basis commencing in the fiscal year ended
March 31, 2021. Early adoption is permitted. We do not expect the adoption of this amended guidance to have a material effect on
our consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, balance sheets or cash flows. This amended guidance will result
in changes in disclosures.
Fair Value Measurement: In August 2018, amended guidance was issued to remove, modify and add disclosure requirements
on the fair value measurements. The amended guidance removes disclosure requirements for transfers between Level 1 and Level 2
measurements and valuation processes for Level 3 measurements but adds new disclosure requirements including changes in
unrealized gains or losses in other comprehensive income related to recurring Level 3 measurements. The amended guidance is
effective for us commencing in the first quarter of 2021. Certain requirements will be applied prospectively while other changes
will be applied retrospectively upon the effective date. Early adoption is permitted. We do not expect the adoption of this amended
guidance to have a material effect on our consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, balance sheets or cash
flows. This amended guidance will result in changes in disclosures.
66
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income: In February 2018, amended guidance was issued to address a narrow-scope
financial reporting issue that arose as a consequence of the 2017 Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the “2017 Tax Act”). Existing guidance
requires that deferred tax liabilities and assets be adjusted for a change in tax laws with the effect included in income from
continuing operations in the reporting period that includes the enactment date. That guidance is applicable even in situations in
which the related income tax effects of items in accumulated other comprehensive income were originally recognized in other
comprehensive income rather than in net income, such as amounts related to benefit plans and hedging activity. As a result, the tax
effects of items within accumulated other comprehensive income do not reflect the appropriate tax rate. These differences are
referred to as stranded tax effects. The amended guidance allows for a reclassification of only those amounts related to the 2017
Tax Act to retained earnings thereby eliminating the stranded tax effects. The amended guidance also requires certain disclosures
about stranded tax effects. The amended guidance is effective for us commencing in the first quarter of 2020 on a prospective or
retrospective basis. Early adoption is permitted. We do not expect the adoption of this amended guidance to have a material effect
on our consolidated financial statements.
Premium Amortization of Purchased Callable Debt Securities: In March 2017, amended guidance was issued to shorten the
amortization period for certain callable debt securities held at a premium. The amended guidance requires the premium of callable
debt securities to be amortized to the earliest call date but does not require an accounting change for securities held at a discount as
they would still be amortized to maturity. The amended guidance is effective for us on a modified retrospective basis commencing
in the first quarter of 2020. Early adoption is permitted. We do not expect the adoption of this amended guidance to have a material
effect on our consolidated financial statements.
Financial Instruments - Credit Losses: In June 2016, amended guidance was issued, which will change the impairment model
for most financial assets and require additional disclosures. The amended guidance requires financial assets that are measured at
amortized cost be presented at the net amount expected to be collected. The allowance for credit losses is a valuation account that is
deducted from the amortized cost basis of financial assets. The amended guidance also requires us to consider historical experience,
current conditions, and reasonable and supportable forecasts that affect the collectability of the reported amount in estimating credit
losses. The amended guidance becomes effective for us commencing in the first quarter of 2021 and will be applied through a
cumulative-effect adjustment to the beginning retained earnings in the year of adoption. Early adoption is permitted. We are
currently evaluating the impact of this amended guidance on our consolidated financial statements.
Leases: In February 2016, amended guidance was issued for lease arrangements. The amended guidance requires lessees to
recognize lease liabilities and right-of-use (“ROU”) assets on the balance sheet for all leases and to provide enhanced disclosures
on key information of leasing arrangements. The amended guidance is effective for us commencing in the first quarter of 2020.
Early adoption is permitted. We will adopt the amended guidance on a modified retrospective basis through a cumulative-effect
adjustment to the beginning retained earnings in the period of adoption.
We will elect the transition package of practical expedients provided within the amended guidance, which eliminates the
requirements to reassess lease identification, lease classification and initial direct costs for leases commenced before the effective
date. The Company will also elect not to separate lease from non-lease components and to exclude short-term leases from its
consolidated balance sheets.
The adoption of the amended guidance is expected to have a material impact on our consolidated balance sheet from the
recognition of lease assets and liabilities. While we continue to assess all the impacts of adoption, we anticipate recognizing
operating lease liabilities in excess of $2.0 billion based on the present value of the remaining minimum lease commitments using
our incremental borrowing rate as of the effective date under the full lease term. We also expect to record corresponding ROU
assets based upon the operating lease liabilities adjusted for prepaid and deferred rents, unamortized initial direct costs, liabilities
associated with lease termination costs and impairments of ROU assets recognized to opening retained earnings at the effective
date. Additionally, existing deferred gain on our sale-leaseback transaction will be derecognized from the consolidated balance
sheet and recognized to opening retained earnings at the effective date. While we have not completed our evaluation of
impairments of ROU assets upon adoption, we anticipate that the historical impairments of certain retail pharmacy stores in the
historical periods prior to adoption will result in impairments of retail store ROU assets recognized through retained earnings upon
adoption. We are finalizing the impact that the amended lease guidance will have on our consolidated financial statements, systems,
processes and internal controls.
67
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
2.Goodwill Impairment Charges
We evaluate goodwill for impairment on an annual basis as of January 1 each year and at an interim date, if indicators of
potential impairment exist. Goodwill impairment testing is conducted at the reporting unit level, which is generally defined as an
operating segment or one level below an operating segment (also known as a component), for which discrete financial information
is available and segment management regularly reviews the operating results of that reporting unit.
The fair value of the reporting unit was determined using a combination of an income approach based on a DCF model and a
market approach based on appropriate valuation multiples observed for the reporting unit’s guideline public companies. Fair value
estimates result from a complex series of judgments about future events and uncertainties and rely heavily on estimates and
assumptions that have been deemed reasonable by management as of the measurement date. Any material changes in key
assumptions, including failure to improve operations of certain retail pharmacy stores, additional government reimbursement
reductions, deterioration in the financial markets, an increase in interest rates or an increase in the cost of equity financing by
market participants within the industry, or other unanticipated events and circumstances, may affect such estimates. The discount
rates are the weighted average cost of capital measuring the reporting unit’s cost of debt and equity financing weighted by the
percentage of debt and percentage of equity in a company’s target capital. The unsystematic risk premium is an input factor used in
calculating discount rate that specifically addresses uncertainty related to the reporting unit’s future cash flow projections. Fair
value assessments of the reporting unit are considered a Level 3 measurement due to the significance of unobservable inputs
developed using company specific information.
In 2019, we recorded total non-cash pre-tax goodwill impairment charges of $1,776 million ($1,756 million after-tax) for our
two reporting units in our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment. In 2018, we recorded non-cash goodwill impairment
charges of $1,283 million (pre-tax and after-tax) in our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment and $455 million (pre-tax and
after-tax) for our Rexall Health reporting unit included in Other. In 2017, we recorded a non-cash pre-tax goodwill impairment
charge of $290 million ($282 million after-tax) for our Enterprise Information Solutions (“EIS”) reporting unit included in Other.
These charges were recorded under the caption, “Goodwill Impairment Charges” within operating expenses in the accompanying
consolidated statements of operations. Most of the goodwill impairment for these reporting units were generally not deductible for
income tax purposes.
McKesson Europe:
Fiscal 2019
In 2019, we recorded total non-cash pre-tax charges of $1,776 million ($1,756 million after-tax) to impair the carrying value of
goodwill for our Consumer Solutions (“CS”) and Pharmacy Solutions (“PS”) reporting units in our European Pharmaceutical
Solutions segment.
Prior to implementing the new segment reporting structure in the first quarter of 2019, our European operations were
considered a single reporting unit. Following the change in reportable segments, our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment
was split into two distinct reporting units, CS and PS, for the purposes of goodwill impairment testing. As a result, we were
required to perform a goodwill impairment test for these two new reporting units upon the change in reportable
segment. Consequently, we recorded a non-cash goodwill impairment charge of $238 million (pre-tax and after-tax) in the first
quarter of 2019 because the estimated fair value of the PS reporting unit was determined to be lower than its reassigned carrying
value.
In the first quarter of 2019, both CS and PS reporting units projected a decline in the estimated future cash flows primarily
triggered by additional U.K. government actions which were announced on June 29, 2018. Accordingly, we performed an interim
goodwill impairment test for these reporting units. As a result, we determined that the carrying values of these reporting units
exceeded their estimated fair value and recorded non-cash goodwill impairment charges of $332 million (pre-tax and after-tax)
primarily for our CS reporting unit. The discount rate and terminal growth rate used for the CS reporting unit in the first quarter
2019 impairment test were 8.5% and 1.25%. The discount rate and terminal growth rate used for the PS reporting unit in the first
quarter 2019 impairment test were 8.0% and 1.25%.
68
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
In the fourth quarter of 2019, as a result of our annual goodwill impairment test, we determined that the carrying values of our
CS and PS reporting units exceeded their estimated fair value and recorded non-cash charges of $465 million ($445 million after-
tax) for the CS reporting unit and $741 million (pre-tax and after-tax) for the PS reporting unit. The additional impairments were
primarily due to declines in the reporting units’ estimated future cash flows and the selection of higher discount rates. The declines
in estimated future cash flows were primarily attributed to additional government reimbursement reductions and competitive
pressures within the U.K. The risk of successfully achieving certain business initiatives was the primary factor in the use of a
higher discount rate. The discount rate and terminal growth rate used for the CS reporting unit in our 2019 annual impairment test
were 10.0% and 1.25%. The discount rate and terminal growth rate used for the PS reporting unit in our 2019 annual impairment
test were 9.0% and 1.25%. At March 31, 2019, both CS and PS reporting units had no remaining goodwill balances.
Fiscal 2018
In 2018, we recorded total non-cash charges of $1,283 million (pre-tax and after-tax) to impair the carrying value of goodwill
within our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment.
During the second quarter of 2018, our former McKesson Europe reporting unit projected a decline in its estimated future cash
flows primarily triggered by government reimbursement reductions in their retail business in the U.K. Accordingly, we performed
an interim one-step goodwill impairment test in accordance with the amended goodwill guidance for this reporting unit prior to our
annual impairment test. As a result of the interim impairment test, we determined that the carrying value of this reporting unit
exceeded its estimated fair value and recorded a non-cash charge of $350 million (pre-tax and after-tax) to impair the carrying
value of this reporting unit’s goodwill. The discount rate and terminal growth rate used in our 2018 second quarter impairment test
were 7.5% and 1.25% compared to 7.0% and 1.5% in our 2017 annual impairment test.
Additionally, as a result of our 2018 annual impairment test, we determined that the carrying value of the former McKesson
Europe reporting unit further exceeded its estimated fair value and recorded a non-cash goodwill impairment charge of $933
million (pre-tax and after-tax) in the fourth quarter of 2018. This reporting unit had a further decline in its estimated future cash
flows driven by weakening script growth outlook in our U.K. business and by a more competitive environment in France during the
fourth quarter of 2018. The discount rate and terminal growth rate used in our 2018 annual impairment test were 8.0% and 1.25%.
Rexall Health:
Fiscal 2018
In 2018, as a result of our 2018 annual impairment test, we determined that the carrying value of our Rexall Health reporting
unit within Other exceeded its estimated fair value and recorded a non-cash goodwill impairment charge of $455 million (pre-tax
and after-tax). The impairment was the result of a decline in estimated future cash flows primarily driven by significant generics
reimbursement reductions across Canada and minimum wage increases in multiple provinces which can only be partially mitigated
through the business’ cost saving efforts. The discount rate and terminal growth rate used in our impairment testing for this
reporting unit were 10.0% and 2.0%. At March 31, 2019 and 2018, the Rexall Health reporting unit had no remaining goodwill
related to our acquisition of Rexall Health.
Enterprise Information Solutions:
Fiscal 2017
In conjunction with the 2017 Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange, we evaluated strategic options for our EIS business,
which was a reporting unit within Other. In 2017, we recorded a non-cash pre-tax charge of $290 million ($282 million after-tax) to
impair the carrying value of this reporting unit’s goodwill. The impairment primarily resulted from a decline in estimated cash
flows. The amount of goodwill impairment for the EIS reporting unit was determined under the former accounting guidance on
goodwill impairment testing, and computed as the excess of the carrying value of the reporting unit’s goodwill over its implied fair
value of its goodwill.
Refer to Financial Note 21, “Fair Value Measurements,” for more information on this nonrecurring fair value measurement.
69
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
3.Restructuring and Asset Impairment Charges
We recorded pre-tax restructuring and asset impairment charges of $597 million, $567 million and $18 million in 2019, 2018
and 2017. These charges are included under the caption, “Restructuring and Asset Impairment Charges” within operating expenses
in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations.
Fiscal 2019 Initiatives
On April 25, 2018, the Company announced a strategic growth initiative intended to drive long-term incremental profit growth
and increase operational efficiency. The initiative consists of multiple growth priorities and plans to optimize the Company’s
operating models and cost structures primarily through the centralization and outsourcing of certain administrative functions and
cost management.
As part of the growth initiative, we committed to implement certain actions including a reduction in workforce, facility
consolidation and store closures. We expect to record total pre-tax charges of approximately $140 million to $180 million, of which
we recorded pre-tax charges of $135 million ($122 million after-tax) in 2019. This set of the initiatives will be substantially
completed by the end of 2020. Estimated remaining charges primarily consist of exit-related costs including contract termination
costs.
As previously announced on November 30, 2018, the Company relocated its corporate headquarters from San Francisco,
California to Irving, Texas to improve efficiency, collaboration and cost competitiveness, effective April 1, 2019. We anticipate that
the relocation will be completed by January 2021. We expect to record total pre-tax charges of approximately $80 million to $130
million and for 2019 recorded pre-tax charges of $33 million ($24 million after-tax) primarily representing employee severance.
Estimated remaining charges primarily consist of lease and other exit-related costs, employee retention and relocation expenses.
During the fourth quarter of 2019, the Company committed to additional programs to continue our operating model and cost
optimization efforts. We continue to implement centralization of certain functions and outsourcing through the expanded
arrangement with a third-party vendor to achieve operational efficiency. The programs also include reorganization and
consolidation of our business operations and related headcount reductions as well as the further closures of retail pharmacy stores
in Europe and facilities. We expect to incur total pre-tax charges of approximately $300 million to $350 million for these programs,
which are expected to be completed by the end of 2021. In 2019, pre-tax charges of $163 million ($127 million after-tax) were
recorded, which primarily represent employee severance and accelerated depreciation expense. Estimated remaining charges
primarily consist of facility and other exit costs and employee-related costs.
Restructuring charges for the fiscal 2019 initiatives for the year ended March 31, 2019 consisted of the following:
 Year Ended March 31, 2019
(In millions)U.S.
Pharmaceutical
and Specialty
Solutions  European
Pharmaceutical
Solutions  Medical-
Surgical
Solutions Other Corporate Total
Severance and employee-related
costs, net $ 50 $ 33 $ 19$ 16 $ 36 $ 154
Exit and other-related costs (1)7 3 20 57 57 144
Asset impairments and accelerated
depreciation 6 5 3 18 1 33
Total $ 63 $ 41 $ 42$ 91 $ 94 $ 331
(1)    Exit and other-related costs primarily include lease and other contract exit costs associated with closures of facilities and retail pharmacy stores as well as
project consulting fees.
70
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The following table summarizes the activity related to the restructuring liabilities associated with the fiscal 2019 initiatives for
the year ended March 31, 2019:
(In millions)U.S. Pharmaceutical
and Specialty
SolutionsEuropean
Pharmaceutical
Solutions  Medical-
Surgical
Solutions Other Corporate Total
Balance, March 31, 2018 $ — $ —  $ — $ — $ —  $ —
Restructuring charges
recognized 63 41 42 91 94 331
Non-cash charges (6) (5) (3) (18) (1) (33)
Cash payments (8) (5) (23) (52) (53) (141)
Other (18) 7 (1) 8 (3) (7)
Balance, March 31, 2019 (1)$ 31 $ 38 $ 15 $ 29$ 37 $ 150
(1)As of March 31, 2019, the total reserve balance was $150 million of which $117 million was recorded in other accrued liabilities and $33 million was recorded
in other noncurrent liabilities.
Fiscal 2018 McKesson Europe Plan
In the second quarter of 2018, we committed to a restructuring plan, which primarily consists of the closures of
underperforming retail pharmacy stores in the U.K. and a reduction in workforce. Under this plan, we expect to record total pre-tax
charges of approximately $90 million to $130 million for our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment, of which $92 million of
pre-tax charges were recorded to date. The plan will be substantially completed by 2020. In 2019 and 2018, we recorded pre-tax
charges of $18 million ($16 million after-tax) and $74 million ($67 million after-tax) in operating expenses primarily representing
employee severance and lease exit costs. We made cash payments of $32 million and $10 million during 2019 and 2018, primarily
related to severance. The reserve balances as of March 31, 2019 and 2018 were $19 million and $42 million, recorded in other
accrued liabilities in our consolidated balance sheets. Estimated remaining restructuring charges primarily consist of lease
termination and other exit costs.
Fiscal 2016 Cost Alignment Plan
On March 14, 2016, we committed to a restructuring plan to lower our operating costs (the “Cost Alignment Plan”). The Cost
Alignment Plan primarily consists of a reduction in workforce, and business process initiatives. We expected to record total pre-tax
charges of approximately $250 million to $270 million, of which $256 million of pre-tax charges were recorded to date.
There were no material restructuring charges recorded during 2019, 2018 and 2017. We made cash payments of $18 million
and $45 million during 2019 and 2018, primarily related to severance. The reserve balances as of March 31, 2019 and 2018 were
$9 million and $39 million, recorded in other accrued liabilities, and $25 million and $30 million recorded in other noncurrent
liabilities in our consolidated balance sheets. Estimated remaining restructuring charges primarily consist of exit-related activities
for our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment.
Other plans
There were no material restructuring charges for other plans recorded during 2019, 2018 and 2017.
71
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Long-Lived Asset Impairments
McKesson Europe
In 2019, we recorded non-cash pre-tax charges of $210 million ($172 million after-tax) to impair the carrying value of certain
long-lived assets (primarily pharmacy licenses) for our U.K. retail business primarily driven by government reimbursement
reductions and competitive pressures in the U.K. In 2018, we recorded non-cash pre-tax charges of $446 million ($410 million
after-tax) to impair the carrying value of certain intangible assets (primarily customer relationships and pharmacy licenses), store
assets and capitalized software assets due to continuing declines in estimated future cash flows in our European businesses
including consideration of significant government reimbursement reductions in our U.K. retail business. In 2019 and 2018, we used
an income approach (DCF method) or a combination of an income approach and a market approach to estimate the fair value of the
long-lived assets. The fair value of the intangible assets is considered a Level 3 fair value measurement due to the significance of
unobservable inputs developed using company specific information.
Rexall Health
In 2019 and 2018, we recorded non-cash charges of $35 million and $33 million (pre-tax and after-tax) to impair certain
intangible assets (primarily customer relationships) for our Rexall Health retail business. The impairments were primarily the
results of the decline in estimated future cash flows for this business. The estimated cash flow projections were negatively affected
by lower projected overall growth rate resulting from the ongoing impact of government regulations in 2019 and significant
generics reimbursement reductions across Canada and minimum wage increases in multiple provinces in 2018. We utilized an
income approach (DCF method) for estimating the fair value of long-lived assets. The fair value of the intangible assets is
considered a Level 3 fair value measurement due to the significance of unobservable inputs developed using company specific
information.
There were no material impairments of long-lived assets in 2017.
4.Business Combinations
2019 Acquisitions
Medical Specialties Distributors LLC (“MSD”)
On June 1, 2018, we completed our acquisition of MSD for the net purchase consideration of $784 million, which was funded
from cash on hand. MSD is a leading national distributor of infusion and medical-surgical supplies as well as a provider of
biomedical services to alternate site and home health providers. The financial results of MSD have been included in our
consolidated statements of operations within our Medical-Surgical Solutions segment since the acquisition date.
The adjusted provisional fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed as of the acquisition date, excluding goodwill and
intangibles, were $240 million and $163 million. Approximately $381 million of the adjusted preliminary purchase price allocation
has been assigned to goodwill, which reflects the expected future benefits from certain synergies and intangible assets that do not
qualify for separate recognition. The adjusted preliminary purchase price allocation includes acquired identifiable intangibles of
$326 million primarily representing customer relationships with a weighted average life of 18 years. These amounts are provisional
within the measurement period and subject to change as our fair value assessments are finalized.
72
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The following table summarizes the preliminary recording of the fair value of the assets acquired and liabilities assumed for
this acquisition as of the acquisition date.
(In millions)Amounts Recognized as of Acquisition Date
(Provisional As Adjusted)
Receivables $ 113
Other current assets, net of cash and cash equivalents acquired 72
Goodwill 381
Intangible assets 326
Other long-term assets 55
Current liabilities (72)
Other long-term liabilities (91)
Net assets acquired, net of cash and cash equivalents $ 784
2018 Acquisitions
RxCrossroads
On January 2, 2018, we completed our acquisition of RxCrossroads for the net purchase consideration of $720 million, which
was funded from cash on hand. The financial results of RxCrossroads have been included in the consolidated statements of
operations within our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment since the acquisition date.
The fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed as of the acquisition date were finalized upon completion of the
measurement period. As of December 31, 2018, the final amounts of fair value recognized for assets acquired and liabilities
assumed as of the acquisition date, excluding goodwill and intangibles, were $129 million and $57 million. Approximately $386
million of the final purchase price allocation was assigned to goodwill, which reflects the expected future benefits from certain
synergies and intangible assets that do not qualify for separate recognition. The final purchase price allocation included acquired
identifiable intangibles of $262 million primarily representing customer relationships and trade names with a weighted average life
of 14 years.
CoverMyMeds LLC (“CMM”)
On April 3, 2017, we completed our acquisition of CMM for the net purchase consideration of $1.3 billion, which was funded
from cash on hand. The fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed as of the acquisition date were finalized upon
completion of the measurement period in April 2018. The financial results of CMM have been included in our consolidated
statements of operations within Other since the acquisition date.
Pursuant to the agreement, McKesson may pay up to an additional $160 million of contingent consideration based on CMM’s
financial performance for 2018 and 2019. As a result, we recorded a liability for this remaining contingent consideration at its
estimated fair value of $113 million as of the acquisition date on our consolidated balance sheet.  The contingent consideration was
estimated using a Monte Carlo simulation, which utilized Level 3 inputs under the fair value measurement and disclosure guidance,
including estimated financial forecasts. The contingent liability was re-measured at fair value at each reporting date until the
liability is extinguished with changes in fair value being recorded in our consolidated statements of operations. The initial fair value
of this contingent consideration was a non-cash investing activity. In May 2018, we made a cash payment of $68 million
representing the contingent consideration for 2018. As of March 31, 2019 and 2018, the related liability was $69 million and $124
million.
73
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Other
During 2018, we also completed our acquisitions of intraFUSION, Inc. (“intraFUSION”), BDI Pharma, LLC (“BDI”) and
Uniprix Group (“Uniprix”) for net cash consideration of $485 million, which was funded from cash on hand. The fair value of
assets acquired and liabilities assumed of intraFUSION, BDI and Uniprix as of the acquisition dates were finalized upon
completion of the measurement period. As of September 30, 2018, the final amounts of fair value recognized for the assets acquired
and liabilities assumed for these acquisitions as of the acquisition dates, excluding goodwill and intangibles, were $292 million and
$160 million. Approximately $246 million of the final purchase price allocation was assigned to goodwill, which reflects the
expected future benefits of certain synergies and intangible assets that do not qualify for separate recognition. The final purchase
price allocation included acquired identifiable intangibles of $118 million primarily representing customer relationships. The
financial results of intraFUSION and BDI have been included within our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment
since the acquisition dates. The financial results of Uniprix have been included within Other since the acquisition date.
2017 Acquisitions
Rexall Health
In the third quarter of 2017, we completed our acquisition of Rexall Health which operated approximately 400 retail
pharmacies in Canada, particularly in Ontario and Western Canada. The net cash purchase consideration of $2.9 billion Canadian
dollars (approximately $2.1 billion) was funded from cash on hand. The measurement period to finalize the accounting for this
acquisition ended in the third quarter of 2018. As part of the transaction, McKesson agreed to divest 27 local stores that the
Competition Bureau of Canada identified during its review of the transaction. During 2018, we completed the sales of all 27 stores
and received net cash proceeds of $116 million Canadian dollars (approximately $94 million) from a third-party buyer. We also
received $147 million Canadian dollars (approximately $119 million) in cash from the third-party seller of Rexall Health as the
settlement of the post-closing purchase price adjustment related to these store divestitures. No gain or loss was recognized from the
sales of these stores. On May 23, 2018, as the result of resolving certain indemnity and other claims related to this acquisition, $125
million Canadian dollars (approximately $97 million) was released to us from an escrow account. The receipt of this cash was
recorded as a settlement gain within operating expenses in our consolidated statement of operations in 2019.
Other
During 2017, we also completed our acquisitions of Vantage, Biologics, Inc. (“Biologics”) and UDG Healthcare PLC (“UDG”)
for net cash consideration of $1.6 billion.
Other Acquisitions
During the three years presented, we also completed a number of other small acquisitions within all of our operating segments.
Financial results for our business acquisitions have been included in our consolidated financial statements since their respective
acquisition dates. Purchase prices for our business acquisitions have been allocated based on estimated fair values at the date of
acquisition.
Goodwill recognized for our business acquisitions is generally not expected to be deductible for tax purposes. However, if we
acquire the assets of a company, the goodwill may be deductible for tax purposes.
5.Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange
In the fourth quarter of 2017, we contributed the majority of our McKesson Technology Solutions businesses (“Core MTS
Business”) to the newly formed joint venture, Change Healthcare, under the terms of a contribution agreement previously entered
into between McKesson and Change Healthcare Inc. (“Change”, formerly known as Change Healthcare Holdings, Inc.) and others
including shareholders of Change. In exchange for the contribution, we own 70% of the joint venture with the remaining equity
ownership held by shareholders of Change. The joint venture is jointly governed by us and shareholders of Change.
74
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Change Healthcare Inc., the entity that owns 30% of the joint venture, filed a registration statement with the Securities and
Exchange Commission on March 15, 2019 and amended on April 5, 2019 regarding its intent to pursue an initial public offering.
Gain from Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange
We accounted for this transaction as a sale of the Core MTS Business and a subsequent purchase of a 70% interest in the newly
formed joint venture. Accordingly, in 2017, we deconsolidated the Core MTS Business and recorded a pre-tax gain of $3.9 billion
(after-tax gain of $3.0 billion) in operating expenses. Additionally, in 2018, we recorded a pre-tax gain of $37 million (after-tax
gain of $22 million) in operating expenses upon the finalization of net working capital and other adjustments. During 2018, we
received $126 million in cash from Change Healthcare representing the final settlement of the net working capital and other
adjustments.
Equity Method Investment in Change Healthcare
Our investment in the joint venture is accounted for using the equity method of accounting on a one-month reporting lag. We
recorded our proportionate share of loss from Change Healthcare of $194 million and $248 million in 2019 and 2018, which
included transaction and integration expenses incurred by the joint venture and basis differences between the joint venture and
McKesson including amortization of fair value adjustments primarily representing incremental intangible amortization and removal
of profit associated with the recognition of deferred revenue. The proportionate share of loss from Change Healthcare recorded in
2018, was partially offset by a provisional tax benefit of $76 million recognized by Change Healthcare primarily due to a reduction
in the future applicable tax rate related to the December 2017 enactment of the 2017 Tax Act. These amounts were recorded under
the caption, “Loss from Equity Method Investment in Change Healthcare,” in our consolidated statement of operations.
At March 31, 2019 and 2018, our carrying value of this equity method investment was $3,513 million and $3,728 million,
which exceeded our proportionate share of the joint venture’s book value of net assets by approximately $4,158 million and $4,472
million, primarily reflecting equity method intangible assets and goodwill.
Related Party Transactions
In connection with the transaction, McKesson, Change Healthcare and certain shareholders of Change entered into various
ancillary agreements, including transition services agreements (“TSA”), a transaction and advisory fee agreement (“Advisory
Agreement”) and certain other commercial agreements. Fees incurred or earned from Advisory Agreement were not material for
2019 and 2018. Fees incurred or earned from TSA were $60 million in 2019, $91 million in 2018 and not material in 2017.
Transition service fees are included within operating expenses in our consolidated statements of operations. Revenues recognized
and expenses incurred under commercial arrangements with Change Healthcare were not material during 2019, 2018 and 2017. At
March 31, 2019 and 2018, receivables due from the joint venture were not material.
Tax Receivable Agreement
In connection with the net asset exchange transaction, we also entered into a tax receivable agreement (“TRA”) with the
shareholders of Change. At March 31, 2018, we had a $90 million noncurrent liability payable to the shareholders of Change.
During 2019, we renegotiated the terms of the TRA which resulted in the extinguishment and derecognition of the $90 million
noncurrent liability.  In exchange for the shareholders of Change agreeing to extinguish the liability, we agreed to an allocation of
certain tax amortization that had the effect of reducing the amount of a distribution from the Change Healthcare joint venture that
would otherwise have been required to be made to the shareholders of Change.  As a result of the renegotiation, McKesson was
relieved from any potential future obligations associated with the noncurrent liability and recognized a pre-tax credit of $90 million
($66 million after-tax) in operating expenses in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations in 2019.  We
had no outstanding payable balance to the shareholders of Change at March 31, 2019.
75
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
6.Divestitures
Fiscal 2019
Equity Investment
In November 2018, we divested all of our ownership interest in an equity investment included in Other for proceeds of
approximately $61 million. As a result, we recorded a pre-tax gain of $56 million ($41 million after-tax) in the third quarter of
2019. The gain is included within other income, net, in our consolidated statement of operations. Under the terms of agreements
entered into for this transaction, we elected to receive cash consideration of $23 million and concurrently contribute $38 million of
the proceeds to obtain an equity interest in a newly formed entity.
Fiscal 2018
Enterprise Information Solutions
On August 1, 2017, we entered into an agreement with a third party to sell our EIS business included in Other for $185 million,
subject to adjustments for net debt and working capital. On October 2, 2017, the transaction closed upon satisfaction of all closing
conditions including the termination of the waiting period under U.S. antitrust laws. We received net cash proceeds of $169 million
after $16 million of assumed net debt by the third party. We recognized a pre-tax gain of $109 million ($30 million after-tax) upon
the disposition of this business in the third quarter of 2018 within operating expenses.
Equity Investment
On July 18, 2017, we completed the sale of an equity investment included in our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions
segment to a third party for total cash proceeds of $42 million and recorded a pre-tax gain of $43 million ($26 million after-tax)
within other income, net, in the second quarter of 2018.
Fiscal 2017
There were no material divestitures in 2017.
These divestitures did not meet the criteria to be reported as discontinued operations since they did not constitute a significant
strategic business shift.  Accordingly, pre-tax gains from 2019 and 2018 divestitures were recorded within continuing operations of
our consolidated statements of operations. Pre- and after-tax income of divested businesses were not material for 2019 and 2018.
7.Discontinued Operations
On May 31, 2016, we completed the sale of our Brazilian pharmaceutical distribution business and recognized an after-tax loss
of $113 million within discontinued operations in 2017 primarily for the settlement of certain indemnification matters as well as the
release of the cumulative translation losses. We made a payment of approximately $100 million related to the sale of this business.
The results of discontinued operations for the years ended March 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 were not material except for the loss
recognized upon the disposition of our Brazilian business in 2017. As of March 31, 2019 and 2018, the carrying amounts of total
assets and liabilities of discontinued operations were not material.
8.Share-Based Compensation
We provide share-based compensation to our employees, officers and non-employee directors, including stock options, an
employee stock purchase plan (“ESPP”), restricted stock units (“RSUs”), performance-based restricted stock units (“PeRSUs”) and
performance-based stock units ("PSUs", formerly referred to as total shareholder return units or “TSRUs”) (collectively, “share-
based awards”). Most of our share-based awards are granted in the first quarter of each fiscal year.
76
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Compensation expense for the share-based awards is recognized for the portion of awards ultimately expected to vest. We
estimate the number of share-based awards that will ultimately vest primarily based on historical experience. The estimated
forfeiture rate established upon grant is re-assessed throughout the requisite service period and is adjusted when actual forfeitures
occur. The actual forfeitures in future reporting periods could be higher or lower than current estimates.
The compensation expense recognized has been classified in the consolidated statements of operations or capitalized in the
consolidated balance sheets in the same manner as cash compensation paid to our employees. No share-based compensation
expenses were capitalized as part of the cost of an asset in 2019, and no material amounts were capitalized in 2018 and 2017.
Impact on Net Income
The components of share-based compensation expense and related tax benefits are as follows:
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2019 2018  2017
Restricted stock unit awards (1)$ 75 $ 46 $ 79
Stock options 12 14 24
Employee stock purchase plan 8 9 12
Share-based compensation expense 95 69 115
Tax benefit for share-based compensation expense (2) (12) (28) (92)
Share-based compensation expense, net of tax $ 83 $ 41 $ 23
(1)Includes compensation expense recognized for RSUs, PeRSUs and PSUs.
(2)Income tax benefit is computed using the tax rates of applicable tax jurisdictions. Additionally, a portion of pre-tax compensation expense is not tax-
deductible. Income tax expense for 2019 included discrete income tax expense of $4 million, 2018 and 2017 included discrete income tax benefits of $8
million and $54 million related to the adoption of the amended accounting guidance on share-based compensation.
Stock Plans
In July 2013, our stockholders approved the 2013 Stock Plan to replace the 2005 Stock Plan. These stock plans provide our
employees, officers and non-employee directors the opportunity to receive equity-based, long-term incentives in the form of stock
options, restricted stock, RSUs, PeRSUs, PSUs and other share-based awards. The 2013 Stock Plan reserves 30 million shares plus
the remaining number of shares reserved but unused under the 2005 Stock Plan. As of March 31, 2019, 25 million shares remain
available for future grant under the 2013 Stock Plan.
Stock Options
Stock options are granted with an exercise price at no less than the fair market value and those options granted under the stock
plans generally have a contractual term of seven years and follow a four year vesting schedule.
77
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Compensation expense for stock options is recognized on a straight-line basis over the requisite service period and is based on
the grant-date fair value for the portion of the awards that is ultimately expected to vest. We use the Black-Scholes options-pricing
model to estimate the fair value of our stock options. Once the fair value of an employee stock option is determined, current
accounting practices do not permit it to be changed, even if the estimates used are different from actual. The options-pricing model
requires the use of various estimates and assumptions as follows:
•Expected stock price volatility is based on a combination of historical volatility of our common stock and implied market
volatility. We believe that this market-based input provides a reasonable estimate of our future stock price movements and
is consistent with employee stock option valuation considerations.
•Expected dividend yield is based on historical experience and investors’ current expectations.
•The risk-free interest rate for periods within the expected life of the option is based on the constant maturity U.S. Treasury
rate in effect at the time of grant.
•Expected life of the options is based primarily on historical employee stock option exercises and other behavior data and
reflects the impact of changes in contractual life of current option grants compared to our historical grants.
Weighted-average assumptions used to estimate the fair value of employee stock options were as follows:
 Years Ended March 31,
 2019 2018  2017
Expected stock price volatility 26% 25%  21%
Expected dividend yield 0.9% 0.8%  0.7%
Risk-free interest rate 2.8% 1.7%  1.1%
Expected life (in years) 4.6 4.5  4
The following is a summary of stock options outstanding at March 31, 2019:
 Options Outstanding Options Exercisable
Range of Exercise
PricesNumber of
Options
Outstanding
at Year End
(In millions)Weighted-
Average
Remaining
Contractual
Life (Years)Weighted-
Average
Exercise PriceNumber of
Options
Exercisable at
Year End
(In millions) Weighted-
Average
Exercise Price
$87.24–$162.55 1 4 $ 133.54 1  $ 119.65
162.56– 239.93 2 3 197.98 1  199.08
   3  2   
78
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The following table summarizes stock option activity during 2019:
(In millions, except per shar e data) Shares  Weighted-
Average
Exercise
Price  Weighted-
Average
Remaining
Contractual
Term (Years)Aggregate
Intrinsic
Value (2)
Outstanding, March 31, 2018 3  $ 161.27 4 $ 36
Granted 1  141.93 
Cancelled —  167.37 
Exercised (1)  86.65 
Outstanding, March 31, 2019 3  $ 166.72 3 $ 4
Vested and expected to vest (1)3  $ 166.88 3 $ 3
Vested and exercisable, March 31, 2019 2  167.27 2 4
(1)The number of options expected to vest takes into account an estimate of expected forfeitures.
(2)The intrinsic value is calculated as the difference between the period-end market price of the Company’s common stock and the exercise price of “in-the-
money” options.
The following table provides data related to stock option activity:
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions, except per shar e data) 2019 2018  2017
Weighted-average grant date fair value per stock option $ 34.98 $ 34.24 $ 32.19
Aggregate intrinsic value on exercise $ 16 $ 60 $ 97
Cash received upon exercise $ 29 $ 77 $ 54
Tax benefits realized related to exercise $ 4 $ 22 $ 38
Total fair value of stock options vested $ 16 $ 20 $ 18
Total compensation cost, net of estimated forfeitures, related to unvested stock
options not yet recognized, pre-tax $ 15 $ 15 $ 21
Weighted-average period in years over which stock option compensation cost
is expected to be recognized 2 2 2
Restricted Stock Unit Awards
RSUs, which entitle the holder to receive at the end of a vesting term a specified number of shares of the Company’s common
stock, are accounted for at fair value at the date of grant. Total compensation expense for RSUs under our stock plans is determined
by the product of the number of shares that are expected to vest and the grant date market price of the Company’s common stock.
The Compensation Committee determines the vesting terms at the time of grant. These awards generally vest in three to four years.
We recognize compensation expense for RSUs on a straight-line basis over the requisite service period.
Non-employee directors receive an annual grant of RSUs, which vest immediately and are expensed upon grant. The director
may elect to receive the underlying shares immediately or defer receipt of the shares if they meet director stock ownership
guidelines. The shares will be automatically deferred for those directors who do not meet the director stock ownership guidelines.
At March 31, 2019, approximately 63,000 RSUs for our directors are vested.
79
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
PeRSUs are awards for which the number of RSUs awarded is conditional upon the attainment of one or more performance
objectives over a specified period. Each year, the Compensation Committee approves the target number of PeRSUs representing the
base number of RSUs that could be awarded if performance goals are attained. PeRSUs are accounted for as variable awards until
the performance goals are reached at which time the grant date is established. Total compensation expense for PeRSUs is
determined by the product of the number of shares eligible to be awarded and expected to vest, and the market price of the
Company’s common stock, commencing at the inception of the requisite service period. During the performance period, the
compensation expense for PeRSUs is re-computed using the market price and the performance modifier at the end of a reporting
period. At the end of the performance period, if the goals are attained, the awards are granted and classified as RSUs and accounted
for on that basis. We recognize compensation expense for these awards on a straight-line basis over the requisite aggregate service
period of generally four years.
PSUs, formerly referred to as TSRUs, are conditional upon the attainment of market and performance objectives over a
specified period. The number of vested PSUs is assessed at the end of a three-year performance period upon attainment of a total
shareholder return metric relative to a peer group of companies and meeting certain earnings per share targets, and for special PSUs
granted in 2019 meeting certain cumulative operating profit metric. We use the Monte Carlo simulation model to measure the fair
value of the total shareholder return portion of the PSUs. The earnings per share portion of the PSUs is measured at the grant date
market price. PSUs have a requisite service period of approximately three years. Expense is attributed to the requisite service
period on a straight-line basis based on the fair value of the PSUs, adjusted for the performance modifier at the end of each
reporting period. For PSUs that are designated as equity awards, the fair value is measured at the grant date. For PSUs that are
eligible for cash settlement and designated as liability awards, we re-measure the fair value at the end of each reporting period and
adjust a corresponding liability on our balance sheet for changes in fair value.
The weighted-average assumptions used in the Monte Carlo valuations are as follows:
 Years Ended March 31,
 2019 2018  2017
Expected stock price volatility 31% 29%  23%
Expected dividend yield 0.9% 0.8%  0.7%
Risk-free interest rate 2.6% 1.5%  1.1%
Expected life (in years) 3 3  3
The following table summarizes activity for restricted stock unit awards (RSUs, PeRSUs, and PSUs) during 2019:
(In millions, except per shar e data) SharesWeighted-
Average
Grant Date Fair
Value Per Share
Nonvested, March 31, 2018 2 $ 176.74
Granted 1 143.94
Cancelled — 147.88
Vested (1) 210.30
Nonvested, March 31, 2019 2 $ 142.77
The following table provides data related to restricted stock unit award activity:
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2019 2018  2017
Total fair value of shares vested $ 59 $ 156 $ 109
Total compensation cost, net of estimated forfeitures, related to
nonvested restricted stock unit awards not yet recognized, pre-tax$ 119 $ 97 $ 99
Weighted-average period in years over which restricted stock unit
award cost is expected to be recognized 2 2 2
80
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
ESPP
The Company has an ESPP under which 21 million shares have been authorized for issuance. The ESPP allows eligible
employees to purchase shares of our common stock through payroll deductions. The deductions occur over three-month purchase
periods and the shares are then purchased at 85% of the market price at the end of each purchase period. Employees are allowed to
terminate their participation in the ESPP at any time during the purchase period prior to the purchase of the shares. The 15%
discount provided to employees on these shares is included in compensation expense. The shares related to funds outstanding at the
end of a quarter are included in the calculation of diluted weighted average shares outstanding. These amounts have not been
significant for all the years presented. We recognize costs for employer matching contributions as ESPP expense over the relevant
purchase period. Shares issued under the ESPP were not material in 2019, 2018, and 2017. At March 31, 2019, 3 million shares
remain available for issuance.
9.Other Income, Net
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2019 2018 2017
Interest income $ 39 $ 48 $ 29
Equity in earnings, net (1)43 32 30
Gain from sale of equity investment (2)56 43 —
Other, net 44 7 18
Total $ 182 $ 130 $ 77
(1)Primarily recorded within our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment.
(2)Amount represented a pre-tax gain from the sale of an equity investment to a third party included in Other during 2019 and in our U.S. Pharmaceutical and
Specialty Solutions segment during 2018.
10.Income Taxes
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2019  2018 2017
Income from continuing operations before income taxes   
U.S. $ 1,512 $ 1,175 $ 5,772
Foreign (902) (936) 1,119
Total income from continuing operations before income taxes $ 610 $ 239 $ 6,891
Income tax expense (benefit) related to continuing operations consists of the following:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2019  2018 2017
Current    
Federal $ (20) $ 577 $ 524
State 35 33 86
Foreign 152 205 122
Total current 167 815 732
   
Deferred    
Federal 223 (767) 767
State 44 17 164
Foreign (78) (118) (49)
Total deferred 189 (868) 882
Income tax expense (benefit) $ 356 $ (53)$ 1,614
81
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
We recorded income tax expense of $356 million, benefit of $53 million and expense of $1,614 million related to continuing
operations in 2019, 2018 and 2017.
Our reported income tax expense rate for 2019 was 58.4% compared to income tax benefit rate of 22.2% for 2018 and an
income tax expense rate of 23.4% in 2017. Fluctuations in our reported income tax rates are primarily due to the impact of the 2017
Tax Act, the impact of nondeductible impairment charges, and varying proportions of income attributable to foreign countries that
have income tax rates different from the U.S. rate.
The reconciliation of income tax expense (benefit) and the amount computed by applying the statutory federal income tax rate
of 21% for 2019, 31.6% for 2018 and 35% for 2017 to the income before income taxes is as follows:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2019 2018 2017
Income tax expense at federal statutory rate $ 128 $ 75 $ 2,411
State income taxes net of federal tax benefit 70 50 153
Tax effect of foreign operations (86) (146) (326)
Unrecognized tax benefits and settlements 20 454 57
Non-deductible goodwill 357 585 106
Share-based compensation 4 (8) (54)
Net tax benefit on intellectual property transfer (42) (178) (137)
Rate differential on gain from Change Healthcare Net Asset Exchange — — (587)
Impact of change in U.S. tax rate on temporary differences (81) (1,324) —
Transition tax on foreign earnings (5) 457 —
Other, net (1) (9) (18) (9)
Income tax expense (benefit) $ 356 $ (53)$ 1,614
(1)Our effective tax rates were impacted by other favorable U.S. federal permanent differences including research and development credits of $7 million, $11
million and $14 million in 2019, 2018 and 2017.
Our reported income tax expense rate for 2019 was unfavorably impacted by non-cash pre-tax charges of $1,776 million
($1,756 million after-tax) to impair the carrying value of goodwill for our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment, given that
these charges are generally not deductible for tax purposes. Our reported income tax benefit rate for 2018 was unfavorably
impacted by non-cash charges of $1,738 million (pre-tax and after-tax) to impair the carrying value of goodwill, given that
generally no tax benefit was recognized for these charges. Our reported income tax expense rate for 2017 was unfavorably
impacted by the non-cash pre-tax charge of $290 million ($282 million after-tax) to impair the carrying value of goodwill, given
that generally the majority of this charge was not deductible for income tax purposes. Refer to Financial Note 2, “Goodwill
Impairment Charges,” for more information.
During 2019, we sold software between wholly-owned legal entities within the McKesson group that are based in different tax
jurisdictions. The transferor entity recognized a gain on the sale of assets that was not subject to income tax in its local jurisdiction;
such gain was eliminated upon consolidation. An entity based in the U.S. was the acquirer of the software and is entitled to
amortize the purchase price of the assets for tax purposes. In accordance with the recently adopted amended accounting guidance
on income taxes, a discrete tax benefit of $42 million was recognized in the second quarter of 2019 with a corresponding increase
to a deferred tax asset for the future tax amortization.
On December 19, 2016, we sold various software relating to our technology businesses between wholly owned legal entities
within the McKesson group that are based in different tax jurisdictions. The transferor entity recognized a gain on the sale of assets
that was not subject to income tax in its local jurisdiction; such gain was eliminated upon consolidation. A McKesson entity based
in the U.S. was the recipient of the software and is entitled to amortize the fair value of the assets for book and tax purposes. The
tax benefit associated with the amortization of these assets is recognized over the tax lives of the assets. As a result, we recognized
a net tax benefit of $178 million and $137 million in 2018 and 2017. We no longer recognize the tax benefit associated with this
amortization in continuing operations upon adoption of the amended guidance related to intra-entity transfer of an asset other than
inventory in 2019. Refer to Financial Note 1, “Significant Accounting Policies,” for more information.
82
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
On March 1, 2017, we contributed assets to Change Healthcare as described in Financial Note 5, “Healthcare Technology Net
Asset Exchange”. While this transaction was predominantly structured as a tax free asset contribution for U.S. federal income tax
purposes under Section 721(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, we recorded tax expense of $929 million on the gain. The tax expense
was primarily driven by the recognition of a deferred tax liability on the excess book over tax basis in our equity investment in
Change Healthcare.
In March 2016, amended guidance was issued for employee share-based payment awards. Under the amended guidance, all
windfalls and shortfalls related to employee share-based compensation arrangements are recognized within income tax expense. We
elected to early adopt this amended guidance in the first quarter of 2017. The primary impact of the adoption was the recognition of
excess tax benefits in the income statement on a prospective basis, rather than additional paid-in capital. As a result, we recognized
net tax expense of $4 million in 2019 and net tax benefits of $8 million and $54 million in 2018 and 2017.
Deferred tax balances consisted of the following:
March 31,
(In millions) 2019 2018
Assets
Receivable allowances $ 70 $ 58
Compensation and benefit related accruals 377 345
Net operating loss and credit carryforwards 885 811
Long-term contractual obligations — 59
Other 216 279
Subtotal 1,548 1,552
Less: valuation allowance (870) (751)
Total assets 678 801
Liabilities
Inventory valuation and other assets (2,016) (1,869)
Fixed assets and systems development costs (170) (158)
Intangibles (513) (644)
Change Healthcare Equity Investment (885) (814)
Other (34) (71)
Total liabilities (3,618) (3,556)
Net deferred tax liability $ (2,940)$ (2,755)
Long-term deferred tax asset $ 58 $ 49
Long-term deferred tax liability (2,998) (2,804)
Net deferred tax liability $ (2,940)$ (2,755)
We assess the available positive and negative evidence to determine whether deferred tax assets are more likely than not to be
realized.  As a result of this assessment, valuation allowances have been recorded on certain deferred tax assets in various tax
jurisdictions.  The valuation allowance was approximately $870 million and $751 million in 2019 and 2018. The increase of $119
million in valuation allowances in the current year relates primarily to net operating and capital losses incurred in certain tax
jurisdictions for which no tax benefit was recognized.
We have federal, state and foreign net operating loss carryforwards of $92 million, $3,551 million and $2,143 million. Federal
and state net operating losses will expire at various dates from 2019 through 2040. Substantially all our foreign net operating losses
have indefinite lives. In addition, we have foreign capital loss carryforwards of $742 million with indefinite lives.
83
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The following table summarizes the activity related to our gross unrecognized tax benefits for the last three years:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2019  2018 2017
Unrecognized tax benefits at beginning of period $ 1,183 $ 486 $ 555
Additions based on tax positions related to prior years 78 47 7
Reductions based on tax positions related to prior years (234) (124) (67)
Additions based on tax positions related to current year 68 778 105
Reductions based on settlements (13) (7) (113)
Reductions based on the lapse of the applicable statutes of limitations (25) — —
Exchange rate fluctuations (5) 3 (1)
Unrecognized tax benefits at end of period $ 1,052 $ 1,183 $ 486
As of March 31, 2019, we had $1,052 million of unrecognized tax benefits, of which $877 million would reduce income tax
expense and the effective tax rate, if recognized. The decrease in unrecognized tax benefits in 2019 compared to 2018 is primarily
attributable to a $171 million decrease, with a corresponding increase in taxes payable, due to the issuance of new tax regulations.
The increase in unrecognized tax benefits in 2018 compared to 2017 is primarily attributable to provisional amounts relating to the
application of certain provisions of the 2017 Tax Act, partially offset by a decrease in unrecognized tax benefit due to the resolution
of the U.S. Internal Revenue Services (“IRS”) relating to the fiscal years 2010 through 2012.  During the next twelve months, we
do not expect any material reduction in our unrecognized tax benefits. However, this may change as we continue to have ongoing
negotiations with various taxing authorities throughout the year.
We report interest and penalties on income taxes as income tax expense. We recognized income tax expense of $33 million in
2019 and income tax benefits of $1 million and $6 million in 2018 and 2017, representing interest and penalties, in our
consolidated statements of operations. As of March 31, 2019 and 2018, we had accrued $68 million and $37 million cumulatively
in interest and penalties on unrecognized tax benefits.
We file income tax returns in the U.S. federal jurisdiction, various U.S. state jurisdictions and various foreign jurisdictions. The
IRS is currently examining our U.S. corporation income tax returns for 2013 through 2015. During the third quarter of 2018, we
signed the Revenue Agent’s Report from the U.S. IRS relating to their audit of the fiscal years 2010 through 2012 and recorded a
$39 million tax benefit due to the favorable resolution of various uncertain tax positions for those years. During the first quarter of
2017, we reached an agreement with the IRS to settle all outstanding issues relating to the fiscal years 2007 through 2009 without a
material impact to our provision for income taxes. We are generally subject to audit by taxing authorities in various U.S. states and
in foreign jurisdictions for fiscal years 2010 through the current fiscal year.
2017 Tax Act
On December 22, 2017, the U.S. government enacted the 2017 Tax Act, which was comprehensive new tax legislation. The
SEC Staff issued guidance on income tax accounting for the 2017 Tax Act on December 22, 2017, which allows companies to
record provisional amounts during a measurement period not to extend beyond one year of the enactment date. In accordance with
this guidance, we recognized a tax benefit of $1,324 million in 2018 due to the re-measurement of certain deferred taxes to the
lower U.S. federal tax rate mainly driven by a decrease in our deferred tax liabilities for inventories and investments. During 2019,
we have not made any measurement period adjustments to this amount. Our reported income tax expense for 2019 included $81
million of tax benefits primarily related to a change in a tax method for inventory approved by the tax authorities and other
elections made on our 2018 tax return filed after enactment of the 2017 Tax Act but prior to the reduction in U.S. tax rates. We
recognized tax expense of $457 million in 2018 for the one-time transition tax on certain accumulated earnings and profits of our
foreign subsidiaries resulting from the 2017 Tax Act. During 2019, we recognized a discrete tax benefit of $5 million in
measurement period adjustments to the one-time transition tax on certain accumulated earnings and profits of our foreign
subsidiaries. Our accounting for the impact of the 2017 Tax Act was completed as of the period ending December 31, 2018.
84
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The 2017 Tax Act made broad and complex changes to the U.S. tax code that affected our fiscal year 2019 and 2018 in
multiple ways, including but not limited to reducing the U.S. federal corporate tax rate from 35 percent to 21 percent; creating the
base erosion anti-abuse tax; creating a new provision designed to tax global intangible low-tax income (“GILTI”); and generally
eliminating U.S. federal income taxes on dividends from foreign subsidiaries. We have estimated the impact of these changes in our
income tax provision for 2019.
The Company is allowed to make an accounting policy election of either recognizing deferred taxes for temporary differences
expected to reverse as GILTI in future years or recognizing such taxes as a current period expense when incurred. We have elected
to treat the tax effect of GILTI as a current period expense when incurred.
Undistributed earnings of our foreign operations totaling $4.9 billion were considered indefinitely reinvested. Following
enactment of the 2017 Tax Act, the repatriation of cash to the United States is generally no longer taxable for federal income tax
purposes. However, the repatriation of cash held outside the United States could be subject to applicable foreign withholding taxes
and state income taxes.  We may remit foreign earnings to this United States to the extent it is tax efficient to do so. We do not
expect the tax impact from remitting these earnings to be material.
11.Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests and Noncontrolling Interests
Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests
Our redeemable noncontrolling interests relate to our consolidated subsidiary, McKesson Europe. Under the December 2014
domination and profit and loss transfer agreement (the “Domination Agreement”), the noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson
Europe are entitled to receive an annual recurring compensation amount of €0.83 per share and a one-time guaranteed dividend for
calendar year 2014 of €0.83 per share reduced accordingly for any dividend paid by McKesson Europe in relation to that year. As a
result, during 2019, 2018 and 2017, we recorded a total attribution of net income to the noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson
Europe of $45 million, $43 million and $44 million. All amounts were recorded in our consolidated statements of operations within
the caption, “Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests,” and the corresponding liability balance was recorded within
other accrued liabilities on our consolidated balance sheets.
Under the Domination Agreement, the noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe have a right to put (“Put Right”) their
noncontrolling shares at €22.99 per share increased annually for interest in the amount of 5 percentage points above a base rate
published by the German Bundesbank semi-annually, less any compensation amount or guaranteed dividend already paid by
McKesson with respect to the relevant time period (“Put Amount”). The exercise of the Put Right will reduce the balance of
redeemable noncontrolling interests. During 2019 there were no material exercises of the Put Right. During 2018, we paid $50
million to purchase 1.9 million shares of McKesson Europe through the exercises of the Put Right by the noncontrolling
shareholders, which decreased the carrying value of redeemable noncontrolling interests by $53 million. The balance of redeemable
noncontrolling interests is reported as the greater of its carrying value or its maximum redemption value at each reporting date. The
redemption value is the Put Amount adjusted for exchange rate fluctuations each period. At March 31, 2019 and 2018, the carrying
value of redeemable noncontrolling interests of $1.39 billion and $1.46 billion exceeded the maximum redemption value of $1.23
billion and $1.35 billion. At March 31, 2019 and 2018, we owned approximately 77% of McKesson Europe’s outstanding common
shares.
Appraisal Proceedings
Subsequent to the Domination Agreement’s registration, certain noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe initiated
appraisal proceedings (“Appraisal Proceedings”) with the Stuttgart Regional Court (the “Court”) to challenge the adequacy of the
Put Amount, annual recurring compensation amount, and/or the guaranteed dividend. During the pendency of the Appraisal
Proceedings, such amount will be paid as specified currently in the Domination Agreement. On September 19, 2018, the Court
ruled that the Put Amount shall be increased by €0.51 resulting in an adjusted Put Amount of €23.50. The annual recurring
compensation amount and/or the guaranteed dividend remain unadjusted. Noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe
appealed this decision. McKesson Europe Holdings GmbH & Co. KGaA also appealed the decision. If upon final resolution of the
appeal an upwards adjustment is ordered, we would be required to make certain additional payments for any shortfall to all
McKesson Europe noncontrolling shareholders who previously received amounts under the Domination Agreement.
85
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Noncontrolling Interests
Noncontrolling interests represent third-party equity interests in our consolidated entities primarily related to ClarusONE and
Vantage, which were $193 million and $253 million at March 31, 2019 and 2018 on our consolidated balance sheets. During 2019,
2018 and 2017, we allocated a total of $176 million, $187 million and $39 million of net income to noncontrolling interests.
Changes in redeemable noncontrolling interests and noncontrolling interests for the years ended March 31, 2019 and 2018
were as follows:
(In millions)Noncontrolling
InterestsRedeemable
Noncontrolling
Interests
Balance, March 31, 2017 $ 178$ 1,327
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 187 43
Other comprehensive income — 185
Reclassification of recurring compensation to other accrued liabilities — (43)
Payments to noncontrolling interests (98) —
Exercises of Put Right — (53)
Other (14) —
Balance, March 31, 2018 $ 253$ 1,459
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 176 45
Other comprehensive income — (66)
Reclassification of recurring compensation to other accrued liabilities — (45)
Payments to noncontrolling interests (184) —
Other (52) —
Balance, March 31, 2019 $ 193$ 1,393
There were no material changes in our ownership interests related to redeemable noncontrolling interests during 2019.The
effect of changes in our ownership interests related to redeemable noncontrolling interests on our equity of $3 million resulting
from exercises of Put Right was recorded as a net increase to McKesson’s stockholders’ paid-in capital during 2018. Net income
attributable to McKesson and transfers from redeemable noncontrolling interests were $34 million and $70 million in 2019 and
2018.
12.Earnings Per Common Share
Basic earnings per common share are computed by dividing net income by the weighted average number of common shares
outstanding during the reporting period. Diluted earnings per common share are computed similar to basic earnings per common
share except that it reflects the potential dilution that could occur if dilutive securities or other obligations to issue common stock
were exercised or converted into common stock.
86
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The computations for basic and diluted earnings per common share are as follows:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions, except per shar e amounts) 2019  2018 2017
Income from continuing operations $ 254 $ 292 $ 5,277
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests (221) (230) (83)
Income from continuing operations attributable to McKesson 33 62 5,194
Income (Loss) from discontinued operations, net of tax 1 5 (124)
Net income attributable to McKesson $ 34 $ 67 $ 5,070
  
Weighted average common shares outstanding:   
Basic 196 208 221
Effect of dilutive securities:   
Options to purchase common stock — — 1
Restricted stock units 1 1 1
Diluted 197 209 223
  
Earnings (Loss) per common share attributable to McKesson: (1)  
Diluted   
Continuing operations $ 0.17 $ 0.30 $ 23.28
Discontinued operations — 0.02 (0.55)
Total $ 0.17 $ 0.32 $ 22.73
Basic   
Continuing operations $ 0.17 $ 0.30 $ 23.50
Discontinued operations — 0.02 (0.55)
Total $ 0.17 $ 0.32 $ 22.95
(1)Certain computations may reflect rounding adjustments.
Potentially dilutive securities include outstanding stock options, restricted stock units and performance-based and other
restricted stock units. Approximately 3 million, 2 million and 2 million potentially dilutive securities for 2019, 2018 and 2017 were
excluded from the computations of diluted net earnings per common share, as they were anti-dilutive.
13.Receivables, Net
 March 31,
(In millions) 2019 2018
Customer accounts $ 14,941 $ 14,349
Other 3,584 3,578
Total 18,525 17,927
Allowances (279) (216)
Net $ 18,246 $ 17,711
Other receivables primarily include amounts due from suppliers. The allowances are primarily for estimated uncollectible
accounts.
87
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
14.    Property, Plant and Equipment, Net
March 31,
(In millions) 2019 2018
Land $ 172 $ 187
Building, machinery, equipment and other 4,154 3,746
Total property, plant and equipment 4,326 3,933
Accumulated depreciation (1,778) (1,469)
Property, plant and equipment, net $ 2,548 $ 2,464
15.Goodwill and Intangible Assets, Net
Changes in the carrying amount of goodwill were as follows:
(In millions)U.S.
Pharmaceutical
and Specialty
SolutionsEuropean
Pharmaceutical
Solutions  Medical-
Surgical
Solutions Other  Total
Balance, March 31, 2017 $ 3,391 $ 2,789 $ 2,069 $ 2,337 $ 10,586
Goodwill acquired 657 26 — 1,024 1,707
Acquisition accounting,
transfers and other adjustments 4 —  1 34 39
Goodwill impairment (1)— (1,283) — (455) (1,738)
Goodwill disposed (2)(37) (11) — (124) (172)
Amount reclassified to assets
held for sale — (2) — — (2)
Foreign currency translation
adjustments, net 95 331 — 78 504
Balance, March 31, 2018 4,110 1,850 2,070 2,894 10,924
Goodwill acquired 17 52 360 13 442
Goodwill impairment (1)— (1,776) — (21) (1,797)
Acquisition accounting,
transfers and other adjustments 13 (5) 21 6 35
Foreign currency translation
adjustments, net (62) (121) — (63) (246)
Balance, March 31, 2019 $ 4,078 $ —  $ 2,451 $ 2,829 $ 9,358
(1)In 2019 and 2018, goodwill impairment charges from our international businesses were translated at average exchange rates during the corresponding period
and accumulated goodwill impairment losses described below were translated at year-end exchange rates.
(2)2018 Other amount primarily represents goodwill disposal associated with the sale of our EIS business. Refer to Financial Note 6, “Divestitures” for more
information.
As of March 31, 2019, accumulated goodwill impairment losses were $2,943 million in our European Pharmaceutical
Solutions segment and $461 million in Other. As of March 31, 2018, accumulated goodwill impairment losses were $1,299 million
in our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment and $456 million in Other. Refer to Financial Note 2 “Goodwill Impairment
Charges,” for more information on the impairment charges recorded in 2019 and 2018.
88
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Information regarding intangible assets is as follows:
 March 31, 2019 March 31, 2018
(Dollars in millions)Weighted
Average
Remaining
Amortization
Period
(Years) Gross
Carrying
Amount Accumulated
Amortization Net
Carrying
AmountGross
Carrying
Amount Accumulated
Amortization Net
Carrying
Amount
Customer relationships 12  $ 3,818 $ (1,801) $ 2,017 $ 3,619 $ (1,550) $ 2,069
Service agreements 11  1,017 (430) 587 1,037 (386) 651
Pharmacy licenses 26  513 (209) 304 684 (196) 488
Trademarks and trade names 13  887 (232) 655 932 (187) 745
Technology 4  141 (94) 47 147 (84) 63
Other 5  288 (209) 79 262 (176) 86
Total   $ 6,664 $ (2,975) $ 3,689 $ 6,681 $ (2,579) $ 4,102
Amortization expense of intangible assets was $485 million, $503 million and $444 million for 2019, 2018 and 2017.
Estimated annual amortization expense of intangible assets is as follows: $419 million, $400 million, $368 million, $265 million
and $249 million for 2020 through 2024, and $1,988 million thereafter. All intangible assets were subject to amortization as of
March 31, 2019 and 2018.
Refer to Financial Note 3, “Restructuring and Asset Impairment Charges,” for more information on intangible asset
impairment charges recorded in 2019 and 2018.
89
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
16.Debt and Financing Activities
Long-term debt consisted of the following:
 March 31,
(In millions) 2019  2018
U.S. Dollar notes (1) (2)   
2.28% Notes due March 15, 2019 $ — $ 1,100
3.65% Notes due November 30, 2020 700 —
4.75% Notes due March 1, 2021 323 323
2.70% Notes due December 15, 2022 400 400
2.85% Notes due March 15, 2023 400 400
3.80% Notes due March 15, 2024 1,100 1,100
7.65% Debentures due March 1, 2027 167 167
3.95% Notes due February 16, 2028 600 600
4.75% Notes due May 30, 2029 400 —
6.00% Notes due March 1, 2041 282 282
4.88% Notes due March 15, 2044 411 411
Foreign currency notes  (1) (3)   
Floating Rate Euro Notes due February 12, 2020 (4)280 337
0.63% Euro Notes due August 17, 2021 673 695
1.50% Euro Notes due November 17, 2025 670 691
1.63% Euro Notes due October 30, 2026 560 669
3.13% Sterling Notes due February 17, 2029 586 630
    
Lease and other obligations 43 75
Total debt 7,595 7,880
Less: Current portion 330 1,129
Total long-term debt $ 7,265 $ 6,751
(1)These notes are unsecured and unsubordinated obligations of the Company.
(2)Interest on these notes is payable semi-annually.
(3)Interest on these foreign bonds and notes is payable annually, except the 2020 Floating Rate Euro Notes.
(4)Interest on these notes is payable quarterly.
Long-Term Debt
Our long-term debt includes both U.S. dollar and foreign currency-denominated borrowings. At March 31, 2019 and March 31,
2018, $7,595 million and $7,880 million of total debt were outstanding, of which $330 million and $1,129 million were included
under the caption “Current portion of long-term debt” within our consolidated balance sheets.
Fiscal 2019
On November 30, 2018, we completed a public offering of 3.65% Notes due November 30, 2020 (the “2020 Notes”) in a
principal amount of $700 million and 4.75% Notes due May 30, 2029 (the “2029 Notes”) in a principal amount of $400 million.
Interest on the 2020 Notes and 2029 Notes is payable semi-annually on May 30th and November 30th of each year, commencing on
May 30, 2019. We utilized the net proceeds from these notes of $1.1 billion, net of discounts and offering expenses, for general
corporate purposes.
90
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Fiscal 2018
On February 12, 2018, we completed a public offering of Euro-denominated floating rate notes due February 12, 2020 (the
“2020 Floating Rate Euro Notes”) in an aggregate principal amount of €250 million and 1.63% Euro-denominated notes due
October 30, 2026 (the “2026 Euro Notes”) in an aggregate principal amount of €500 million. On February 16, 2018, we completed
a public offering of 3.95% notes due February 16, 2028 (the “2028 USD Notes”) in an aggregate principal amount of $600 million.
The 2020 Floating Rate Euro Notes bear an interest at a rate equal to the three-month Euro Interbank Offered Rate plus 0.15%.
Interest on the 2020 Floating Rate Euro Notes is payable on February 12, May 12, August 12 and November 12 of each year,
commencing on May 12, 2018. Interest on the 2026 Euro Notes is payable on October 30 of each year, commencing on October 30,
2018. Interest on the 2028 USD Notes is payable on February 16 and August 16 of each year, commencing on August 16, 2018. We
utilized the net proceeds from these notes of $1.5 billion, net of discounts and offering expenses, to finance the purchase of certain
outstanding notes and for working capital and general corporate purposes.
Tender Offers and Early Repayments
On February 7, 2018, we commenced cash tender offers for a portion of our existing outstanding (i) 7.50% Notes due 2019, (ii)
4.75% Notes due 2021, (iii) 7.65% Debentures due 2027, (iv) 6.00% Notes due 2041 and (v) 4.88% Notes due 2044 (collectively
referred to herein as the “Tender Offer Notes”). In connection with the tender offers and an additional repurchase, we paid an
aggregate consideration of $1.05 billion to redeem $936 million principal amount of the notes at a redemption price equal to 100%
of the principal amount and premiums of $99 million, plus accrued and unpaid interest of $20 million. The redemption of the
Tender Offer Notes was accounted for as a debt extinguishment. As a result of the redemption, we incurred a pre-tax loss on debt
extinguishment of $109 million ($70 million after-tax), which included premiums of $99 million and the write-off of unamortized
debt issuance costs of $10 million.
On March 26, 2018, we paid an aggregate consideration of $317 million to redeem $302 million principal amount of the 7.50%
Notes due 2019 at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount plus accrued and unpaid interest of $2 million, and the
applicable redemption premium of $13 million pursuant to the terms of the indentures. As a result of the redemption, we incurred a
pre-tax loss on debt extinguishment of $13 million ($8 million after-tax), which primarily represented the premiums.
Repayments at maturity
In 2019, we repaid at maturity our $1.1 billion 2.28% notes due March 15, 2019. In 2018, we repaid at maturity our €500
million Euro-denominated bond due April 26, 2017 and our $500 million 1.40% notes due March 15, 2018. In 2017, we repaid at
maturity our €350 million Euro-denominated bond (or, approximately $385 million) due October 18, 2016, our $500 million 5.70%
notes due March 1, 2017 and our $700 million 1.29% notes due March 10, 2017.
Each note, which constitutes a “Series”, is an unsecured and unsubordinated obligation of the Company and ranks equally with
all of the Company’s existing and, from time-to-time, future unsecured and unsubordinated indebtedness outstanding. Each Series
is governed by materially similar indentures and officers’ certificates. Upon required notice to holders of notes with fixed interest
rates, we may redeem those notes at any time prior to maturity, in whole or in part, for cash at redemption prices. In the event of the
occurrence of both (1) a change of control of the Company and (2) a downgrade of a Series below an investment grade rating by
each of Fitch Inc., Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. and Standard & Poor’s Ratings Services within a specified period, an offer must
be made to purchase that Series from the holders at a price equal to 101% of the then outstanding principal amount of that Series,
plus accrued and unpaid interest to, but not including, the date of repurchase. The indenture and the related officers’ certificate for
each Series, subject to the exceptions and in compliance with the conditions as applicable, specify that we may not consolidate,
merge or sell all or substantially all of our assets, incur liens, or enter into sale-leaseback transactions exceeding specific terms,
without lenders’ consent. The indentures also contain customary events of default provisions.
Other Information
Scheduled principal payments of long-term debt are $330 million in 2020, $1,062 million in 2021, $675 million in 2022, $801
million in 2023, $1,099 million in 2024 and $3,628 million thereafter.
91
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Revolving Credit Facilities
We have a syndicated $3.5 billion five-year senior unsecured revolving credit facility (the “Global Facility”), which has a
$3.15 billion aggregate sublimit of availability in Canadian dollars, British pound sterling and Euros. The Global Facility matures
on October 22, 2020. Borrowings under the Global Facility bear interest based upon the London Interbank Offered Rate, Canadian
Dealer Offered Rate for credit extensions denominated in Canadian Dollars, a prime rate, or alternative overnight rates as
applicable, plus agreed margins. The Global Facility contains a financial covenant which obligates the Company to maintain a debt
to capital ratio of no greater than 65% and other customary investment grade covenants. If we do not comply with these covenants,
our ability to use the Global Facility may be suspended and repayment of any outstanding balances under the Global Facility may
be required. At March 31, 2019, we were in compliance with all covenants. There were no borrowings under this facility during
2019, 2018 and 2017, and no borrowings outstanding as of March 31, 2019 and 2018.
We also maintain bilateral credit lines primarily denominated in Euros with a committed balance of $9 million and an
uncommitted balance of $195 million as of March 31, 2019. Borrowings and repayments were not material in 2019 and 2018 and
amounts outstanding under these credit lines were not material as of March 31, 2019 and 2018.
Commercial Paper
We maintain a commercial paper program to support our working capital requirements and for other general corporate
purposes. Under the program, the Company can issue up to $3.5 billion in outstanding commercial paper notes. During 2019 and
2018, we borrowed $37,264 million and $20,542 million and repaid $37,264 million and $20,725 million under the program. At
March 31, 2019 and 2018, there were no commercial paper notes outstanding.
17.Variable Interest Entities
We evaluate our ownership, contractual and other interests in entities to determine if they are VIEs, if we have a variable
interest in those entities and the nature and extent of those interests. These evaluations are highly complex and involve management
judgment and the use of estimates and assumptions based on available historical information, among other factors. Based on our
evaluations, if we determine we are the primary beneficiary of such VIEs, we consolidate such entities into our financial
statements.
Consolidated Variable Interest Entities
We consolidate a VIE when we have the power to direct the activities that most significantly impact the VIE’s economic
performance and the obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive benefits of the VIE and, as a result, are considered the
primary beneficiary of the VIE. We consolidate certain single-lessee leasing entities where we, as the lessee, have the majority risk
of the leased assets due to our minimum lease payment obligations to these leasing entities. As a result of absorbing this risk, the
leases provide us with the power to direct the operations of the leased properties and the obligation to absorb losses or the right to
receive benefits of the entity. Consolidated VIEs do not have a material impact on our consolidated statements of operations and
cash flows. Total assets and liabilities included in our consolidated balance sheets for these VIEs were $896 million and $64 million
at March 31, 2019 and $819 million and $92 million at March 31, 2018.
Investments in Unconsolidated Variable Interest Entities
We are involved with VIEs which we do not consolidate because we do not have the power to direct the activities that most
significantly impact their economic performance and thus are not considered the primary beneficiary of the entities. Our
relationships include equity method investments and lending, leasing, contractual or other relationships with the VIEs. Our most
significant relationships are with oncology and other specialty practices. Under these practice arrangements, we generally own or
lease all of the real estate and equipment used by the affiliated practices and manage the practices’ administrative functions. We
also have relationships with certain pharmacies in Europe with whom we may provide financing, have equity ownership and/or a
supply agreement whereby we supply the vast majority of the pharmacies’ purchases. Our maximum exposure to loss (regardless of
probability) as a result of all unconsolidated VIEs was $1.1 billion at March 31, 2019 and 2018, which primarily represents the
value of intangible assets related to service agreements, equity investments and lease and loan receivables. This amount excludes
the customer loan guarantees discussed in Financial Note 23, “Financial Guarantees and Warranties.” We believe there is no
material loss exposure on these assets or from these relationships.
92
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
18.Pension Benefits
We maintain a number of qualified and nonqualified defined benefit pension plans and defined contribution plans for eligible
employees.
Defined Benefit Pension Plans
Eligible U.S. employees who were employed by the Company as of December 31, 1995 are covered under the Company-
sponsored defined benefit retirement plan. In 1997, the plan was amended to freeze all plan benefits as of December 31, 1996.
Benefits for the defined benefit retirement plan are based primarily on age of employees at date of retirement, years of creditable
service and the average of the highest 60 months of pay during the 15 years prior to the plan freeze date. We also have defined
benefit pension plans for eligible employees outside of the U.S., as well as an unfunded nonqualified supplemental defined benefit
plan for certain U.S. executives.
On May 23, 2018, the Company’s Board of Directors approved the termination of our frozen U.S. defined benefit pension plan
(“Plan”).  The distribution of plan assets pursuant to the termination will not be made until the plan termination satisfies all
regulatory requirements, which is expected to be completed by the second half of 2020. Plan participants will receive their full
accrued benefits from plan assets by electing either lump sum distributions or annuity contracts with a qualifying third-party
annuity provider. The plan termination is expected to result in pension settlement expense in 2020, which will be determined based
on prevailing market conditions, the actual lump sum distributions and annuity purchase rates at the date of distribution. As a result,
we are currently unable to reasonably estimate timing nor the final amount of such settlement charges. However, as of March 31,
2019 and 2018, this defined benefit pension plan had an accumulated comprehensive loss of approximately $121 million and $120
million.
Our non-U.S. defined benefit pension plans cover eligible employees located predominantly in Norway, United Kingdom,
Germany, and Canada. Benefits for these plans are based primarily on each employee’s final salary, with annual adjustments for
inflation. The obligations in Norway are largely related to the state-regulated pension plan which is managed by the Norwegian
Public Service Pension Fund (“SPK”). According to the terms of the SPK, the plan assets of state regulated plans in Norway must
correspond very closely to the pension obligation calculated using the principles codified in Norwegian law. In the United
Kingdom, we have subsidiaries that participate in a joint pension plan. The pension obligation in Germany is unfunded with the
exception of the contractual trust arrangement used to fund pensions of McKesson Europe’s Management Board.
Defined benefit plan assets and obligations are measured as of the Company’s fiscal year-end.
The net periodic expense for our pension plans is as follows:
 U.S. Plans  Non-U.S. Plans
 Years Ended March 31,  Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017
Service cost - benefits earned during the year $ — $ 3 $ 5 $ 15 $ 15 $ 15
Interest cost on projected benefit obligation 14 14 13 21 22 23
Expected return on assets (16) (19) (15) (23) (26) (26)
Amortization of unrecognized actuarial loss and prior
service costs 5 6 11 4 5 4
Curtailment/settlement loss (gain) 4 2 — 1 1 (2)
Net periodic pension expense $ 7 $ 6 $ 14 $ 18 $ 17 $ 14
The projected unit credit method is utilized in measuring net periodic pension expense over the employees’ service life for the
pension plans. Unrecognized actuarial losses exceeding 10% of the greater of the projected benefit obligation or the market value of
assets are amortized straight-line over the average remaining future service period of active employees.
93
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Information regarding the changes in benefit obligations and plan assets for our pension plans is as follows:
 U.S. Plans  Non-U.S. Plans
 Years Ended March 31,  Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2019 2018  2019  2018
Change in benefit obligations     
Benefit obligation at beginning of period (1)$ 485 $ 513 $ 1,035 $ 943
Service cost — 3 15 15
Interest cost 14 14 21 22
Actuarial loss (gain) 4 1 35 (15)
Benefits paid (64) (44) (36) (42)
Expenses paid — (2) (1) (1)
Amendments — — — (2)
Acquisitions — — 1 —
Foreign exchange impact and other — — (80) 115
Benefit obligation at end of period (1) $ 439 $ 485 $ 990 $ 1,035
     
Change in plan assets     
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of period $ 335 $ 293 $ 687 $ 623
Actual return on plan assets 12 35 18 21
Employer and participant contributions 39 53 23 17
Benefits paid (64) (44) (36) (42)
Expenses paid — (2) (1) (1)
Acquisitions — — — —
Foreign exchange impact and other — — (49) 69
Fair value of plan assets at end of period $ 322 $ 335 $ 642 $ 687
     
Funded status at end of period $ (117)$ (150) $ (348) $ (348)
     
Amounts recognized on the balance sheet     
Assets $ 7 $ 10 $ 20 $ 19
Current liabilities (115) (39) (13) (7)
Long-term liabilities (9) (121) (355) (360)
Total $ (117)$ (150) $ (348) $ (348)
(1)The benefit obligation is the projected benefit obligation.
The following table provides the projected benefit obligation, accumulated benefit obligation and fair value of plan assets for
all our pension plans, including accumulated benefit obligation in excess of plan assets.
 U.S. Plans  Non-U.S. Plans
 March 31,  March 31,
(In millions) 2019 2018  2019 2018
Projected benefit obligation $ 439 $ 485 $ 990 $ 1,035
Accumulated benefit obligation 439 485 949 990
Fair value of plan assets 322 335 642 687
94
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Amounts recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income (pre-tax) consist of:
 U.S. Plans  Non-U.S. Plans
 March 31,  March 31,
(In millions) 2019 2018  2019 2018
Net actuarial loss $ 133 $ 134 $ 186 $ 162
Prior service credit — — (4) (5)
Total $ 133 $ 134 $ 182 $ 157
Other changes in accumulated other comprehensive income (pre-tax) were as follows:
 U.S. Plans  Non-U.S. Plans
 Years Ended March 31,  Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017
Net actuarial loss (gain) $ 8 $ (15) $ (17) $ 42 $ (11)$ 47
Prior service credit — — — — (2) —
Amortization of:         
Net actuarial loss (9) (8) (11) (5) (6) (4)
Prior service credit (cost) — — — — — 2
Foreign exchange impact and other — — — (12) 19 (10)
Total recognized in other comprehensive loss
(income) $ (1) $ (23) $ (28) $ 25 $ — $ 35
We expect to amortize $11 million of actuarial loss for the pension plans from stockholders’ equity to pension expense in 2020.
The comparable 2019 amount was $14 million of actuarial loss. In addition, we expect to recognize $132 million in actuarial losses
for the pension plans to stockholders’ equity in 2020 as a result of $121 million from the termination of the U.S. defined benefit
pension plan and $11 million from the settlement from the executive benefit retirement plan for a recently retired executive.
Projected benefit obligations related to our unfunded U.S. plans were $124 million and $160 million at March 31, 2019 and
2018. Pension obligations for our unfunded plans are based on the recommendations of independent actuaries. Projected benefit
obligations relating to our unfunded non-U.S. plans were $293 million and $297 million at March 31, 2019 and 2018. Funding
obligations for our non-U.S. plans vary based on the laws of each non-U.S. jurisdiction.
Expected benefit payments, including assumed executive lump sum payments, for our pension plans are as follows:
$180 million, $64 million, $64 million, $62 million and $62 million for 2020 to 2024 and $327 million for 2025 through 2029.
Expected benefit payments are based on the same assumptions used to measure the benefit obligations and include estimated future
employee service. Expected contributions to be made for our pension plans are $146 million for 2020.
95
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Weighted-average assumptions used to estimate the net periodic pension expense and the actuarial present value of benefit
obligations were as follows:
 U.S. Plans  Non-U.S. Plans
 Years Ended March 31,  Years Ended March 31,
 2019 2018  2017  2019 2018  2017
Net periodic pension expense      
Discount rates 3.83% 3.55% 3.40% 2.35% 2.34% 2.72%
Rate of increase in compensation N/A (1)4.00 4.00 3.13 2.72 2.76
Expected long-term rate of return on plan assets 5.25 6.25 6.25 3.71 4.03 4.51
Benefit obligation      
Discount rates 3.65% 3.69% 3.39% 2.13% 2.35% 2.35%
Rate of increase in compensation N/A (1)N/A (1) 4.00 3.18 2.59 3.18
(1)This assumption is no longer needed in actuarial valuations as U.S. plans are frozen or have fixed benefits for the remaining active participants.
Our defined benefit pension plan liabilities are valued using a discount rate based on a yield curve developed from a portfolio
of high quality corporate bonds rated AA or better whose maturities are aligned with the expected benefit payments of our plans.
For March 31, 2019, our U.S. defined benefit liabilities are valued using a weighted average discount rate of 3.65%, which
represents a decrease of 4 basis points from our 2018 weighted-average discount rate of 3.69%. Our non-U.S. defined benefit
pension plan liabilities are valued using a weighted-average discount rate of 2.13%, which represents a decrease of 22 basis points
from our 2018 weighted average discount rate of 2.35%.
Plan Assets
Investment Strategy: The overall objective for U. S. pension plan assets has been to generate long-term investment returns
consistent with capital preservation and prudent investment practices, with a diversification of asset types and investment strategies.
Periodic adjustments were made to provide liquidity for benefit payments and to rebalance plan assets to their target allocations.
In September 2018, a new investment allocation strategy was put in place to protect the funded status of the U.S. plan assets
subsequent to Board approval of U.S. pension plan termination. The target allocation for U.S. plan assets at March 31, 2019 is
100% fixed income investments including cash and cash equivalents. The target allocations for U.S. plan assets at March 31, 2018
were 26% equity investments, 70% fixed income investments including cash and cash equivalents and 4% real estate. Equity
investments include common stock, preferred stock, and equity commingled funds. Fixed income investments include corporate
bonds, government securities, mortgage-backed securities, asset-backed securities, other directly held fixed income investments,
and fixed income commingled funds. The real estate investments are in a commingled real estate fund.
For both U.S. and non-U.S. plan assets, the investment strategies are subject to local regulations and the asset/liability profiles
of the plans in each individual country. Plan assets of the non-U.S. plans are broadly invested in a manner appropriate to the nature
and duration of the expected future retirement benefits payable under the plans. Plan assets are primarily invested in high-quality
corporate and government bond funds and equity securities. Assets are properly diversified to avoid excessive reliance on any
particular asset, issuer or group of undertakings so as to avoid accumulations of risk in the portfolio as a whole.
We develop the expected long-term rate of return assumption based on the projected performance of the asset classes in which
plan assets are invested. The target asset allocation was determined based on the liability and risk tolerance characteristics of the
plans and at times may be adjusted to achieve overall investment objectives.
Fair Value Measurements: The following tables represent our pension plan assets as of March 31, 2019 and 2018, using the
fair value hierarchy by asset class. The fair value hierarchy has three levels based on the reliability of the inputs used to determine
fair value. Level 1 refers to fair values determined based on unadjusted quoted prices in active markets for identical assets. Level 2
refers to fair values estimated using significant other observable inputs and Level 3 includes fair values estimated using significant
unobservable inputs.
96
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
 U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
 March 31, 2019 March 31, 2019
(In millions) Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Cash and cash equivalents$ 11 $ — $ — $ 11 $ 6 $ — $ — $ 6
Equity securities:          
Common and preferred
stock — — — — — — — —
Equity commingled
funds — — — — 62 82 — 144
Fixed income securities:          
Government securities — 33 — 33 4 135 — 139
Corporate bonds — 273 — 273 8 18 — 26
Mortgage-backed
securities — — — — — — — —
Asset-backed securities
and other — 5 — 5 — — — —
Fixed income
commingled funds — — — — 125 110 6 241
Other:          
Real estate funds — — — — 2 3 — 5
Other — — — — 21 — 3 24
Total $ 11 $ 311 $ — $ 322 $ 228 $ 348 $ 9 $ 585
Assets held at NAV
practical expedient (1)         
Equity commingled
funds   —      8
Fixed income
commingled funds   —      —
Real estate funds   —      —
Other   —      49
Total plan assets  $ 322    $ 642
97
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
 U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
 March 31, 2018 March 31, 2018
(In millions) Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Cash and cash equivalents$ 39 $ — $ — $ 39 $ 3 $ — $ — $ 3
Equity securities:        
Common and preferred
stock 7 — — 7 — — — —
Equity commingled
funds — — — — 41 94 — 135
Fixed income securities:        
Government securities — 85 — 85 5 113 — 118
Corporate bonds — 58 — 58 114 136 — 250
Mortgage-backed
securities — 7 — 7 — — — —
Asset-backed securities
and other — 21 — 21 — — — —
Fixed income
commingled funds — — — — — 64 — 64
Other:        
Real estate funds — — — — 2 — — 2
Other — — — — 22 — 4 26
Total $ 46 $ 171 $ — $ 217 $ 187 $ 407 $ 4 $ 598
Assets held at NAV
practical expedient (1)       
Equity commingled
funds   54    27
Fixed income
commingled funds   53    —
Real estate funds   11    —
Other   —    62
Total plan assets  $ 335  $ 687
(1)Equity commingled funds, fixed income commingled funds, real estate funds and other investments for which fair value is measured using the NAV per share
as a practical expedient are not leveled within the fair value hierarchy and are included as a reconciling item to total investments.
Cash and cash equivalents - Cash and cash equivalents include short-term investment funds that maintain daily liquidity and
aim to have constant unit values of $1.00. The funds invest in short-term fixed income securities and other securities with debt-like
characteristics emphasizing short-term maturities and high credit quality. Directly held cash and cash equivalents are classified as
Level 1 investments. Cash and cash equivalents include money market funds and other commingled funds, which have daily net
asset values derived from the underlying securities; these are classified as Level 1 investments.
Common and preferred stock - This investment class consists of common and preferred shares issued by U.S. and non-U.S.
corporations. Common shares are traded actively on exchanges and price quotes are readily available. Preferred shares may not be
actively traded. Holdings of common shares are generally classified as Level 1 investments.
Equity commingled funds - Some equity investments are held in commingled funds, which have daily net asset values derived
from quoted prices for the underlying securities in active markets; these are classified as Level 1 or Level 2 investments.
Fixed income securities - Government securities consist of bonds and debentures issued by central governments or federal
agencies; corporate bonds consist of bonds and debentures issued by corporations; mortgage-backed securities consist of debt
obligations secured by a mortgage or pool of mortgages; and asset-backed securities primarily consist of debt obligations secured
by an asset or pool of assets other than mortgages. Inputs to the valuation methodology include quoted prices for similar assets in
active markets, and inputs that are observable for the asset, either directly or indirectly, for substantially the full term of the asset.
Multiple prices and price types are obtained from pricing vendors whenever possible, enabling cross-provider price validations.
Fixed income securities are generally classified as Level 1 or Level 2 investments.
98
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Fixed income commingled funds - Some fixed income investments are held in exchange traded or commingled funds, which
have daily net asset values derived from the underlying securities; these are classified as Level 1, 2 or 3 investments.
Real estate funds - The value of the real estate funds is reported by the fund manager and is based on a valuation of the
underlying properties. Inputs used in the valuation include items such as cost, discounted future cash flows, independent appraisals
and market based comparable data. The real estate funds are classified as Level 1, 2, or 3 investments.
Other - At March 31, 2019 and 2018, this includes $35 million and $38 million of plan asset value relating to the SPK. In
principle, the SPK is organized as a pay-as-you-go system guaranteed by the Norwegian government as it holds no Company-
owned assets to back the pension liabilities. The Company pays a pension premium used to fund the plan, which is paid directly to
the Norwegian government who establishes an account for each participating employer to keep track of the financial status of the
plan, including managing the contributions and the payments. Further, the investment return credited to this account is determined
annually by the SPK based on the performance of long-term government bonds.
The activity attributable to Level 3 plan assets was insignificant in the years ended March 31, 2019 and 2018.
Multiemployer Plans
The Company contributes to a number of multiemployer pension plans under the terms of collective-bargaining agreements
that cover union-represented employees in the U.S. In 2017, we also contributed to the Pensjonsordningen for Apoteketaten
(“POA”), a mandatory multiemployer pension scheme for our pharmacy employees in Norway, managed by the association of
Norwegian Pharmacies.
The risks of participating in these multiemployer plans are different from single-employer pension plans in the following
aspects: (i) assets contributed to the multiemployer plan by one employer may be used to provide benefits to employees of other
participating employers; (ii) if a participating employer stops contributing to the plan, the unfunded obligations of the plan may be
borne by the remaining participating employers; and (iii) if the Company chooses to stop participating in some of its multiemployer
plans, the Company may be required to pay those plans an amount based on the underfunded status of the plan, referred to as a
withdrawal liability. Actions taken by other participating employers may lead to adverse changes in the financial condition of a
multiemployer benefit plan and our withdrawal liability and contributions may increase.
Contributions and amounts accrued for U.S. Plans were not material for the years ended March 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017.
Contributions to the POA for non-U.S. Plans exceeding 5% of total plan contributions were $27 million, $16 million and $18
million in 2019, 2018 and 2017. Based on actuarial calculations, we estimate the funded status for our non-U.S. Plans to be
approximately 75% as of March 31, 2019. No amounts were accrued for liability associated with the POA as we have no intention
to withdraw from the plan.
Defined Contribution Plans
We have a contributory retirement savings plan (“RSP”) for U.S. eligible employees. Eligible employees may contribute to the
RSP up to 75% of their eligible compensation on a pre-tax or post-tax basis not to exceed IRS limits. The Company makes
matching contributions in an amount equal to 100% of the employee’s first 3% of pay contributed and 50% for the next 2% of pay
contributed. The Company also may make an additional annual matching contribution for each plan year to enable participants to
receive a full match based on their annual contribution. The Company also contributed to non-U.S. plans that are available in
certain countries. Contribution expenses for the RSP and non-U.S. plans were $92 million, $82 million and $98 million for the
years ended March 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017.
99
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
19.Postretirement Benefits
We maintain a number of postretirement benefits, primarily consisting of healthcare and life insurance (“welfare”) benefits, for
certain eligible U.S. employees. Eligible employees consist of those who retired before March 31, 1999 and those who retired after
March 31, 1999, but were an active employee as of that date, after meeting other age-related criteria. We also provide
postretirement benefits for certain U.S. executives. Defined benefit plan obligations are measured as of the Company’s fiscal year-
end.
The net periodic (credit) expense for our postretirement welfare benefits is as follows:
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2019 2018 2017
Service cost - benefits earned during the year $ 1 $ 1 $ 1
Interest cost on accumulated benefit obligation 2 2 2
Amortization of unrecognized actuarial gain and prior service credit (5) (6) (1)
Net periodic postretirement (credit) expense $ (2)$ (3)$ 2
Information regarding the changes in benefit obligations for our postretirement welfare plans is as follows:
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2019  2018
Benefit obligation at beginning of period $ 78 $ 82
Service cost 1 1
Interest cost 2 2
Actuarial gain (3) (1)
Benefit payments (5) (6)
Benefit obligation at end of period $ 73 $ 78
The components of the amount recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income for the Company’s other
postretirement benefits at March 31, 2019 and 2018 were net actuarial gains of $7 million and $8 million and net prior service
credits of $9 million and $11 million. Other changes in benefit obligations recognized in other comprehensive income were net
actuarial gains of $1 million and $3 million in 2019 and 2018 and net prior service credits of $2 million and $3 million in 2019 and
2018.
We estimate that the amortization of the actuarial income from stockholders’ equity to other postretirement gain in 2020 will be
$5 million. Comparable 2019 amount was a benefit of $5 million.
Other postretirement benefits are funded as claims are paid. Expected benefit payments for our postretirement welfare benefit
plans are as follows: $7 million, $7 million, $7 million, $7 million and $6 million for 2020 to 2024 and $26 million cumulatively
for 2025 through 2029. Expected benefit payments are based on the same assumptions used to measure the benefit obligations and
include estimated future employee service. Expected contributions to be made for our postretirement welfare benefit plans are $7
million for 2020.
Weighted-average discount rates used to estimate postretirement welfare benefit expenses were 3.79%, 3.83% and 3.68% for
2019, 2018 and 2017. Weighted-average discount rates for the actuarial present value of benefit obligations were 3.92%, 3.92% and
3.82% for 2019, 2018 and 2017.
Actuarial gain or loss for the postretirement welfare benefit plan is amortized to income or expense over a three-year period.
The assumed healthcare cost trends used in measuring the accumulated postretirement benefit obligation were 3.00% for 2019 and
2018. For 2019, 2018 and 2017, a one-percentage-point increase or decrease in the assumed healthcare cost trend rate would not
have a material impact on the postretirement benefit obligations.
100
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Pursuant to various collective bargaining agreements, we contribute to multiemployer health and welfare plans that cover
union-represented employees. Our liability is limited to the contractual dollar obligations set forth by the collective bargaining
agreements. Contributions to the plans and amounts accrued were not material for the years ended March 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017.
20.Hedging Activities
In the normal course of business, we are exposed to interest rate and foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations. At times, we
limit these risks through the use of derivatives such as cross-currency swaps, foreign currency forward contracts and interest rate
swaps. In accordance with our policy, derivatives are only used for hedging purposes. We do not use derivatives for trading or
speculative purposes.
Foreign currency exchange risk
We conduct our business worldwide in U.S. dollars and the functional currencies of our foreign subsidiaries, including Euro,
British pound sterling and Canadian dollars. Changes in foreign currency exchange rates could have a material adverse impact on
our financial results that are reported in U.S. dollars. We are also exposed to foreign currency exchange rate risk related to our
foreign subsidiaries, including intercompany loans denominated in non-functional currencies. We have certain foreign currency
exchange rate risk programs that use foreign currency forward contracts and cross-currency swaps. These forward contracts and
cross-currency swaps are generally used to offset the potential income statement effects from intercompany loans denominated in
non-functional currencies. These programs reduce but do not entirely eliminate foreign currency exchange rate risk.
At March 31, 2019 and 2018, we had €1.95 billion Euro-denominated notes and £450 million British pound sterling-
denominated notes designated as non-derivative net investment hedges which hedge portions of our net investments in non-U.S.
subsidiaries against the effect of exchange rate fluctuations on the translation of foreign currency balances to the U.S. dollar. For all
notes that are designated as net investment hedges and meet effectiveness requirements, the changes in carrying value of the notes
attributable to the change in spot rates are recorded in foreign currency translation adjustments within Accumulated Other
Comprehensive Income in the consolidated statement of stockholders’ equity where they offset foreign currency translation gains
and losses recorded on our net investments.  To the extent foreign currency denominated notes designated as net investment hedges
are ineffective, changes in carrying value attributable to the change in spot rates are recorded in earnings. Gains of $259 million in
2019 and losses of $268 million and $13 million in 2018 and 2017 were recorded in other comprehensive income for net
investment hedges. There was no ineffectiveness in our net investment hedges for the years ended March 31, 2019 and 2018.
Derivatives Designated as Hedges
In March 2019, we entered into cross-currency swap contracts with total gross notional amounts of $499 million Canadian
dollars, which are designated as net investment hedges. In March 2018, we entered into cross-currency swap contracts with total
gross notional amounts of £432 million British pound sterling, which are designated as net investment hedges. In November 2018,
we entered into cross-currency swap contracts with total gross notional amounts of £500 million British pound sterling and $1
billion Canadian dollars, which are designated as net investment hedges.  Under the terms of the cross-currency swap contracts, we
agree with third parties to exchange fixed interest payments in one currency for fixed interest payments in another currency at
specified intervals and to exchange principal in one currency for principal in another currency, calculated by reference to agreed-
upon notional amounts. These swaps are utilized to hedge portions of our net investments denominated in British pound sterling
and Canadian dollars against the effect of exchange rate fluctuations on the translation of foreign currency balances to the U.S.
dollar. The changes in the fair value of these derivatives attributable to the changes in spot currency exchange rates and differences
between spot and forward interest rates are recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income in the consolidated statement of
stockholders’ equity where they offset foreign currency translation gains and losses recorded on our net investments denominated in
British pound sterling and Canadian dollars. To the extent foreign currency denominated notes designated as hedges are ineffective,
changes in carrying value attributable to the change in spot rates are recorded in earnings. Gains of $53 million in 2019 and losses
of $7 million in 2018 were recorded in other comprehensive income for net investment hedges. There was no ineffectiveness in our
hedges for the years ended March 31, 2019 and 2018. These cross-currency swaps will mature between November 2020 and
November 2024.
At March 31, 2019 and 2018, we had forward contracts to hedge the U.S. dollar against cash flows denominated in Canadian
dollars with total gross notional amounts of $81 million and $162 million, which were designated as cash flow hedges. The
remaining contract will mature in March 2020.
101
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
From time to time, we also enter into cross-currency swaps to hedge intercompany loans denominated in non-functional
currencies. For our cross-currency swap transactions, we agree with third parties to exchange fixed interest payments in one
currency for fixed interest payments in another currency at specified intervals and to exchange principal in one currency for
principal in another currency, calculated by reference to agreed-upon notional amounts. These cross-currency swaps are designed to
reduce the income statement effects arising from fluctuations in foreign exchange rates and have been designated as cash flow
hedges. At March 31, 2019 and March 31, 2018, we had cross-currency swaps with total gross notional amounts of approximately
$2,908 million and $3,412 million, which are designated as cash flow hedges. These swaps will mature between April 2020 and
January 2024.
For forward contracts and cross-currency swaps that are designated as cash flow hedges, the effective portion of changes in the
fair value of the hedges is recorded in Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income and reclassified into earnings in the same period
in which the hedged transaction affects earnings. Changes in fair values representing hedge ineffectiveness are recognized in
current earnings. Gains from cash flow hedges recorded in other comprehensive income were $28 million in 2019 and losses of $30
million and $19 million in 2018 and 2017. Gains or losses reclassified from Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income and
recorded in operating expenses in the consolidated statements of operations were not material in 2019, 2018 and 2017. There was
no ineffectiveness in our cash flow hedges for the years ended March 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017.
Derivatives Not Designated as Hedges
Derivative instruments not designated as hedges are marked-to-market at the end of each accounting period with the change in
value included in earnings.
We have a number of forward contracts to hedge the Euro against cash flows denominated primarily in British pound sterling
and other European currencies. At March 31, 2019 and 2018, the total gross notional amounts of these contracts were $28 million
and $29 million. These contracts will mature through October 2020 and none of these contracts were designated for hedge
accounting. Changes in the fair values for contracts not designated as hedges are recorded directly into earnings within operating
expenses and were not material in 2019, 2018 and 2017. Gains or losses from these contracts are largely offset by changes in the
value of the underlying intercompany foreign currency loans.
102
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Information regarding the fair value of derivatives on a gross basis is as follows:
 
Balance Sheet
CaptionMarch 31, 2019 March 31, 2018
 Fair Value of
DerivativeU.S.
Dollar
NotionalFair Value of
DerivativeU.S.
Dollar
Notional (In millions) Asset Liability Asset Liability
Derivatives designated for hedge
accounting   
Foreign exchange contracts
(current)Prepaid expenses
and other $ 17$ —$ 81 $ 15$ —$ 81
Foreign exchange contracts
(non-current)Other Noncurrent
Assets — — — 14 — 81
Cross-currency swaps
(current)Prepaid expenses
and other/Other
Accrued Liabilities — 18 — — 7 504
Cross-currency swaps (non-
current)Other Noncurrent
Assets/Liabilities 91 33 5,283 — 222 3,508
Total $ 108$ 51 $ 29$ 229
Derivatives not designated for
hedge accounting   
Foreign exchange contracts
(current)Prepaid expenses
and other $ —$ —$ 14 $ —$ —$ 13
Foreign exchange contracts
(current)Other accrued
liabilities — — 14 — — 16
Total $ —$ — $ —$ —
Refer to Financial Note 21, “Fair Value Measurements,” for more information on these recurring fair value measurements.
21.Fair Value Measurements
Fair value is defined as the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability in an orderly transaction
between market participants at the measurement date. There is a three-level hierarchy that prioritizes the inputs used in determining
fair value by their reliability and preferred use, as follows:
Level 1 - Valuations based on quoted prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities.
Level 2 - Valuations based on quoted prices in active markets for similar assets and liabilities, quoted prices for identical or
similar assets or liabilities in inactive markets, or other inputs that are observable or can be corroborated by
observable market data.
Level 3 - Valuations based on inputs that are both significant to the fair value measurement and unobservable.
At March 31, 2019 and 2018, the carrying amounts of cash, certain cash equivalents, restricted cash, marketable securities,
receivables, drafts and accounts payable, short-term borrowings and other current liabilities approximated their estimated fair
values because of the short maturity of these financial instruments.
The fair value of our commercial paper was determined using quoted prices in active markets for identical liabilities, which are
considered to be Level 1 inputs.
Our long-term debt is carried at amortized cost. The carrying amounts and estimated fair values of these liabilities were $7.6
billion and $7.9 billion at March 31, 2019 and $7.9 billion and $8.1 billion at March 31, 2018. The estimated fair value of our long-
term debt was determined using quoted market prices in a less active market and other observable inputs from available market
information, which are considered to be Level 2 inputs, and may not be representative of actual values that could have been
realized or that will be realized in the future.
103
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Assets Measured at Fair Value on a Recurring Basis
Cash and cash equivalents included investments in money market funds of $1,205 million and $799 million at March 31, 2019
and 2018. The fair value of the money market funds was determined by using quoted prices for identical investments in active
markets, which are considered to be Level 1 inputs under the fair value measurements and disclosure guidance. The carrying value
of all other cash equivalents approximates their fair value due to their relatively short-term nature. Fair values for our marketable
securities were not material at March 31, 2019 and 2018.
Fair values of our forward foreign currency contracts were determined using observable inputs from available market
information.  Fair values of our cross-currency swaps were determined using quoted foreign currency exchange rates and other
observable inputs from available market information.  These inputs are considered Level 2 under the fair value measurements and
disclosure guidance, and may not be representative of actual values that could have been realized or that will be realized in the
future. Refer to Financial Note 20, “Hedging Activities,” for fair value and other information on our foreign currency derivatives
including forward foreign currency contracts and cross-currency swaps.
There were no transfers between Level 1, Level 2 or Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy during the years ended March 31, 2019
and 2018.
Assets Measured at Fair Value on a Nonrecurring Basis
At March 31, 2019, assets measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis primarily consisted of goodwill and long-lived assets
for our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment.
At March 31, 2018, assets measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis consisted of goodwill, intangibles and other long-
lived assets for our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment and our Rexall Health business in Other.
Goodwill
Fair value assessments of the reporting unit and the reporting unit's net assets, which are performed for goodwill impairment
tests, are considered a Level 3 measurement due to the significance of unobservable inputs developed using company specific
information. We considered a market approach as well as an income approach using the DCF model to determine the fair value of
the reporting unit.
Refer to Financial Note 2, “Goodwill Impairment Charges,” for more information regarding goodwill impairment charges
recorded for certain reporting units during 2019, 2018 and 2017.
Long-lived Assets
We utilized multiple approaches including the DCF model and market approaches for estimating the fair value of intangible
assets. The future cash flows used in the analysis are based on internal cash flow projections based on our long-range plans and
include significant assumptions by management. Accordingly, the fair value assessment of the long-lived assets is considered a
Level 3 fair value measurement.
We measure certain intangible and other long-lived assets at fair value on a nonrecurring basis when they are deemed to be
other-than-temporarily impaired. An impairment charge is recorded when the cost of the asset exceeds its fair value and this
condition is determined to be other-than-temporary.
As discussed in Financial Note 3, “Restructuring and Asset Impairment Charges,” we recorded non-cash pre-tax charges of
$245 million ($207 million after-tax) during 2019 and $479 million ($443 million after-tax) during 2018 to impair the carrying
values of certain long-lived assets including intangible assets and capitalized software assets.
Liabilities Measured at Fair Value on a Nonrecurring Basis
At March 31, 2018, we remeasured the contingent consideration liability related to our acquisition of CMM at fair value on a
nonrecurring basis. Refer to Financial Note 4, “Business Combinations,” for more information on the fair value of the contingent
consideration liability. There were no liabilities measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis at March 31, 2019.
104
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
22.Lease Obligations
We lease facilities and equipment almost solely under operating leases. At March 31, 2019, future minimum lease payments
required under operating leases that have initial or remaining noncancelable lease terms in excess of one year for years ending
March 31 are:
(In millions)Noncancelable
Operating
Leases
2020 $ 454
2021 397
2022 343
2023 290
2024 236
Thereafter 936
Total minimum lease payments (1) (2)$ 2,656
(1)Amount includes future minimum lease payments for the sale-leaseback transaction of $49 million.
(2)Total minimum lease payments have not been reduced by minimum sublease income of $133 million due under future noncancelable subleases.
Rent expense under operating leases was $576 million, $568 million and $474 million in 2019, 2018 and 2017. We recognize
rent expense on a straight-line basis over the term of the lease, taking into account, when applicable, lessor incentives for tenant
improvements, periods where no rent payment is required and escalations in rent payments over the term of the lease. Deferred rent
is recognized for the difference between the rent expense recognized on a straight-line basis and the payments made per the terms
of the lease. Remaining terms for facilities leases generally range from one to fifteen years, while remaining terms for equipment
leases range from one to six years. Most real property leases contain renewal options (generally for five-year increments) and
provisions requiring us to pay property taxes and operating expenses in excess of base period amounts. Sublease rental income was
not material for 2019, 2018 and 2017.
23.Financial Guarantees and Warranties
Financial Guarantees
We have agreements with certain of our customers’ financial institutions, mainly in Canada and Europe, under which we have
guaranteed the repurchase of our customers’ inventory or our customers’ debt in the event these customers are unable to meet their
obligations to those financial institutions. For our inventory repurchase agreements, among other requirements, inventories must be
in resalable condition and any repurchase would be at a discount. The inventory repurchase agreements mostly relate to certain
Canadian customers and generally range from one to two years. Customers’ debt guarantees range from one to ten years and are
primarily provided to facilitate financing for certain customers. The majority of our customers’ debt guarantees are secured by
certain assets of the customer. At March 31, 2019, the maximum amounts of inventory repurchase guarantees and customers’ debt
guarantees were $251 million and $115 million, of which we have not accrued any material amounts. The expirations of these
financial guarantees are as follows: $195 million, $22 million, $9 million, $15 million and $35 million from 2020 through 2024 and
$90 million thereafter.
At March 31, 2019, our banks and insurance companies have issued $165 million of standby letters of credit and surety bonds,
which were issued on our behalf mostly related to our customer contracts and in order to meet the security requirements for
statutory licenses and permits, court and fiduciary obligations and our workers’ compensation and automotive liability programs.
Our software license agreements generally include certain provisions for indemnifying customers against liabilities if our
software products infringe a third party’s intellectual property rights. To date, we have not incurred any material costs as a result of
such indemnification agreements and have not accrued any liabilities related to such obligations.
105
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
In conjunction with certain transactions, primarily divestitures, we may provide routine indemnification agreements (such as
retention of previously existing environmental, tax and employee liabilities) whose terms vary in duration and often are not
explicitly defined. Where appropriate, obligations for such indemnifications are recorded as liabilities. Because the amounts of
these indemnification obligations often are not explicitly stated, the overall maximum amount of these commitments cannot be
reasonably estimated. Other than obligations recorded as liabilities at the time of divestiture, we have historically not made material
payments as a result of these indemnification provisions.
Warranties
In the normal course of business, we provide certain warranties and indemnification protection for our products and services.
For example, we provide warranties that the pharmaceutical and medical-surgical products we distribute are in compliance with the
U.S. Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act and other applicable laws and regulations. We have received the same warranties from our
suppliers, which customarily are the manufacturers of the products. In addition, we have indemnity obligations to our customers for
these products, which have also been provided to us from our suppliers, either through express agreement or by operation of law.
We also provide warranties regarding the performance of software and products we sell. Our liability under these warranties is
to bring the product into compliance with previously agreed upon specifications. For software products, this may result in
additional project costs, which are reflected in our estimates used for the percentage-of-completion method of accounting for
software installation services within these contracts. In addition, most of our customers who purchase our software and automation
products also purchase annual maintenance agreements. Revenues from these maintenance agreements are recognized on a straight-
line basis over the contract period and the cost of servicing product warranties is charged to expense when claims become
estimable. Accrued warranty costs were not material to the consolidated balance sheets.
24.Commitments and Contingent Liabilities
In addition to commitments and obligations incurred in our business, we are subject to a variety of claims incidental to the
normal conduct of our business, including claims from customers and vendors, pending and potential legal actions for damages,
governmental investigations, and other matters. The Company is vigorously defending itself against claims in the legal proceedings
described below. If we are unsuccessful in defending, or if we determine to settle, any of these matters, we may be required to pay
substantial sums, be subject to injunction or be forced to change how we operate our business, which could have a material adverse
impact on our financial position or results of operations.
Unless otherwise stated, we are unable to reasonably estimate the loss or a range of possible loss for the matters described
below. Often, it is not reasonably possible for us determine that a loss is probable for a claim, or to reasonably estimate the amount
of loss or a range of loss, because of the limited information available and the potential effects of future events and decisions by
third parties, such as courts and regulators, that will determine the ultimate resolution of the claim. Many of the matters described
below are at preliminary stages, raise novel theories of liability or seek an indeterminate amount of damages. It is not uncommon
for claims to be resolved over many years. We review loss contingencies at least quarterly, to determine whether the loss probability
has changed and whether we can make a reasonable estimate of the possible loss or range of loss. When we determine that a loss
from a claim is probable and reasonably estimable, we record a liability in the amount of our estimate for the ultimate loss. We also
provide disclosure when it is reasonably possible that a loss may be incurred or when it is reasonably possible that the amount of a
loss will exceed our recorded liability.
106
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
I. Litigation and Claims Involving Distribution of Controlled Substances
The Company is a defendant in many cases asserting claims related to distribution of controlled substances to pharmacies. We
often are named as defendants along with other pharmaceutical wholesale distributors, pharmaceutical manufacturers and retail
pharmacy chains. The plaintiffs in these actions include state attorneys general, county and municipal governments, hospitals,
Indian tribes, pension funds, third-party payors and individuals. These actions have been filed in state and federal courts throughout
the United States, and in Puerto Rico and Canada. They contain a variety of causes of action, including negligence, public nuisance,
unjust enrichment, civil conspiracy, as well as alleging violations of the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act, state
and federal controlled substances laws and other statutes.
Since December 5, 2017, nearly all such cases pending in federal district courts have been transferred for consolidated pre-trial
proceeding to a multi-district litigation (“MDL”) in the United States District Court for the Northern District of Ohio captioned In
re: National Prescription Opiate Litigation, Case No. 17-md-28-04. At present, there are approximately 1,700 cases under the
jurisdiction of the MDL court. On December 19, 2018, the court dismissed the City of Akron’s public nuisance claim and denied
dismissal of all other claims challenged in defendants’ motions to dismiss. The court has set a trial date of October 21, 2019 for the
claims brought by Cuyahoga County, Ohio and Summit County, Ohio.
The Company is also named in more than 240 similar state court cases in 37 states plus Puerto Rico. These include actions
filed by sixteen state attorneys general, and some by or on behalf of individuals, including wrongful death lawsuits and putative
class action lawsuits brought on behalf of children with Neonatal Abstinence Syndrome due to alleged exposure to opioids in utero.
Some of the state courts have ruled on defendants’ motions to dismiss. In the Connecticut coordinated actions, the court granted
defendants’ motion to dismiss on January 8, 2019 and dismissed all claims filed by 21 municipalities; plaintiffs appealed this
decision on January 22, 2019. In the New York coordinated actions, the court denied the distributors’ motion to dismiss on July 17,
2018; the distributor defendants appealed this decision on August 3, 2018. In the action filed by the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico,
the court, on December 12, 2018, dismissed plaintiff’s unjust enrichment claim and declined to dismiss the remaining claims; the
distributor defendants filed a motion for reconsideration on December 27, 2018. On December 29, 2018, the court denied the
distributors’ motion to dismiss in a case filed by eight West Virginia counties in Marshall County, West Virginia. On March 8, 2019,
the distributors filed a petition for writ of prohibition seeking discretionary review of this denial by the West Virginia Supreme
Court. In the case file by the Delaware Attorney General, on February 4, 2019, the court dismissed all the causes of action except
the claims for negligence and consumer fraud. On February 27, 2019, the court in the action brought by Clark County, Nevada
denied the defendants’ motions to dismiss; the defendants have filed a motion for reconsideration of this decision.
In the suit filed against the Company by the Attorney General of West Virginia in January 2016, on May 1, 2019, the parties
reached a settlement of all claims in the suit against McKesson. State of West Virginia ex rel. Patrick Morrisey v. McKesson Corp.,
Circuit Court of Boone County, West Virginia, Case No. 16-C-1. On May 2, 2019, the court entered an order dismissing the State’s
complaint as part of the parties’ settlement. Under the settlement agreement, McKesson paid $14.5 million on May 3, 2019, and
will pay five additional installments of $4.5 million over the next five years. The agreement provides that funds from the settlement
will be used in support of state initiatives to combat the opioid epidemic. The settlement does not include any admission of liability,
and McKesson expressly denies wrongdoing.
On April 3, 2017, Eli Inzlicht, a purported shareholder, filed a shareholder derivative complaint in the United States District
Court for the Northern District of California against certain officers and directors of the Company and the Company as a nominal
defendant, alleging violations of fiduciary duties relating to the Company’s previously disclosed agreement with the Drug
Enforcement Administration (“DEA”) and the Department of Justice and various United States Attorneys’ offices to settle all
potential administrative and civil claims relating to investigations about the Company’s suspicious order reporting practices for
controlled substances, and seeking restitution and disgorgement of all profits, benefits and other compensation obtained by the
defendants from the Company and attorneys’ fees, all in unspecified amounts, Inzlicht v. McKesson Corporation, et.al., No. 5:17-
cv-01850. On July 26, 2017, Vladimir Gusinsky, as trustee for the Vladimir Gusinsky Living Trust, a purported shareholder, filed a
shareholder derivative complaint in the same court based on similar allegations, Vladimir Gusinsky, as Trustee for the Vladimir
Gusinsky Living Trust v. McKesson Corporation, et.al., No. 5:17-cv-4248.  On October 9, 2017, the court consolidated the two
matters, In re McKesson Corporation Derivative Litigation, No. 4:17-cv-1850. On January 5, 2018, the defendants moved to
dismiss the consolidated suit. On May 14, 2018, the court denied in part and granted in part the motions to dismiss. On September
17, 2018, a Special Litigation Committee established by the Board of Directors of the Company moved to stay the entire litigation
while the Special Litigation Committee conducts an independent investigation concerning the plaintiffs’ allegations. On November
13, 2018, the court granted the motion to stay as to deposition discovery only.
107
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
On October 17, 2017, Chaile Steinberg, a purported shareholder, filed a shareholder derivative complaint in the Delaware
Court of Chancery against certain officers and directors of the Company and the Company as a nominal defendant, alleging
violations of fiduciary duties relating to the Company’s previously disclosed agreement with the DEA and the Department of
Justice and various United States Attorneys’ offices to settle all potential administrative and civil claims relating to investigations
about the Company’s suspicious order reporting practices for controlled substances, and seeking damages and disgorgement of all
profits, benefits and other compensation obtained by the defendants from the Company and attorneys’ fees, all in unspecified
amounts, Steinberg v. McKesson Corporation, et.al., No. 2017-0736. Three similar suits were thereafter filed by purported
shareholders in the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware, including Police & Fire Ret. Sys. of the City of Detroit v. McKesson
Corporation, et al., No. 2017-0803, Amalgamated Bank v. McKesson Corporation, et al., No. 2017-0881, and Greene v. McKesson
Corporation, et al., No. 2018-0042. The court ordered that all four actions be consolidated, and the plaintiffs designated the
complaint in the Steinberg action as the operative complaint. The consolidated matter is captioned In re McKesson Corporation
Stockholder Derivative Litigation, No. 2017-0736. The defendants filed a motion to dismiss the complaint on January 18, 2018. On
May 25, 2018, the court stayed further proceedings in this matter in favor of the In re McKesson Corporation Derivative Litigation
action referenced above.
On August 8, 2018, the Company was served with a qui tam complaint pending in the United States District Court for the
District of Massachusetts alleging that the Company violated the False Claims Act and various state false claims acts due to the
alleged failure of the Company and other defendants to report providers who were engaged in diversion. United States ex rel.
Manchester v. Purdue Pharma, L.P., et al., Case No. 1-16-cv-10947. On August 22, 2018, the United States filed a motion to
dismiss. The relator recently died, and on February 25, 2019 the court entered an order staying the matter until a proper party can
be substituted, and providing that if no party is substituted within 90 days of February 25, 2019, the case will be dismissed. On
April 3, 2019, the widow of the relator filed a motion to substitute their daughter as the relator; on April 12, 2019, the United States
filed its opposition to this substitution request.
II. Other Litigation and Claims
On May 17, 2013, the Company was served with a complaint filed in the United States District Court for the Northern District
of California by True Health Chiropractic Inc., alleging that McKesson sent unsolicited marketing faxes in violation of the
Telephone Consumer Protection Act of 1991 (“TCPA”), as amended by the Junk Fax Protection Act of 2005 or JFPA, True Health
Chiropractic Inc., et al. v. McKesson Corporation, et al., CV-13-02219 (HG). True Health Chiropractic later amended its
complaint, adding McLaughlin Chiropractic Associates as an additional named plaintiff and McKesson Technologies Inc. as a
defendant. Both plaintiffs alleged that the Company violated the TCPA because it sent faxes that did not contain notices regarding
how to opt out of receiving the faxes. On July 16, 2015, plaintiffs filed a motion for class certification and on August 22, 2016, the
court denied this motion, based, in part, on the grounds that identifying solicited faxes would require individualized inquiries as to
consent. Plaintiffs appealed to the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit. In March 2017, however, the United States
Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit held, in an unrelated matter, that the FCC’s rule requiring opt-out notices does
not apply to solicited fax advertisements (i.e. those sent with consent.) On July 27, 2018, the Ninth Circuit affirmed in part and
reversed in part the district court’s denial of class certification and remanded the case to the district court for further proceedings.
Plaintiffs filed a renewed motion for class certification on December 4, 2018. On January 25, 2019, the Company filed a petition
for writ of certiorari in the Supreme Court of the United States, asking the court to review the ruling by the Ninth Circuit. On April
17, 2019, the court denied the Company’s motion to stay the action pending the decision by the Supreme Court on the Company’s
petition for writ of certiorari.    
On December 29, 2017, two investment funds holding shares in Celesio AG filed a complaint against McKesson Europe
Holdings (formerly known as “Dragonfly GmbH & Co KGaA”), a subsidiary of the Company, in a German court in Stuttgart,
Germany, Polygon European Equity Opportunity Master Fund et al. v. McKesson Europe Holdings GmbH & Co. KGaA, No. 18 O
455/17. The complaint alleges that the public tender offer document published by McKesson Europe in its acquisition of Celesio
AG incorrectly stated that McKesson Europe’s acquisition of convertible bonds would not be treated as a relevant acquisition of
shares for the purposes of triggering minimum pricing considerations under Section 4 of the German Takeover Offer Ordinance. On
May 11, 2018, the court dismissed the claims against McKesson Europe. Plaintiffs appealed this ruling and, on December 19, 2018,
the Higher Regional Court (Oberlandesgericht) of Stuttgart confirmed the full dismissal of this matter. On March 13, 2019, the
Higher Regional Court issued an order dismissing Plaintiffs’ application to amend the factual part of the Court’s December 2018
opinion. On February 4, 2019, Plaintiffs filed a complaint against denial of leave to appeal with the Federal Supreme Civil Court
(Bundesgerichtshof).
108
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
On December 30, 2017, four additional investment funds, which allegedly entered into swap transactions regarding shares in
Celesio AG that would have enabled them to decide whether to accept the takeover offer described above, filed a claim, Davidson
Kempner International (BVI) Ltd. et al. v. McKesson Europe Holdings GmbH & Co. KGaA, No.16 O 475/17, that is similar to the
Polygon matter. On March 15, 2019, the lower court dismissed the case; plaintiffs filed an appeal with the Higher Regional Court
(Oberlandesgericht) of Stuttgart on April 15, 2019.
On March 5, 2018, the Company’s subsidiary, RxC Acquisition Company (d/b/a RxCrossroads), was served with a qui tam
complaint filed in July 2017 in the United States District Court for the Southern District of Illinois by a relator against RxC
Acquisition Company, among others, alleging that UCB, Inc., provided illegal “kickbacks” to providers, including nurse educator
services and reimbursement assistance services provided through RxC Acquisition Company, in violation of the Anti-Kickback
Statute, the False Claims Act, and various state false claims statutes. United States ex rel. CIMZNHCA, LLC v. UCB, Inc., et al.,
No. 17-cv-00765. The complaint seeks treble damages, civil penalties, and further relief, all in unspecified amounts. The United
States and the states named in the complaint have declined to intervene in the suit. On December 17, 2018, the Department of
Justice filed a motion to dismiss the complaint in its entirety; this motion was denied on April 15, 2019. On April 29, 2019, the
Department of Justice filed a motion for reconsideration of this denial. The court has set a trial date of April 5, 2021.
On April 16, 2013, the Company’s subsidiary, U.S. Oncology, Inc. (“USON”), was served with a third amended qui tam
complaint filed in the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York by two relators, purportedly on behalf of the
United States, 21 states and the District of Columbia, against USON and five other defendants, alleging that USON solicited and
received illegal “kickbacks” from Amgen in violation of the Anti-Kickback Statute, the False Claims Act, and various state false
claims statutes, and seeking damages, treble damages, civil penalties, attorneys’ fees and costs of suit, all in unspecified amounts,
United States ex rel. Piacentile v. Amgen Inc., et al., CV 04-3983 (SJ). Previously, the United States declined to intervene in the
case as to all allegations and defendants except for Amgen. On September 30, 2013, the court granted the United States’ motion to
dismiss the claims pled against Amgen. On September 17, 2018, the court granted USON’s motion to dismiss the claims pled
against it, with leave to amend. On November 16, 2018, the relators filed a fourth amended complaint. On March 29, 2019, USON
filed a motion to dismiss that amended complaint.
On June 17, 2014, U.S. Oncology Specialty, LP (“USOS”) was served with a fifth amended qui tam complaint filed in the
United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York by a relator against USOS, among others, alleging that USOS
solicited and received illegal “kickbacks” from Amgen in violation of the Anti-Kickback Statute, the False Claims Act, and various
state false claims statutes, and seeking damages, treble damages, civil penalties, attorneys’ fees and costs of suit, all in unspecified
amounts, United States ex rel. Hanks v. Amgen, Inc., et al. , CV-08-03096 (SJ). These claims are based on the same grounds as the
Piacentile action referenced above. Previously, the United States declined to intervene in the case as to all allegations and
defendants except for Amgen. On September 17, 2018, the court granted USOS’s motion to dismiss and gave the relator leave to
file another action after the Piacentile action is no longer pending. The relator appealed this order to the United States Court of
Appeals for the Second Circuit, and on December 11, 2018 the defendants moved to dismiss the appeal.
On November 27, 2018, the Company’s subsidiary, RxC Acquisition Company (d/b/a RxCrossroads) was served with a qui
tam complaint filed in the United States District Court for the Eastern District of Pennsylvania alleging that EMD Serono, Inc. and
Pfizer, Inc. provided illegal “kickbacks” to providers, including services provided through RxC Acquisition Company and others, in
violation of the Anti-Kickback statute, the False Claims Act, and various state false claims statutes. United States ex rel. Harris et
al. v. EMD Serono, Inc. et al., No. 16-5594. The United States and the named states declined to intervene in the case. On December
17, 2018, the Department of Justice filed a motion to dismiss the complaint in its entirety. On December 28, 2018, relators filed a
second amended complaint, and on January 7, 2019, relators and defendants jointly moved for a stay of the defendants’ response
deadline until after the Department of Justice’s motion to dismiss has been resolved. On April 3, 2019, the court granted the motion
to dismiss.
On January 24, 2019, the Company was served with a qui tam complaint that had previously been unsealed in the United States
District Court for the Eastern District of Texas, alleging that the Company and its subsidiary, U.S. Oncology, Inc., among others,
received payments for unnecessary medical services in violation of the False Claims Act and the Texas Medicaid Fraud Prevention
Act. United States ex rel. Nguyen v. McKesson Corp., et al., No. 4:15-00814. Previously, the United States and Texas declined to
intervene in the case. On March 19, 2019, the court granted relator’s motion to stay proceedings for ninety days.
109
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
On April 3, 2018, a second amended qui tam complaint was filed in the United States District Court for the Eastern District of
New York by a relator, purportedly on behalf of the United States, 30 states, the District of Columbia, and two cities against
McKesson Corporation, McKesson Specialty Care Distribution Corporation, McKesson Specialty Distribution LLC, McKesson
Specialty Care Distribution Joint Venture, L.P., Oncology Therapeutics Network Corporation, Oncology Therapeutics Network
Joint Venture, L.P., US Oncology, Inc. and US Oncology Specialty, L.P., alleging that from 2001 through 2010 the defendants
repackaged and sold single-dose syringes of oncology medications in a manner that violated the federal False Claims Act and
various state and local false claims statutes, and seeking damages, treble damages, civil penalties, attorneys’ fees and costs of suit,
all in unspecified amounts, United States ex rel. Omni Healthcare Inc. v. McKesson Corporation, et al. , 12-CV-06440 (NG).  The
United States and the named states have declined to intervene in the case. On October 15, 2018, the Company filed a motion to
dismiss the complaint as to all named defendants. On February 3, 2019, the court granted the motion to dismiss in part and denied it
in part, leaving the Company and Oncology Therapeutics Network Corporation as the only remaining defendants in the case. On
February 19, 2019, the relator filed a motion for reconsideration of the court’s dismissal of Oncology Therapeutics Network Joint
Venture.
The Company is a defendant in an amended complaint filed on June 15, 2018 in a case pending in the United States District
Court for the Southern District of Illinois alleging that the Company’s subsidiary, McKesson Medical-Surgical Inc., among others,
violated the Sherman Act by restraining trade in the sale of safety and conventional syringes and safety IV catheters. Marion
Diagnostic Center, LLC v. Becton, Dickinson, et al., No. 18:1059. The action is filed on behalf of a purported class of purchasers,
and seeks treble damages and further relief, all in unspecified amounts. On July 20, 2018, the defendants filed a motion to dismiss.
On November 30, 2018, the district court granted the motion to dismiss, and dismissed the complaint with prejudice. On December
27, 2018, plaintiffs appealed the order to the United States Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit.
On September 25, 2018, plaintiffs filed a complaint in the United States District Court for the Eastern District of Pennsylvania
alleging that the Company and its subsidiary, McKesson Medical-Surgical Inc., among others, violated the Sherman Act by
restraining trade in the sale of generic drugs. Marion Diagnostic Center, LLC v. McKesson Corporation, et al., No. 2:18-cv-4137. A
motion to dismiss was filed on February 21, 2019 and the plaintiffs have agreed to a discovery stay until the motion is resolved.
On December 12, 2018, the Company was served with a class action complaint in the United States District Court for the
Northern District of California, alleging that McKesson and two of its officers, CEO John Hammergren and former CFO James
Beer, violated the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 by reporting profits and revenues from 2013 until early 2017 that were false and
misleading, due to an alleged conspiracy to fix the prices of generic drugs. Evanston Police Pension Fund v. McKesson
Corporation, No. 3:18-06525. On February 8, 2019, the court appointed the Pension Trust Fund for Operating Engineers as the lead
plaintiff. On April 10, 2019, the lead plaintiff filed an amended complaint that added insider trading allegations against defendant
Hammergren.
The Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Company (“A&P”), a former customer of the Company, filed Chapter 11 in the United States
Bankruptcy Court for the Southern District of New York in July 2015. In re The Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Company, Inc., et al.,
Case No. 15-23007. The Company has been sued in a lawsuit in this bankruptcy case which seeks to recover approximately $68
million in allegedly preferential transfers. The Official Committee of Unsecured Creditors on behalf of the bankruptcy estate of The
Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Company, Inc., et al. v. McKesson Corporation d/b/a McKesson Drug Co., Adv. Proc. No. 17-08264.
110
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
III. Government Subpoenas and Investigations
From time to time, the Company receives subpoenas or requests for information from various government agencies. The
Company generally responds to such subpoenas and requests in a cooperative, thorough and timely manner. These responses
sometimes require time and effort and can result in considerable costs being incurred by the Company. Such subpoenas and
requests also can lead to the assertion of claims or the commencement of civil or criminal legal proceedings against the Company
and other members of the health care industry, as well as to settlements. As an example of the type of subpoenas or requests the
Company receives from time to time, in August 2015, the Company was served with a Civil Investigative Demand by the U.S.
Attorney’s Office for the Southern District of New York relating to certain business analytics tools offered to its customers. In May
2017 and August 2018, respectively, the Company was served with two separate Civil Investigative Demands by the U.S.
Attorney’s Office for the Eastern District of New York relating to the certification the Company obtained for two software products
under the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services’ Electronic Health Record Incentive Program.  In September 2017, the
Company received a request for information and documents from a group of approximately 40 state attorneys general related to an
investigation into the factors contributing to the increasing number of opioid-related hospitalizations and deaths in the United
States. The Company has also received civil investigative demands, subpoenas or requests for information from several other state
attorneys general on the same issues. In January 2019, the Company was served with a subpoena by the U.S. Department of Health
and Human Services, Office of Inspector General, related to the Company’s participation in the Medicaid Drug Rebate Program.
The Company is currently responding to these requests.
In 2015, the Company recorded a pre-tax charge of $150 million relating to the Company’s previously disclosed agreement
with the DEA and the Department of Justice and various United States Attorneys’ offices to settle all potential administrative and
civil claims relating to investigations about the Company’s suspicious order reporting practices for controlled substances. In
January 2017, the Company finalized the settlements and paid $150 million in cash.
New York Opioid Statute
Legislative, regulatory or industry measures to address the misuse of prescription opioid medications could affect the
Company’s business in ways that we may not be able to predict. For example, in April 2018, the State of New York adopted the
Opioid Stewardship Act (the “OSA”) which required the creation of an aggregate $100 million annual surcharge on all
manufacturers and distributors licensed to sell or distribute opioids in New York.  The initial surcharge payment would have been
due on January 1, 2019 for opioids sold or distributed during calendar year 2017. On December 19, 2018, the United States District
Court for the Southern District of New York found the law unconstitutional and issued an injunction preventing the State of New
York from enforcing the law. On January 17, 2019, the State filed a notice of appeal. The State of New York has subsequently
adopted a tax on sales of opioids in the State. The excise tax would apply only to the first sale occurring in New York, and thus may
not apply to sales from the Company’s distribution centers in New York to pharmacy customers.
In addition, other states are considering legislation that could require us to pay taxes, licensing fees, or assessments on the
distribution of opioid medications in those states. These proposed bills vary in the amounts and the means of calculation. Liabilities
for taxes or assessments under any such laws will likely have an adverse impact on our results of operations, unless we are able to
mitigate them through operational changes or commercial arrangements where permitted.
IV. Environmental Matters
Primarily as a result of the operation of the Company’s former chemical businesses, which were fully divested by 1987, the
Company is involved in various matters pursuant to environmental laws and regulations. The Company has received claims and
demands from governmental agencies relating to investigative and remedial actions purportedly required to address environmental
conditions alleged to exist at five sites where it, or entities acquired by it, formerly conducted operations and the Company, by
administrative order or otherwise, has agreed to take certain actions at those sites, including soil and groundwater remediation.
Based on a determination by the Company’s environmental staff, in consultation with outside environmental specialists and
counsel, the current estimate of the Company’s probable loss associated with the remediation costs for these five sites is
$10 million, net of amounts anticipated from third parties. The $10 million is expected to be paid out between April 2019 and
March 2049. The Company’s estimated probable loss for these environmental matters has been entirely accrued for in the
accompanying consolidated balance sheets.
111
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
In addition, the Company has been designated as a Potentially Responsible Party (“PRP”) under the Superfund law for
environmental assessment and cleanup costs as the result of its alleged disposal of hazardous substances at 14 sites. With respect to
these sites, numerous other PRPs have similarly been designated and while the current state of the law potentially imposes joint and
several liabilities upon PRPs, as a practical matter, costs of these sites are typically shared with other PRPs. At one of these sites,
the United States Environmental Protection Agency has selected a preferred remedy with an estimated cost of approximately $1.38
billion. It is not certain at this point in time what proportion of this estimated liability will be borne by the Company or by the
numerous other PRPs. Accordingly, the Company’s estimated probable loss at those 14 sites is approximately $23.1 million, which
has been entirely accrued for in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets. However, it is possible that the ultimate costs of
these matters may exceed or be less than the reserves.
V. Value Added Tax Assessments
We operate in various countries outside the United States which collect value added taxes (“VAT”).  The determination of the
manner in which a VAT applies to our foreign operations is subject to varying interpretations arising from the complex nature of the
tax laws. We have received assessments for VAT which are in various stages of appeal. We disagree with these assessments and
believe that we have strong legal arguments to defend our tax positions.  Certain VAT assessments relate to years covered by an
indemnification agreement.  Due to the complex nature of the tax laws, it is not possible to estimate the outcome of these matters. 
However, based on currently available information, we believe the ultimate outcome of these matters will not have a material
adverse effect on our financial position, cash flows or results of operations.
VI. Other Matters
The Company is involved in various other litigation, governmental proceedings and claims, not described above, that arise in
the normal course of business. While it is not possible to determine the ultimate outcome or the duration of such litigation,
governmental proceedings or claims, the Company believes, based on current knowledge and the advice of counsel, that such
litigation, proceedings and claims will not have a material impact on the Company’s financial position or results of operations.
25.Stockholders’ Equity
Each share of the Company’s outstanding common stock is permitted one vote on proposals presented to stockholders and is
entitled to share equally in any dividends declared by the Company’s Board of Directors (the “Board”).
In July 2018, the Company’s quarterly dividend was raised from $0.34 to $0.39 per common share for dividends declared on or
after such date by the Board. Dividends were $1.51 per share in 2019, $1.30 per share in 2018 and $1.12 per share in 2017. The
Company anticipates that it will continue to pay quarterly cash dividends in the future.  However, the payment and amount of future
dividends remain within the discretion of the Board and will depend upon the Company’s future earnings, financial condition,
capital requirements and other factors.
Share Repurchase Plans
Stock repurchases may be made from time-to-time in open market transactions, privately negotiated transactions, through
accelerated share repurchase (“ASR”) programs, or by any combination of such methods. The timing of any repurchases and the
actual number of shares repurchased will depend on a variety of factors, including our stock price, corporate and regulatory
requirements, restrictions under our debt obligations and other market and economic conditions.
112
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Information regarding the share repurchase activity over the last three years is as follows:
 Share Repurchases (1)
(In millions, except price per share data)  Total
Number of
Shares
       Purchased (2) (3) Average Price
Paid Per ShareApproximate
Dollar Value of
Shares that May
Yet Be Purchased
Under the
Programs
Balance, March 31, 2016     $ 996
Shares repurchase plans authorized      
   October 2016     4,000
Shares repurchased  15.5  $ 141.16 (2,250)
Balance, March 31, 2017     $ 2,746
Shares repurchased  10.5  $ 151.06 (1,650)
Balance, March 31, 2018     $ 1,096
Shares repurchase plans authorized      
May 2018     4,000
Shares repurchased  13.5  $ 130.72 (1,627)
Balance, March 31, 2019     $ 3,469
(1)This table does not include shares tendered to satisfy the exercise price in connection with cashless exercises of employee stock options or shares tendered to
satisfy tax withholding obligations in connection with employee equity awards.
(2)All of the shares purchased were part of the publicly announced programs.
(3)The number of shares purchased reflects rounding adjustments.
During the last three years, our share repurchases were transacted through both open market transactions and ASR programs
with third party financial institutions.
In October 2016, the Board authorized the repurchase of up to $4.0 billion of the Company’s common stock. 
In 2017, we repurchased 14.1 million of the Company’s shares for $2.0 billion through open market transactions at an average
price per share of $140.96.  In March 2017, we entered into an ASR program with a third-party financial institution to repurchase
$250 million of the Company’s common stock. As of March 31, 2017, we had received 1.4 million shares under this program. This
ASR program was completed in April 2017 and we received 0.3 million additional shares. The total number of shares repurchased
under this ASR program was 1.7 million shares at an average price per share of $143.19.  During 2017, we completed the October
2015 share repurchase authorization. The total authorization outstanding for repurchases of the Company’s common stock was $2.7
billion at March 31, 2017.
In 2018, we repurchased 3.5 million of the Company’s shares for $500 million through open market transactions at an average
price per share of $144.43. In June 2017, August 2017 and March 2018, we entered into three separate ASR programs with third-
party financial institutions to repurchase $250 million, $400 million and $500 million of the Company’s common stock. As of
March 31, 2018, we completed and received a total of 1.5 million shares under the June 2017 ASR program and a total of 2.7
million shares under the August 2017 ASR program. In addition, we received 2.5 million shares representing the initial number of
shares due in March 2018 and an additional 1.0 million shares in the first quarter of 2019. The March 2018 ASR program was
completed at an average price per share of $143.66 during the first quarter of 2019. The total authorization outstanding for
repurchase of the Company’s common stock was $1.1 billion at March 31, 2018.
In May 2018, the Board authorized the repurchase of up to $4.0 billion of the Company’s common stock. The total
authorization outstanding for repurchases of the Company’s common stock was increased to $5.1 billion.
During 2019, we repurchased 10.4 million of the Company’s shares for $1.4 billion through open market transactions at an
average price per share of $132.14.
113
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
In December 2018, we entered into an ASR program with a third-party financial institution to repurchase $250 million of the
Company’s common stock. The total number of shares repurchased under this ASR program was 2.1 million shares at an average
price per share of $117.98. The total authorization outstanding for repurchase of the Company’s common stock was $3.5 billion at
March 31, 2019.
In 2019, we retired 5.0 million or $542 million of the Company’s treasury shares previously repurchased. Under the applicable
state law, these shares resume the status of authorized and unissued shares upon retirement. In accordance with our accounting
policy, we allocate any excess of share repurchase price over par value between additional paid-in capital and retained earnings.
Accordingly, our retained earnings and additional paid-in capital were reduced by $472 million and $70 million during 2019.
114
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
Information regarding other comprehensive income (loss) including noncontrolling interests and redeemable noncontrolling
interests, net of tax, by component is as follows:
 Years Ended March 31,
 (In millions) 2019  2018 2017
Foreign currency translation adjustments:(1)    
Foreign currency translation adjustments arising during period, net of income tax
(expense) benefit of nil, nil and $1 (2) (3)$ (431) $ 804$ (644)
Reclassified to income statement, net of income tax expense of nil, nil and nil (4)— — 20
 (431) 804 (624)
Unrealized gains (losses) on net investment hedges (5)    
Unrealized gains (losses) on net investment hedges arising during period, net of
income tax (expense) benefit of ($71), $95 and $5 241 (180) (8)
Reclassified to income statement, net of income tax expense of nil, nil and nil — — —
 241 (180) (8)
Unrealized gains (losses) on cash flow hedges:     
Unrealized gains (losses) on cash flow hedges arising during period, net of income
tax (expense) benefit of ($4), $9 and nil 24 (30) (19)
Reclassified to income statement, net of income tax expense of nil, nil and nil — — —
 24 (30) (19)
Changes in retirement-related benefit plans:     
Net actuarial gain (loss) and prior service credit (cost) arising during the period, net
of income tax (expense) benefit of $5, ($2) and ($4) (6)(51) 25 (20)
Amortization of actuarial loss, prior service cost and transition obligation, net of
income tax (expense) of nil, ($2) and ($4) (7)9 5 9
Foreign currency translation adjustments and other, net of income tax expense of nil,
nil and nil 10 (15) 3
Reclassified to income statement, net of income tax expense of nil, nil and nil — — —
 (32) 15 (8)
  
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss), net of tax $ (198) $ 609$ (659)
(1)Foreign currency translation adjustments primarily result from the conversion of non-U.S. dollar financial statements of our foreign subsidiaries McKesson
Europe, into the Company’s reporting currency, U.S. dollars.
(2)The 2019 net foreign currency translation losses of $431 million were primarily due to the weakening of the Euro, British pound sterling and Canadian dollar
against the U.S. dollar from April 1, 2018 to March 31, 2019. The 2018 net foreign currency translation gains of $804 million were primarily due to the
strengthening of the Euro, British pound sterling and Canadian dollar against the U.S. dollar from April 1, 2017 to March 31, 2018. The 2017 net foreign
currency translation losses of $644 million were primarily due to the weakening of the Euro and British pound sterling against the U.S. dollar from April 1,
2016 to March 31, 2017.
(3)2019 includes net foreign currency translation losses of $61 million and 2018 includes net foreign currency translation gains of $189 million attributable to
noncontrolling and redeemable noncontrolling interests.
(4)These net foreign currency losses were reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) to discontinued operations within our consolidated
statement of operations due to the sale of our Brazilian pharmaceutical distribution business.
(5)2019, 2018 and 2017 include foreign currency gains of $259 million and losses of $268 million and $13 million on the net investment hedges from the Euro
and British pound sterling-denominated notes. 2019 and 2018 also include foreign currency gains of $53 million and losses of $7 million on the net investment
hedges from the cross-currency swaps.
(6)The net actuarial losses of $5 million and $4 million were attributable to noncontrolling and redeemable noncontrolling interests in 2019 and 2018.
(7)Pre-tax amount was reclassified into cost of sales and operating expenses in the consolidated statements of operations. The related tax expense was reclassified
into income tax expense in the consolidated statements of operations.
115
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
Information regarding changes in our accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) by component are as follows:
 Foreign Currency Translation
Adjustments    
(In millions)Foreign
Currency
Translation
Adjustments,
Net of Tax Unrealized
Losses on
Net
Investment
Hedges,
Net of TaxUnrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Cash Flow
Hedges,
Net of TaxUnrealized
Net Gains
(Losses) and
Other
Components
of Benefit
Plans, Net of
Tax  Total
Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)
Balance at March 31, 2017 $ (1,873) $ (8)$ (31)$ (229) $ (2,141)
Other comprehensive income (loss)
before reclassifications 804 (180) (30) 10 604
Amounts reclassified to earnings — — — 5 5
Other comprehensive income (loss) $ 804 $ (180)$ (30)$ 15 $ 609
Less: amounts attributable to
noncontrolling and redeemable
noncontrolling interests 189 — — (4) 185
Other comprehensive income (loss)
attributable to McKesson $ 615 $ (180)$ (30)$ 19 $ 424
Balance at March 31, 2018 $ (1,258) $ (188)$ (61)$ (210) $ (1,717)
Other comprehensive income (loss)
before reclassifications (431) 241 24 (41) (207)
Amounts reclassified to earnings and
other — — — 9 9
Other comprehensive income (loss) $ (431) $ 241 $ 24 $ (32) $ (198)
Less: amounts attributable to
noncontrolling and redeemable
noncontrolling interests (61) — — (5) (66)
Other comprehensive income (loss)
attributable to McKesson $ (370) $ 241 $ 24 $ (27) $ (132)
Balance at March 31, 2019 $ (1,628) $ 53 $ (37)$ (237) $ (1,849)
26.Related Party Balances and Transactions
During the fourth quarter of 2018, a public benefit California foundation (“Foundation”) was established to provide opioid
education to patients, caregivers, and providers, address policy issues, and increase patient access to life-saving treatments.  Certain
officers of the Company also serve as directors and officers of the Foundation. In March 2018, we made a pledge to the Foundation
and incurred a pre-tax charitable contribution expense of $100 million ($64 million after-tax) for 2018, which was recorded under
the caption, “Selling, distribution and administrative expenses,” in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations. The
Company had a pledge payable balance of $100 million to the Foundation as of March 31, 2018, which was included under the
caption, “Other accrued liabilities,” in our consolidated balance sheet. The pledge was fully paid in 2019.
McKesson Europe has investments in pharmacies located across Europe that are accounted for under the equity method.
McKesson Europe maintains distribution arrangements with these pharmacies for the sale of related goods and services under
which revenues of $137 million, $154 million, and $112 million are included in our consolidated statements of operations for the
years ended March 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 and receivables of $13 million and $15 million are included in our consolidated
balance sheets as of March 31, 2019 and 2018.
Refer to Financial Note 5, “Healthcare Technology Net Asset Exchange,” for information regarding related party balances and
transactions with Change Healthcare.
116
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
27.Sale-Leaseback
In 2017, we completed a sale-leaseback transaction for our corporate headquarters building in San Francisco, California. The
transaction resulted in net cash proceeds of $223 million and a pre-tax gain of $15 million, which represents the amount of total
gain in excess of the present value of the minimum lease payments. Additionally, we initially deferred a pre-tax gain of $48 million;
such gain was being amortized on a straight-line basis over the lease term as a reduction to selling, distribution, and administrative
expense in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations. Upon the adoption of the amended lease guidance in the first
quarter of 2020, the existing deferred gain on this sale-leaseback transaction will be derecognized from the consolidated balance
sheet and recognized to opening retained earnings. Refer to Financial Note 1, “Significant Accounting Policies,” for more
information. Refer to Financial Note 22, “Lease Obligations,” for the future minimum lease payments associated with this sale-
leaseback.
28.Segments of Business
Commencing in the first quarter of 2019, a new segment reporting structure was implemented, and we report our financial
results in three reportable segments on a retrospective basis: U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions, European
Pharmaceutical Solutions and Medical-Surgical Solutions. All remaining operating segments and business activities that are not
significant enough to require separate reportable segment disclosure are included in Other also on a retrospective basis. The factors
for determining the reportable segments included the manner in which management evaluates the performance of the Company
combined with the nature of the individual business activities. We evaluate the performance of our operating segments on a number
of measures, including revenues and operating profit before interest expense and income taxes. Assets by operating segment are not
reviewed by management for the purpose of assessing performance or allocating resources.
Our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment distributes pharmaceutical and other healthcare-related products and
also provides pharmaceutical solutions to pharmaceutical manufacturers in the United States.
Our European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment provides distribution and services to wholesale, institutional and retail
customers and serves patients and consumers in 13 European countries through our own pharmacies and participating pharmacies
that operate under brand partnership and franchise arrangements.
Our Medical-Surgical Solutions segment distributes medical-surgical supplies and provides logistics and other services to
healthcare providers in the United States.
Other primarily consists of the following:
•McKesson Canada which distributes pharmaceutical and medical products and operates Rexall Health retail pharmacies;
•McKesson Prescription Technology Solutions which provides innovative technologies that support retail pharmacies; and
•Our 70% equity ownership interest in a joint venture, Change Healthcare, which is accounted for by us using the equity
investment method of accounting.
Corporate includes expenses associated with Corporate functions and projects, and the results of certain investments. Corporate
expenses are allocated to operating segments to the extent that these items are directly attributable.
117
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Financial information relating to our reportable operating segments and reconciliations to the consolidated totals is as follows:
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2019  2018  2017
Revenues   
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions (1)$ 167,763 $ 162,587 $ 155,236
European Pharmaceutical Solutions (1)27,242 27,320 24,847
Medical-Surgical Solutions (1)7,618 6,611 6,244
Other 11,696 11,839 12,206
Total Revenues $ 214,319 $ 208,357 $ 198,533
  
Operating profit (2)  
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions (3)$ 2,697 $ 2,535 $ 2,488
European Pharmaceutical Solutions (4)(1,978) (1,681) 173
Medical-Surgical Solutions 455 461 401
Other (5) (6) (7) 394 (107) 4,514
Total 1,568 1,208 7,576
Corporate Expenses, Net (8)(694) (564) (377)
Loss on Debt Extinguishment — (122) —
Interest Expense (264) (283) (308)
Income from Continuing Operations Before Income Taxes $ 610 $ 239 $ 6,891
  
Depreciation and amortization (9)  
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions $ 238 $ 210 $ 235
European Pharmaceutical Solutions 257 296 315
Medical-Surgical Solutions 118 97 101
Other 214 237 149
Corporate 122 111 110
Total $ 949 $ 951 $ 910
  
Expenditures for long-lived assets (10)  
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions $ 88 $ 126 $ 109
European Pharmaceutical Solutions 85 104 125
Medical-Surgical Solutions 110 34 9
Other 68 42 63
Corporate 75 99 98
Total $ 426 $ 405 $ 404
  
Revenues, net by geographic area   
United States $ 176,296 $ 169,943 $ 164,428
Foreign 38,023 38,414 34,105
Total Revenues $ 214,319 $ 208,357 $ 198,533
(1)Revenues derived from services represent less than 1% of our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment’s total revenues, less than 10% of our
European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment’s total revenues and less than 1% of our Medical-Surgical Solutions segment’s total revenues.
(2)Segment operating profit includes gross profit, net of operating expenses, as well as other income, net, for our operating segments.
(3)Our U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions segment’s operating profit for 2019, 2018 and 2017 includes pre-tax credits of $210 million, $99 million and
$7 million related to our LIFO method of accounting for inventories. LIFO credits were higher in 2019 and 2018 compared to the comparable prior year
periods primarily due to higher net effect of price declines. Operating profit for 2019 and 2017 includes $202 million and $144 million of net cash proceeds
representing our share of net settlements of antitrust class action lawsuits. In addition, operating profit for 2018 includes a pre-tax gain of $43 million
recognized from the sale of an equity investment.
118
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
(4)European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment’s operating profit for 2019 and 2018 include non-cash pre-tax goodwill impairment charges of $1,776 million and
$1,283 million. This segment’s operating profit for 2019 and 2018 also includes non-cash pre-tax long-lived asset impairment charges of $210 million and
$446 million.
(5)Operating profit for Other for 2019 and 2018 includes non-cash pre-tax goodwill and long-lived asset impairment charges of $35 million and $488 million
recognized for our Rexall Health retail business. 2019 operating profit for Other also includes a pre-tax gain from escrow settlement of $97 million
representing certain indemnity and other claims related to our 2017 acquisition of Rexall Health. In addition, operating profit for 2019 include pre-tax
restructuring and asset impairment charges of $91 million, primarily associated with the lease and other exit-related costs and a pre-tax gain of $56 million
recognized from the sale of an equity investment.
(6)Operating profit for Other for 2019 includes a pre-tax credit of $90 million representing the derecognition of the TRA liability payable to the shareholders of
Change. Operating profit for Other also includes our proportionate share of loss from Change Healthcare of $194 million and $248 million for 2019 and 2018.
(7)Operating profit for Other for 2018 includes a pre-tax gain of $109 million from the sale of our EIS business and a pre-tax credit of $46 million representing a
reduction in our TRA liability. Additionally, operating profit for 2017 includes a pre-tax gain of $3,947 million recognized from the Healthcare Technology Net
Asset Exchange, net of transaction and related expenses, and a non-cash pre-tax charge of $290 million for goodwill impairment related to the EIS reporting
unit.
(8)Corporate expenses, net, for 2019 include pre-tax restructuring and asset impairment charges of $94 million primarily associated with employee severance and
other exit-related costs.
(9)Amounts primarily include amortization of acquired intangible assets purchased in connection with business acquisitions and capitalized software for internal
use.
(10)Long-lived assets consist of property, plant and equipment.
Segment assets and property, plant and equipment, net by geographic areas were as follows:
 March 31,
(In millions) 2019 2018
Segment assets  
U.S. Pharmaceutical and Specialty Solutions $ 32,310 $ 31,431
European Pharmaceutical Solutions 7,829 10,467
Medical-Surgical Solutions 5,260 4,243
Other 11,006 11,509
Corporate 3,267 2,731
Total $ 59,672 $ 60,381
 
Property, plant and equipment, net
United States $ 1,698 $ 1,529
Foreign 850 935
Total $ 2,548 $ 2,464
119
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
29.Quarterly Financial Information (Unaudited)
The quarterly results of operations are not necessarily indicative of the results that may be expected for the entire year. Selected
quarterly financial information for the last two years is as follows:
(In millions, except per shar e amounts)First
Quarter  Second
QuarterThird
Quarter  Fourth
Quarter
Fiscal 2019    
Revenues $ 52,607 $ 53,075 $ 56,208 $ 52,429
Gross profit (1) (2)2,779 2,804 2,970 3,201
Income (Loss) after income taxes:    
Continuing operations (1) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7)$ (81) $ 552 $ 527 $ (744)
Discontinued operations 1 1 (1) —
Net income (loss) $ (80) $ 553 $ 526 $ (744)
Net income (loss) attributable to McKesson $ (138) $ 499 $ 469 $ (796)
Earnings (loss) per common share attributable
to McKesson (8)   
Diluted (9)   
Continuing operations $ (0.69) $ 2.51 $ 2.41 $ (4.17)
Discontinued operations 0.01 — (0.01) —
Total $ (0.68) $ 2.51 $ 2.40 $ (4.17)
Basic    
Continuing operations $ (0.69) $ 2.52 $ 2.42 $ (4.17)
Discontinued operations 0.01 — (0.01) —
Total $ (0.68) $ 2.52 $ 2.41 $ (4.17)
(1)Gross profit for the first, second, third and fourth quarters of 2019 includes pre-tax credits of $21 million, $22 million, $21 million and $146 million related to
our LIFO method of accounting for inventories.
(2)Gross profit for the first, third and fourth quarters of 2019 includes $35 million, $104 million, and $63 million of cash proceeds representing our share of net
settlements of antitrust class action lawsuits.
(3)Financial results for the first and fourth quarter of 2019 include non-cash pre-tax goodwill impairment charges of $570 million and $1,206 million within our
two reporting units within the European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment.
(4)Financial results for the first and fourth quarters of 2019 include non-cash pre-tax asset impairment charges of $20 million and $190 million primarily for our
U.K. retail business. Financial results for the third quarter of 2019 include non-cash pre-tax asset impairment charges of $35 million for our Rexall Health
retail business.
(5)Financial results for the first, second, third and fourth quarters of 2019 include our proportionate share of loss from Change Healthcare of $56 million, $56
million, $50 million and $32 million.
(6)Financial results for the first quarter of 2019 include a pre-tax gain from escrow settlement of $97 million representing certain indemnity and other claims
related to our 2017 acquisition of Rexall Health.
(7)Financial results for the second quarter of 2019 include a pre-tax credit of $90 million representing the derecognition of the TRA liability payable to the
shareholders of Change.
(8)Certain computations may reflect rounding adjustments.
(9)As a result of our reported net loss for the first and fourth quarters of 2019, potentially dilutive securities were excluded from the per share computations for
those quarters due to their antidilutive effect.
 
120
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Concluded)
(In millions, except per shar e amounts)First
Quarter  Second
QuarterThird
Quarter  Fourth
Quarter
Fiscal 2018     
Revenues $ 51,051 $ 52,061 $ 53,617 $ 51,628
Gross profit (1)2,560 2,834 2,715 3,075
Income (loss) after income taxes:     
Continuing operations (1) (2) (3) (4) (5)$ 363 $ 56 $ 960 $ (1,087)
Discontinued operations 2 — 1 2
Net income (loss) $ 365 $ 56 $ 961 $ (1,085)
Net income (loss) attributable to McKesson $ 309 $ 1 $ 903 $ (1,146)
Earnings (loss) per common share attributable
to McKesson (6)    
Diluted (7)    
Continuing operations $ 1.44 $ 0.01 $ 4.32 $ (5.58)
Discontinued operations 0.01 — 0.01 —
Total $ 1.45 $ 0.01 $ 4.33 $ (5.58)
Basic     
Continuing operations $ 1.46 $ 0.01 $ 4.34 $ (5.58)
Discontinued operations — — 0.01 —
Total $ 1.46 $ 0.01 $ 4.35 $ (5.58)
(1)Gross profit for the first, second, third and fourth quarters of 2018 includes pre-tax charge of $26 million, pre-tax credits of $29 million, $2 million and $94
million related to our LIFO method of accounting for inventories.
(2)Financial results for the second and fourth quarter of 2018 include non-cash pre-tax goodwill impairment charges of $350 million and $933 million for our
former McKesson Europe reporting unit in European Pharmaceutical Solutions segment. In addition, financial results for the fourth quarter of 2018 include a
non-cash pre-tax goodwill impairment charge of $455 million for our Rexall Health reporting unit in Other.
(3)Financial results for the second and fourth quarter of 2018 include non-cash pre-tax asset impairment charges of $189 million and $257 million for our
McKesson Europe business.
(4)Financial results for the third quarter of 2018 include a pre-tax gain of $109 million from the sale of our EIS business.
(5)Financial results for the first, second, third and fourth quarters of 2018 include our proportionate share of loss from Change Healthcare of $120 million, $61
million, $90 million and income of $23 million.
(6)Certain computations may reflect rounding adjustments.
(7)As a result of our reported net loss for the fourth quarter of 2018, potentially dilutive securities were excluded from the 2018 fourth quarter per share
computations due to their antidilutive effect.
121
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure.
None.
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures.
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Our Chief Executive Officer and our Chief Financial Officer, with the participation of other members of the Company’s
management, have evaluated the effectiveness of the Company’s “disclosure controls and procedures” (as such term is defined in
Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) as of the end of the period covered by this report and have concluded that our
disclosure controls and procedures are effective based on their evaluation of these controls and procedures as required by paragraph
(b) of Exchange Act Rules 13a-15 or 15d-15.
Internal Control over Financial Reporting
Management’s report on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Exchange Act
Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) and the related report of our independent registered public accounting firm are included in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K, under the headings, “Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting”
and “Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm” and are incorporated herein by reference.
Changes in Internal Controls
There was no change in our internal control over financial reporting identified in connection with the evaluation required by
paragraph (d) of Exchange Act Rules 13a-15 or 15d-15 that occurred during our fourth quarter of 2019 that has materially affected,
or is reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting.
Item 9B. Other Information.
None.
122
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance.
Information about our Directors is incorporated by reference from the discussion under Item 1 of our Proxy Statement for the
2019 Annual Meeting of Stockholders (the “Proxy Statement”) under the heading “Election of Directors.” Information about our
Executive Officers is incorporated by reference from the discussion in Part I of this report under the heading “Information about
our Executive Officers.” Information about our Audit Committee, including the members of the committee and our Audit
Committee Financial Expert, is incorporated by reference from the discussion under the headings “Audit Committee,” and “Audit
Committee Report” in our Proxy Statement.
Information about the Code of Conduct applicable to all employees, officers and directors can be found on our website,
www.mckesson.com, under the caption “Investors - Corporate Governance.” The Company’s Corporate Governance Guidelines
and Charters for the Audit, Compensation and Governance Committees can also be found on our website under the same caption.
The Company intends to post on its website required information regarding any amendment to, or waiver from, the Code of
Conduct that applies to our Chief Executive Officer, Chief Financial Officer, Controller and persons performing similar functions
within four business days after any such amendment or waiver.
Item 11. Executive Compensation.
Information with respect to this item is incorporated by reference from the discussion under the heading “Executive
Compensation” in our Proxy Statement.
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters.
Information about security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management is incorporated by reference from the
discussion under the heading “Principal Shareholders” in our Proxy Statement.
The following table sets forth information as of March 31, 2019 with respect to the plans under which the Company’s common
stock is authorized for issuance:
Plan Category
(In millions, except per shar e amounts)Number  of securities
to be issued upon
exercise of
outstanding options,
warrants and rightsWeighted-average
exercise price of
outstanding options,
warrants and rights (1)Number  of securities
remaining available for
futur e issuance under
equity compensation plans
(excluding securities
reflected in the first
column)
Equity compensation plans approved by
security holders 4.3 (2)$ 166.72 28.3 (3)
Equity compensation plans not approved by
security holders  — $ — —
(1)The weighted-average exercise price set forth in this column is calculated excluding outstanding restricted stock unit (“RSU”) awards, since recipients are not
required to pay an exercise price to receive the shares subject to these awards.
(2)Represents option and RSU awards outstanding under the following plans: (i) 1997 Non-Employee Directors’ Equity Compensation and Deferral Plan; (ii) the
2005 Stock Plan; and (iii) the 2013 Stock Plan.
(3)Represents 3,053,377 shares available for purchase under the 2000 Employee Stock Purchase Plan and 25,205,160 shares available for grant under the 2013
Stock Plan.
The following are descriptions of equity plans that have been approved by the Company’s stockholders. The plans are
administered by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors, except for the portion of the 2013 Stock Plan and 2005
Stock Plan related to non-employee directors, which is administered by the Board of Directors or its Governance Committee.
123
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
2013 Stock Plan: The 2013 Stock Plan was adopted by the Board of Directors on May 22, 2013 and approved by the
Company’s stockholders on July 31, 2013. The 2013 Stock Plan permits the grant of awards in the form of stock options, stock
appreciation rights, restricted stock (“RS”), restricted stock units (“RSUs”), performance-based restricted stock units (“PeRSUs”),
performance shares and other share-based awards. The number of shares reserved for issuance under the 2013 Stock Plan equals the
sum of (i) 30,000,000 shares, (ii) the number of shares reserved but unissued under the 2005 Stock Plan as of the effective date of
the 2013 Stock Plan, and (iii) the number of shares that become available for reuse under the 2005 Stock Plan following the
effective date of the 2013 Stock Plan. For any one share of common stock issued in connection with an RS, RSU, performance
share or other full share award, three and one-half shares shall be deducted from the shares available for future grants. Shares of
common stock not issued or delivered as a result of the net exercise of a stock option, including in respect of the payment of
applicable taxes, or shares repurchased on the open market with proceeds from the exercise of options shall not be returned to the
reserve of shares available for issuance under the 2013 Stock Plan. Shares withheld to satisfy tax obligations relating to the vesting
of a full-share award shall be returned to the reserve of shares available for issuance under the 2013 Stock Plan.
Stock options are granted at no less than fair market value and those options granted under the 2013 Stock Plan generally have
a contractual term of seven years. Options generally become exercisable in four equal annual installments beginning one year after
the grant date. The vesting of RS or RSUs is determined by the Compensation Committee at the time of grant. RS and RSUs
generally vest over four years. PeRSUs vest three years following the end of the performance period. Beginning in May 2014, the
Company’s executive officers are annually granted performance awards currently called performance-based stock units (“PSUs”),
which have a three-year performance period and are payable in shares without an additional vesting period.
Non-employee directors may be granted an award on the date of each annual meeting of the stockholders for up to 5,000
RSUs, as determined by the Board. Such non-employee director award is fully vested on the date of the grant.
2005 Stock Plan: The 2005 Stock Plan was adopted by the Board of Directors on May 25, 2005 and approved by the
Company’s stockholders on July 27, 2005. The 2005 Stock Plan permits the granting of up to 42.5 million shares in the form of
stock options, RS, RSUs, PeRSUs, performance shares and other share-based awards. For any one share of common stock issued in
connection with an RS, RSU, performance share or other full-share award, two shares shall be deducted from the shares available
for future grants. Shares of common stock not issued or delivered as a result of the net exercise of a stock option, shares withheld to
satisfy tax obligations relating to the vesting of a full-share award or shares repurchased on the open market with proceeds from the
exercise of options shall not be returned to the reserve of shares available for issuance under the 2005 Stock Plan.
Following the effectiveness of the 2013 Stock Plan, no further shares were made subject to award under the 2005 Stock Plan.
Shares reserved but unissued under the 2005 Stock Plan as of the effective date of the 2013 Stock Plan, and shares that become
available for reuse under the 2005 Stock Plan following the effectiveness of the 2013 Stock Plan, will be available for awards under
the 2013 Stock Plan.
Stock options are granted at no less than fair market value and those options granted under the 2005 Stock Plan generally have
a contractual term of seven years.
1997 Non-Employee Directors’ Equity Compensation and Deferral Plan: The 1997 Non-Employee Directors’ Equity
Compensation and Deferral Plan was approved by the Company’s stockholders on July 30, 1997; however, stockholder approval of
the 2005 Stock Plan on July 27, 2005 had the effect of terminating the 1997 Non-Employee Directors’ Equity Compensation and
Deferral Plan such that no new awards would be granted under the 1997 Non-Employee Directors’ Equity Compensation and
Deferral Plan.
2000 Employee Stock Purchase Plan (the “ESPP”): The ESPP is intended to qualify as an “employee stock purchase plan”
within the meaning of Section 423 of the Internal Revenue Code. In March 2002, the Board amended the ESPP to allow for
participation in the plan by employees of certain of the Company’s international and other subsidiaries. As to those employees, the
ESPP does not qualify under Section 423 of the Internal Revenue Code. Currently, 21.1 million shares have been approved by
stockholders for issuance under the ESPP.
124
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
The ESPP is implemented through a continuous series of three-month purchase periods (“Purchase Periods”) during which
contributions can be made toward the purchase of common stock under the plan.
Each eligible employee may elect to authorize regular payroll deductions during the next succeeding Purchase Period, the
amount of which may not exceed 15% of a participant’s compensation. At the end of each Purchase Period, the funds withheld by
each participant will be used to purchase shares of the Company’s common stock. The purchase price of each share of the
Company’s common stock is 85% of the fair market value of each share on the last day of the applicable Purchase Period. In
general, the maximum number of shares of common stock that may be purchased by a participant for each calendar year is
determined by dividing $25,000 by the fair market value of one share of common stock on the offering date.
There currently are no equity awards outstanding that were granted under equity plans that were not submitted for approval by
the Company’s stockholders.
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence.
Information with respect to certain transactions with directors and management is incorporated by reference from the Proxy
Statement under the heading “Certain Relationships and Related Transactions.” Information regarding Director independence is
incorporated by reference from the Proxy Statement under the heading “Director Independence.” Additional information regarding
certain related party balances and transactions is included in the Financial Review section of this report and Financial Note 26,
“Related Party Balances and Transactions,” to the consolidated financial statements appearing in this report.
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services.
Information regarding principal accountant fees and services is set forth under the heading “Ratification of Appointment of
Deloitte & Touche LLP as the Company’s Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm for Fiscal 2020” in our Proxy Statement
and all such information is incorporated herein by reference.
125
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedule.
 Page
(a)(1) Consolidated Financial Statements
 
Report of Deloitte & Touche LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 52
 
Consolidated Statements of Operations for the years ended March 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 54
 
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the years ended March 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 55
 
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of March 31, 2019 and 2018 56
 
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders’ Equity for the years ended March 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 57
 
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended March 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 58
 
Financial Notes 59
 
(a)(2) Financial Statement Schedule
 
Schedule II-Valuation and Qualifying Accounts 127
 
All other schedules not included have been omitted because of the absence of conditions under which they
are required or because the required information, where material, is shown in the financial statements,
financial notes or supplementary financial information.
 
(a)(3) Exhibits submitted with this Annual Report on Form 10-K as filed with the SEC and those
incorporated by reference to other filings are listed on the Exhibit Index 128
 
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary
None.
126
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
SCHEDULE II
SUPPLEMENTARY CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULE
VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
For the Years Ended March 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017
(In millions)
  Additions   
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning of
YearCharged to
Costs and
ExpensesCharged to
Other
Accounts (3)Deductions
From
Allowance
Accounts (1)Balance at
End of
Year (2)
Year Ended March 31, 2019     
Allowances for doubtful
accounts $ 187 $ 132 $ (1)$ (45)$ 273
Other allowances 39 — (15) — 24
 $ 226 $ 132 $ (16)$ (45)$ 297
     
Year Ended March 31, 2018     
Allowances for doubtful
accounts $ 243 $ 44 $ 13 $ (113)$ 187
Other allowances 42 — (3) — 39
 $ 285 $ 44 $ 10 $ (113)$ 226
     
Year Ended March 31, 2017     
Allowances for doubtful
accounts $ 212 $ 93 $ 7 $ (69)$ 243
Other allowances 41 — 2 (1) 42
 $ 253 $ 93 $ 9 $ (70)$ 285
     
 2019 2018 2017
(1)Deductions:    
 Written off $ (45) $ (113) $ (70)
 Credited to other accounts — — —
 Total $ (45) $ (113) $ (70)
    
(2)Amounts shown as deductions from current and non-current receivables $ 297 $ 226 $ 285
    
(3)Primarily represents reclassifications from other balance sheet accounts.    
127
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
EXHIBIT INDEX
The agreements included as exhibits to this report are included to provide information regarding their terms and not intended to
provide any other factual or disclosure information about the Company or the other parties to the agreements. The agreements may
contain representations and warranties by each of the parties to the applicable agreement that were made solely for the benefit of
the other parties to the applicable agreement, and;
•should not in all instances be treated as categorical statements of fact, but rather as a way of allocating the risk to one of the
parties if those statements prove to be inaccurate;
•may apply standards of materiality in a way that is different from what may be viewed as material to you or other investors;
and
•were made only as of the date of the applicable agreement or such other date or dates as may be specified in the agreement and
are subject to more recent developments.
Accordingly, these representations and warranties may not describe the actual state of affairs as of the date they were made or
at any other time.
Exhibits identified under “Incorporated by Reference” in the table below are on file with the Commission and are incorporated
by reference as exhibits hereto.
  Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Description FormFile
NumberExhibit Filing Date
2.1 Agreement of Contribution and Sale, dated as of June 28, 2016,
by and among McKesson Corporation, PF2 NewCo LLC, PF2
NewCo Intermediate Holdings, LLC, PF2 NewCo Holdings,
LLC, HCIT Holdings, Inc., Change Healthcare, Inc., Change
Aggregator L.P. and H&F Echo Holdings, L.P.8-K 1-13252 2.1 July 5, 2016
2.2 Amendment No. 1 to Agreement Contribution and Sale, dated as
of March 1, 2017, by and among by and among Change
Healthcare LLC, Change Healthcare Intermediate Holdings,
LLC, Change Healthcare Holdings, LLC, HCIT Holdings, Inc.,
Change Healthcare, Inc., a Delaware corporation, for itself and
in its capacity as Echo Representative, certain affiliates of The
Blackstone Group, L.P., certain affiliates of Hellman &
Friedman LLC, and McKesson Corporation, a Delaware
corporation.8-K 1-13252 2.1 March 7, 2017
3.1 Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the
Company, as filed with the Delaware Secretary of State on July
27, 2011.8-K 1-13252 3.1 August 2, 2011
3.2 Amended and Restated By-Laws of the Company, as amended
January 30, 2019.8-K 1-13252 3.1 February 5, 2019
4.1 Indenture, dated as of March 11, 1997, by and between the
Company, as issuer, and The First National Bank of Chicago, as
trustee.10-K 1-13252 4.4 June 19, 1997
4.2 Officers’ Certificate, dated as of March 11, 1997, and related
Form of 2027 Note.S-4 333-30899 4.2 July 8, 1997
4.3 Indenture, dated as of March 5, 2007, by and between the
Company, as issuer, and The Bank of New York Trust Company,
N.A., as trustee.8-K 1-13252 4.1 March 5, 2007
4.4 Officers’ Certificate, dated as of March 5, 2007, and related
Form of 2017 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.2 March 5, 2007
4.5 Officers’ Certificate, dated as of February 12, 2009, and related
Form of 2014 Note and Form of 2019 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.2 February 12, 2009
128
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
  Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Description FormFile
NumberExhibit Filing Date
4.6 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 28, 2011, to
the Indenture, dated as of March 5, 2007, among the Company,
as issuer, the Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A.
(formerly known as The Bank of New York Trust Company,
N.A.), and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee,
and related Form of 2016 Note, Form of 2021 Note and Form of
2041 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.2 February 28, 2011
4.7 Indenture, dated as of December 4, 2012, by and between the
Company, as issuer, and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trustee.8-K 1-13252 4.1 December 4, 2012
4.8 Officers’ Certificate, dated as of December 4, 2012, and related
Form of 2015 Note and Form of 2022 Note.  8-K 1-13252 4.2 December 4, 2012
4.9 Officers’ Certificate, dated as of March 8, 2013, and related
Form of 2018 Note and Form of 2023 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.2 March 8, 2013
4.10 Officers’ Certificate, dated as of March 10, 2014, and related
Form of Floating Rate Note, Form of 2017 Note, Form of 2019
Note, Form of 2024 Note, and Form of 2044 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.2 March 10, 2014
4.11 Officer’s Certificate, dated as of February 17, 2017, with respect
to the Notes, and related Form of 2021 Euro Note, Form of 2025
Euro Note, and Form of 2029 Sterling Note.8-K 1-13252 4.1 February 17, 2017
4.12 Officer’s Certificate, dated as of February 12, 2018, with respect
to the Euro Notes, and related Form of Floating Rate Note and
Form of Fixed Rate Note.8-K 1-13252 4.1 February 13, 2018
4.13 Officer’s Certificate, dated as of February 16, 2018, with respect
to the Notes, and related Form of Note.8-K 1-13252 4.1 February 21, 2018
4.14 Officer’s Certificate, dated as of November 30, 2018, with
respect to the Notes, and related Form of 2020 Note and Form of
2029 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.1 November 30, 2018
4.15†Description of securities — — — —
10.1*McKesson Corporation 1997 Non-Employee Directors’Equity
Compensation and Deferral Plan, as amended through January
29, 2003.10-K 1-13252 10.4 June 10, 2004
10.2*McKesson Corporation Supplemental Profit Sharing Investment
Plan, as amended and restated on January 29, 2003.10-K 1-13252 10.6 June 6, 2003
10.3*McKesson Corporation Supplemental Profit Sharing Investment
Plan II, as amended and restated on July 29, 2014.10-Q 1-13252 10.1 October 28, 2014
10.4*McKesson Corporation Deferred Compensation Administration
Plan II, as amended and restated as of October 28, 2004, and
Amendment No. 1 thereto effective July 25, 2007.10-K 1-13252 10.7 May 7, 2008
10.5*McKesson Corporation Deferred Compensation Administration
Plan III, as amended and restated July 29, 2014.10-Q 1-13252 10.2 October 28, 2014
10.6*McKesson Corporation Executive Survivor Benefits Plan,as
amended and restated as of January 20, 2010.8-K 1-13252 10.1 January 25, 2010
10.7*McKesson Corporation Severance Policy for Executive
Employees, as amended and restated as of April 23, 2013.10-K 1-13252 10.11 May 7, 2013
10.8*McKesson Corporation Change in Control Policy for Selected
Executive Employees, as amended and restated on October 26,
2010.10-Q 1-13252 10.2 February 1, 2011
10.9*McKesson Corporation Management Incentive Plan, effective
July 29, 2015.8-K 1-13252 10.1 July 31, 2015
10.10*Form of Statement of Terms and Conditions Applicable to
Awards Pursuant to the McKesson Corporation Management
Incentive Plan, effective May 26, 2015.10-Q 1-13252 10.1 July 29, 2015
129
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
  Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Description FormFile
NumberExhibit Filing Date
10.11*McKesson Corporation Long-Term Incentive Plan, as amended
and restated, effective May 26, 2015, as amended effective
October 23, 2018.10-Q 1-13252 10.1 October 25, 2018
10.12*Forms of Statement of Terms and Conditions Applicable to
Awards Pursuant to the McKesson Corporation Long-Term
Incentive Plan, effective May 24, 2016.10-K 1-13252 10.14 May 5, 2016
10.13*McKesson Corporation 2005 Stock Plan, as amended and
restated on July 28, 2010.10-Q 1-13252 10.4 July 30, 2010
10.14*Forms of (i) Statement of Terms and Conditions, (ii) Stock
Option Grant Notice and (iii), Restricted Stock Unit Agreement,
each as applicable to Awards under the McKesson Corporation
2005 Stock Plan.10-Q 1-13252 10.2 July 26, 2012
10.15*McKesson Corporation 2013 Stock Plan, as adopted on May 22,
2013.8-K 1-13252 10.1 August 2, 2013
10.16*Forms of Statement of Terms and Conditions Applicable to
Awards Pursuant to the McKesson Corporation 2013 Stock Plan.10-Q 1-13252 10.1 January 31, 2019
10.17Third Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company
Agreement of Change Healthcare LLC, dated as of March 1,
2017.8-K 1-13252 10.1 March 7, 2017
10.18Form of Commercial Paper Dealer Agreement between
McKesson Corporation, as Issuer, and the Dealer.10-K 1-13252 10.19 May 5, 2016
10.19Credit Agreement, dated as of October 22, 2015, among the
Company and Certain Subsidiaries, as Borrowers, Bank of
America, N.A. as Administrative Agent, Bank of America, N.A.
(acting through its Canada Branch), Citibank, N.A. and Barclays
Bank PLC, as Swing Line Lenders, Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association as L/C Issuer, Barclays Bank PLC, Citibank N.A.,
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association as Co-Syndication
Agents, Goldman Sachs Bank USA, JPMorgan Chase Bank,
N.A., The Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ, Ltd. as Co-
Documentation Agents, and The Other Lenders Party Thereto,
and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated,
Barclays Bank PLC, Citigroup Global Markets Inc., Goldman
Sachs Bank USA, J.P. Morgan Securities, LLC, The Bank of
TokyoMitsubishi UFJ, Ltd. and Wells Fargo Securities, LLC as
Joint Lead Arrangers and Joint Book Runners.8-K 1-13252 10.1 October 23, 2015
10.20Amendment No. 2, dated January 30, 2014, and Amendment No.
1, dated November 15, 2013, to the Credit Agreement and the
Credit Agreement dated as of September 23, 2011, among the
Company and McKesson Canada Corporation, collectively, the
Borrowers, Bank of America, N.A. as Administrative Agent,
Bank of America, N.A. (acting through its Canada branch), as
Canadian Administrative Agent, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Co-Syndication
Agents, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association as L/C Issuer,
The Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ, LTD., The Bank of Nova
Scotia and U.S. Bank National Association as Co-
Documentation Agents, and The Other Lenders Party Thereto,
and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, Sole
Lead Arranger and Sole Book Manager.8-K 1-3252 10.1 February 5, 2014
10.21*Amended and Restated Employment Agreement, effective as of
November 1, 2008, by and between the Company and its
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer.10-Q 1-13252 10.10 October 29, 2008
10.22*Letter dated March 27, 2012 relinquishing certain rights
provided in the Amended and Restated Employment Agreement8-K 1-13252 99.1 April 2, 2012
by and between the Company and its Chairman, President and
Chief Executive Officer.
130
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
  Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Description FormFile
NumberExhibit Filing Date
10.23*Letter dated February 27, 2014 relinquishing certain rights
provided in the McKesson Corporation Executive Benefit
Retirement Plan by and between the Company and its Chairman,
President and Chief Executive Officer.8-K 1-13252 10.1 February 28, 2014
10.24*Senior Advisor Agreement 8-K 1-13252 10.1 March 19, 2019
10.25*Form of Director and Officer Indemnification Agreement. 10-K 1-13252 10.27 May 4, 2010
21† List of Subsidiaries of the Registrant. — — — —
23† Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm,
Deloitte & Touche LLP.— — — —
24† Power of Attorney. — — — —
31.1†Certification of Chief Executive Officer Pursuant to Rule 13a-
14(a) and Rule 15d-14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, as amended, and adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.— — — —
31.2†Certification of Chief Financial Officer Pursuant to Rule 13a-
14(a) and Rule 15d-14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
as amended, and adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.— — — —
32††Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted
pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.— — — —
101†The following materials from the McKesson Corporation Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended March 31, 2019,
formatted in Extensible Business Reporting Language (XBRL):
(i) the Consolidated Statements of Operations, (ii) Consolidated
Statements of Comprehensive Income, (iii) Consolidated
Balance Sheets, (iv) Consolidated Statements of Stockholders'
Equity, (v) Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows, and (vi)
related Financial Notes.— — — —
________________
* Management contract or compensation plan or arrangement in which directors and/or executive officers are eligible to
participate.
† Filed herewith.
††Furnished herewith.
Registrant agrees to furnish to the Commission upon request a copy of each instrument defining the rights of security holders
with respect to issues of long-term debt of the registrant, the authorized principal amount of which does not exceed 10% of the total
assets of the registrant.
131
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly
caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
   MCKESSON CORPORATION
   
Date: May 15, 2019  /s/ Britt J. Vitalone
   Britt J. Vitalone
   Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following
persons on behalf of the Registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated:
* *
Brian S. Tyler
Chief Executive Officer and Director
(Principal Executive Officer)Donald R. Knauss, Director
  
* *
Britt J. Vitalone
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)Marie L. Knowles, Director
  
* *
Sundeep G. Reddy
Senior Vice President and Controller
(Principal Accounting Officer)Bradley E. Lerman, Director
  
* *
Dominic J. Caruso, Director Edward A. Mueller, Director
  
* *
N. Anthony Coles, M.D., Director Susan R. Salka, Director
  
* /s/ Lori A. Schechter
M. Christine Jacobs, Director Lori A. Schechter
*Attorney-in-Fact
  
  
Date: May 15, 2019  
132
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
DIRECTORS AND OFFICERS
  
BOARD OF DIRECTORS CORPORATE OFFICERS
Dominic J. Caruso Brian S. Tyler
Executive Vice President and Chief Executive Officer
Chief Financial Officer, Retired,  
Johnson & Johnson Britt J. Vitalone
 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
N. Anthony Coles, M. D.  
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, Jorge L. Figueredo
Yumanity Therapeutics, LLC Executive Vice President and Chief Human Resources Officer
  
M. Christine Jacobs Kathleen D. McElligott
Chairman of the Board, President and Executive Vice President, Chief Information Officer and
Chief Executive Officer, Retired, Chief Technology Officer
Theragenics Corporation  
 Bansi Nagji
Donald R. Knauss Executive Vice President and
Executive Chairman of the Board, Retired, Chief Strategy and Business Development Officer
The Clorox Company  
 Lori A. Schechter
Marie L. Knowles Executive Vice President, General Counsel and
Executive Vice President and Chief Compliance Officer
Chief Financial Officer, Retired,  
Atlantic Richfield Company Sundeep G. Reddy
 Senior Vice President and Controller
Bradley E. Lerman  
Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Brian P. Moore
Corporate Secretary, Senior Vice President and Treasurer
Medtronic plc  
 Paul A. Smith
Edward A. Mueller Senior Vice President, Taxes
Chairman of the Board and  
Chief Executive Officer, Retired, Michele Lau
Qwest Communications International Inc. Corporate Secretary
  
Susan R. Salka  
Chief Executive Officer and President,  
AMN Healthcare Services, Inc.  
  
Brian S. Tyler  
Chief Executive Officer,  
McKesson Corporation  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
133
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
CORPORATE INFORMATION
Common Stock
McKesson Corporation common stock is listed on the New York Stock Exchange (ticker symbol MCK) and is quoted in the
daily stock tables carried by most newspapers.
Stockholder Information
EQ Shareowner Services, 1110 Centre Pointe Curve, Suite 101, Mendota Heights, MN 55120-4100 acts as transfer agent,
registrar, dividend-paying agent and dividend reinvestment plan agent for McKesson Corporation stock and maintains all registered
stockholder records for the Company.  For information about McKesson Corporation stock or to request replacement of lost
dividend checks, stock certificates or 1099-DIVs, or to have your dividend check deposited directly into your checking or savings
account, stockholders may call EQ Shareowner Services’ telephone response center at (866) 614-9635.  For the hearing impaired
call (651) 450-4144. EQ Shareowner Services also has a website—https://www.shareowneronline.com-that stockholders may use
24 hours a day to request account information.
Dividends and Dividend Reinvestment Plan
Dividends are generally paid on the first business day of January, April, July and October.  McKesson Corporation’s Dividend
Reinvestment Plan offers stockholders the opportunity to reinvest dividends in common stock and to purchase additional shares of
common stock.  Stock in an individual’s Dividend Reinvestment Plan is held in book entry at the Company’s transfer agent, EQ
Shareowner Services.  For more information, or to request an enrollment form, call EQ Shareowner Services’ telephone response
center at (866) 614-9635.  From outside the United States, call +1-651-450-4064.
Annual Meeting
McKesson Corporation’s Annual Meeting of Stockholders will be held at 8:30 a.m. CDT, on July 31, 2019 at the Dallas/Fort
Worth Airport Marriott, 8440 Freeport Parkway, Irving, TX 75063.
134
